a
GEORGIA THEATRICS.
If my memory fail me not, the 10th of June, 1809,
found me at about 11 o'clock in the forenoon, ascending
a long and gentle slope, in what was called The Dark
Corner of Lincoln. I believe it took its name from
the moral darkness, which reigned over that portion of
the county, at the time of which I am speaking. If in
this point of view, it was but a shade darker than the
rest of the county, it was inconceivably dark. If any
man can name a trick, or sin, which had not been
committed
at the time of which I am speaking, in the very
focus of all the county's illumination, (Lincolnton) he
must himself be the most inventive of the tricky, and the
very Judas of sinners. Since that time, however, (all
humor aside) Lincoln has become a living proof that
light shineth in darkness. Could I venture to mingle
the solemn with the ludicrous, even for the purposes of
honorable contrast, I could adduce from this county
instances
of the most numerous and wonderful transitions,
from vice and folly, to virtue and holiness, which have
ever perhaps been witnessed since the days of the
apostolic
ministry. So much, lest it should be thought by
some, that what I am about to relate, is characteristic of
the county in which it occurred.
Whatever may be said of the
moral
condition of the
Dark Corner, at the time just mentioned, its
natural
condition
was any thing but dark. It smiled in all the
charms of spring; and spring borrowed a new charm
from its undulating grounds, its luxuriant woodlands, its
sportive streams, its vocal birds, and its blushing flowers.
Rapt with the enchantment of the season, and the
scenery around me, I was slowly rising the slope, when
I was startled by loud, profane and boisterous voices,
which seemed to proceed from a thick covert of
undergrowth
,
about two hundred yards in the advance of me,
and about one hundred to the right of my road.
You kin, kin you?
Yes, I kin, and am able to do it! Boo-oo-oo! Oh,
wake snakes, and walk your chalks! Brimstone and
fire! Don't hold me, Nick Stoval! The fight 's
made up and let's go at it.  my soul, if I don't
jump down his throat and gallop every chitterling out of
him, before you can say `quit'!
Now, Nick, don't hold him! Jist let the wild-cat
come, and I'll tame him. Ned 'll see me a fair fight
won't you, Ned?
Oh, yes; I'll see you a fair fight, blast my old shoes
if I don't.
That's sufficient, as Tom Haynes said when he saw
the Elephant. Now let him come.
Thus they went on, with countless oaths interspersed,
which I dare not even hint at, and with much that I could
not distinctly hear.
In Mercy's name! thought I, what band of ruffians
has selected this holy season, and this heavenly retreat,
for such Pandmonian riots! I quickened my gait, and
had come nearly opposite to the thick grove whence the
noise proceeded, when my eye caught indistinctly, and
at intervals, through the foliage of the dwarf-oaks and
hickories which intervened, glimpses of a man, or men,
who seemed to be in a violent struggle; and I could
occasionally catch those deep drawn, emphatic oaths,
which men in conflict utter, when they deal blows. I
dismounted, and hurried to the spot with all speed. I
had overcome about half the space which separated it
from me, when I saw the combatants come to the ground,
and after a short struggle, I saw the uppermost one (for
I could not see the other) make a heavy plunge with
both his thumbs, and at the same instant I heard a cry
in the accent of keenest torture, Enough! My
eye's out!
I was so completely horror-struck, that I stood
transfixed
for a moment to the spot where the cry met me.
The accomplices in the hellish deed which had been
perpetrated, had all fled at my approachat least I
supposed so, for they were not to be seen.
Now, blast your corn-shucking soul, said the victor,
(a youth about eighteen years old) as he rose from the
ground, come cutt'n your shines 'bout me agin, next
time I come to the Court-House, will you! Get your
owl-eye in agin if you can!
At this moment he saw me for the first time. He
looked excessively embarrassed, and was moving off,
when I called to him, in a tone, emboldened by the
sacredness of my office, and the iniquity of his crime,
Come back, you brute! and assist me in relieving
your fellow mortal, whom you have ruined forever!
My rudeness subdued his embarrassment in an instant;
and with a taunting curl of the nose, he replied you
need n't kick before you're spur'd. There a'nt nobody
there, nor ha'nt been nother. I was jist seein' how I
could 'a'
fout
. So saying, he bounded to his plough,
which stood in the corner of the fence about fifty yards
beyond the battle ground.
And would you believe it, gentle reader! his report
was true. All that I had heard and seen, was nothing
more nor less than a Lincoln rehearsal; in which the
youth who had just left me, had played all the parts, of
all the characters, in a Court-House fight.
I went to the ground from which he had risen; and
there were the prints of his two thumbs, plunged up to
the balls in the mellow earth, about the distance of a
man's eyes apart; and the ground around was broken
up, as if two Stags had been engaged upon it.
HALL.
THE DANCE.
A PERSONAL ADVENTURE OF THE AUTHOR.
Some years ago, I was called by business to one of
the frontier counties, then but recently settled. It became
necessary for me, while there, to enlist the services of
Thomas Gibson, Esq., one of the magistrates of the
county, who resided about a mile and a half from my
lodgings; and to this circumstance was I indebted for
my introduction to him. I had made the intended
disposition
of my business, and was on the eve of my departure
to the city of my residence, when I was induced to remain
a day longer, by an invitation from the Squire, to attend
a dance at his house on the following day. Having
learned
from my landlord that I would probably be
expected
at the frolick about the hour of 10 in the forenoon,
and being desirous of seeing all that passed upon the
occasion, I went over about an hour before the time.
The Squire's dwelling consisted of but one room;
which answered the three-fold purpose, of dining room,
a2
bed room, and kitchen. The house was constructed of
logs, and the floor was of
puncheons
a term, which in
Georgia, means split logs, with their faces a little smothed
with the axe or hatchet. To gratify his daughters, Polly
and Silvy, the old gentleman and his lady, had consented
to
camp out
for a day, and to surrender the habitation to
the girls and their young friends.
When I reached there, I found all things in readiness
for the promised amusement. The girls, as the old
gentleman
informed me, had compelled the family to breakfast
under the trees, for they had completely stript the house
of its furniture before the sun rose. They were already
attired for the dance, in neat, but plain habiliments, of
their own manufacture. What! says some weakly,
sickly, delicate, useless, affected, charming creature,
of the city, dressed for a Ball at 9 in the morning!
Even so, my delectable Miss Octavia Matilda Juliana
Claudia Ipecacuanha: and what have you to say against
it? If people must dance, is it not much more rational,
to employ the hour allotted to exercise in that amusement,
than the hours sacred to repose and meditation? And
which is entitled to the most credit; the young lady who
rises with the dawn, and puts herself and whole house
in order for a Ball, four hours before it begins; or the
one who requires a fortnight to get herself dressed for it?
The Squire and I employed the interval in conversation
about the first settlement of the country; in the course
of which, I picked up some useful, and much interesting
information. We were at length interrupted, however,
by the sound of a violin, which proceeded from a thick
wood at my left. The performer soon after made his
appearance, and proved to be no other than Billy Porter,
a negro fellow of much harmless wit and humor, who
was well known throughout the State. Poor Billy! his
harp is now hung upon the willowand I would not
blush to offer a tear to his memory, for his name is
associated
with some of the happiest scenes of my life, and
he sleeps with many a dear friend, who used to join me in
provoking his wit, and in laughing at his excentricities
but I am leading my reader to the grave, instead of the
dance, which I promised. If, however, his memory
reaches twelve years back, he will excuse this short
tribute of respect to
Billy Porter
.
Billy, to give his own account of himself, had been
taking a turn with the brethren, (the Bar); and hearing
the ladies wanted to see
pretty Billy
, had come to give
them a benefit. The Squire had not seen him before;
and it is no disrespect to his understanding or politeness,
to say, that he found it impossible to give me his attention
for half an hour after Billy arrived. I had nothing to
do, therefore, while the young people were assembling,
but to improve my knowledge of Billy's character, to
the Squire's amusement. I had been thus engaged about
thirty minutes, when I saw several fine, bouncing, ruddy
cheeked girls, descending a hill, about the eighth of a
mile off. They, too, were attired in manufactures of
their own hands. The refinements of the present day
in female dress, had not even reached our republican
cities
at this time; and of course, the
country girls
were
wholly ignorant of them. They carried no more cloth
upon their arms, or straw upon their heads, than was
necessary to cover them. They used no artificial means
of spreading their frock tails, to an interesting extent
from their ankles. They had no boards laced to their
breasts, nor any corsets laced to their sides;
consequently
,
they looked, for all the world, like human beings,
and could be distinctly recognized as such, at the distance
of two hundred paces. Their movements were as free
and active, as nature would permit them to be. Let me
not be understood, as interposing the least objection, to
any lady in this land of liberty, dressing just as she
pleases. If she choose to lay her neck and shoulders
bare, what right have I to look at them? much less to
find fault with them. If she choose to put three yards
of muslin in a frock sleeve; what right have I to ask,
why a little strip of it, was not put in the body? If she
like the pattern of a hoisted umbrella for a frock, and
the shape of a cheese-cask for her body; what is all
that to me? But to return.
The girls were met by Polly and Silvy Gibson, at
some distance from the house; who welcomed them
with a kiss, of courseOh, no; but with something
much less equivocal: a hearty shake of the hand and
smiling countenances, which had some meaning.
[
Note
.The custom of kissing, as practised in these
days by the
amiables
, is borrowed from the French;
and by them from Judas.]
The young ladies had generally collected before any
of the young men appeared. It was not long, however,
before a large number of both sexes were assembled;
and they adjourned to the
Ball room
.
But for the snapping of a fiddle string, the young
people would have been engaged in the amusement of
the day, in less than three minutes from the time they
entered the house. Here, were no formal introductions
to be given, no drawing for places or partners, no parade
of managers, no ceremonies. It was perfectly
understood
that all were invited
to dance
, and that none were
invited who were unworthy to be danced with;
consequently
,
no gentleman hesitated to ask any lady present
to dance with him, and no lady refused to dance with a
gentleman, merely because she had not been made
acquainted
with him.
In a short time the string was repaired, and off went
the party to a good old republican six reel. I had been
thrown among
fashionables
so long, that I had almost
forgotten my native dance. But it revived rapidly as
they wheeled through its mazes; and with it returned,
many long forgotten, pleasing recollections. Not only
did the reel return to me, but the very persons who used
to figure in it with me, in the hey-day of youth.
Here was my old sweet-heart, Polly Jackson,
identically
personified in Polly Gibson; and here was Jim
Johnson's, in Silvy; and Bill Martin's, in Nancy Ware.
Polly Gibson had my old flame's very steps as well as
her looks. Ah! said I, Squire, this puts me in
mind of old times. I have not seen a six reel for five
and twenty years. It recalls to my mind many a happy
hour, and many a jovial friend, who used to enliven it
with me. Your Polly, looks so much like my old
sweetheart
,
Polly Jackson, that were I young again, I certainly
should fall in love with her. That was the name of
her mother, said the Squire. Where did you marry
her? enquired I. In Wilkes, said heshe was
the daughter of old Nathan Jackson of that county.
It is n't possible! returned I. Then it is the very
girl of whom I am speaking. Where is she? She's
out, said the Squire, preparing dinner for the young
people; but she'll be in towards the close of the day.
But come along, and I'll make you acquainted with her
at once, if you'll promise not to run away with her, for
I tell you what it is, she's the likeliest
gal
in all these
parts, yet. Well, said I, I'll promise not to run
away with her, but you must not let her know who I am.
I wish to make myself known to her; and for fear of
the worst, you shall witness the introduction. But don't
get jealous, Squire, if she seems a little too glad to see
me; for I assure you, we had a strong notion of each
other, when we were young. No danger, replied
the Squire, she had n't seen
me
then, or she never
could have loved such a hard favored man as you are.
In the mean time the dance went on, and I employed
myself in selecting from the party, the best examples of
the dancers of my day and Mrs. Gibson's, for her
entertainment
.
In this, I had not the least difficulty; for the
dancers before me, and those of my day, were in all
respects
identical.
Jim Johnson kept up the double shuffle from the
beginning to the end of the reel: and here was Jim over
again in Sammy Tant. Bill Martin always set to his
partner with the same stepand a very curious step it
was.He brought his right foot close behind his left, and
with it performed precisely the motion of the thumb in
cracking that insect which Burns has immortalized; then
moved his right back, threw his weight upon it, brought
his left behind it, and
cracked
with that as before; and
so on alternately. Just so did Bill Kemp, to a nail.
Bob Simons danced for all the world like a Suple
Jack, (or as we commonly call it, a
Suple
Sawney,)
when the string is pulled with varied force, at intervals
of seconds: and so did
Jake
Slack. Davy Moore, went
like a suit of clothes upon a clothing line on a windy
day: and here was his antitype in Ned Clarke. Rhoda
Nobles swam through the reel like a cork on wavy
waters; always giving two or three pretty little
perchbite
diddles
, as she rose from a coupeeNancy Ware
was her very self. Becky Lewis made a business of
dancing; she disposed of her part as quick as possible,
stopt dead short as soon as she got through, and looked
as sober as a Judge all the timeEven so did Chloe
Dawson. I used to tell Polly Jackson, that Becky's
countenance, when she closed a dance, always seemed
to say, now if you want any more dancing, you may
do it yourself.
The dance grew merrier as it progressed; the young
people became more easy in each other's company, and
often enlivened the scene with most humorous remarks.
Occasionally some sharp cuts passed between the boys;
such as would have produced a half dozen duels at a
city ball; but here they were taken as they were meant,
in good humor. Jim Johnson being a little tardy in
meeting his partner at a turn of the reel, I
ax
pardon
Miss Chloe, said he, Jake Slack went to make a
crosshop
just now, and 'tied his legs in a hard knot, and I
stop't to help him untie them. A little after, Jake hung
his toe in a crack of the floor, and nearly fell; Ding
my buttons, said he, if I did'nt know I should
stumble
over Jim Johnson's foot at last; Jim, draw your foot
up to your own end of the reel. (Jim was at the other
end of the reel, and had in truth a prodigious foot.)
Towards the middle of the day, many of the
neighboring
farmers dropped in, and joined the Squire and
myself in talking of old times. At length dinner was
announced. It consisted of plain
fare
, but there was a
profusion of it. Rough planks, supported by stakes
driven in the ground, served for a table; at which the
old and young of both sexes seated themselves at the
same time. I soon recognized Mrs. Gibson from all the
matrons present. Thirty years had wrought great changes
in her appearance; but they had left some of her
features
entirely unimpaired. Her eye beamed with all its
youthful fire; and to my astonishment, her mouth was
still beautified with a full set of teeth, unblemished by
time. The rose on her cheek had rather freshened than
faded, and her smile was the very same that first subdued
my heart; but her fine form was wholly lost; and with
it, all the grace of her movements. Pleasing, but
melancholy
reflections occupied my mind, as I gazed on her,
dispensing her cheerful hospitalities. I thought of the
sad history of many of her companions and mine, who
used to carry light hearts through the merry dance. I
compared my after life with the cloudless days of my
attachment to Polly. Then, I was light hearted, gay,
contented and happy. I aspired to nothing but a good
name, a good wife, and an easy competency. The first
and last were mine already; and Polly had given me too
many little tokens of her favor, to leave a doubt now,
that the second was at my command. But I was
foolishly
told, that my talents were of too high an order to be
employed in the drudgeries of a farm, and I more
foolishly
believed it. I forsook the pleasures which I had
tried and proved, and went in pursuit of those imaginary
joys, which seemed to encircle the seat of Fame. From
that moment to the present, my life had been little else
than one unbroken scene of disaster, disappointment,
vexation and toil. And now, when I was too old to enjoy
the pleasures which I had discarded, I found that my aim
was absolutely hopeless; and that my pursuits had only
served to unfit me for the humbler walks of life, and to
exclude me from the higher. The gloom of these
reflections
was, however, lighted in a measure, by the
promises of the coming hour, when I was to live over
again with Mrs. Gibson, some of the happiest moments
of my life.
After a hasty repast, the young people returned to
their amusement; followed by myself, with several of
the elders of the company. An hour had scarcely elapsed,
before Mrs. Gibson entered, accompanied by a goodly
number of matrons of her own age. This accession to
the company produced its usual effects. It raised the
tone of conversation a full octave, and gave it a tripple
time movement; added new life to the wit and limbs of
the young folks, and set the old men to cracking jokes.
At length the time arrived for me to surprise and
delight
Mrs. Gibson. The young people insisted upon the
old folks taking a reel; and this was just what I had been
waiting for; for after many plans for making the
discovery
,
I had finally concluded upon that, which I thought
would make
her
joy, general among the company: and
that was, to announce myself, just before leading her to
the dance, in a voice audible to most of the assembly.
I therefore readily assented to the proposition of the
young folks, as did two others of my age, and we made
to the ladies for our partners. I of course offered my
hand to Mrs. Gibson.
Come, said I, Mrs. Gibson, let us try if we can't
out dance these young people.
Dear me, Sir, said she, I haven't danced a step
these twenty years.
Neither have I, but I've resolved to try once more,
if you will join me, just for old time's sake.
I really cannot think of dancing, said she.
Well, continued I, (raising my voice to a pretty
high pitch, on purpose to be heard, while my countenance
kindled with exultation at the astonishment and delight
which I was about to produce,) you surely will dance
with an old friend and sweet-heart, who used to dance
with you when a girl.
At this disclosure, her features assumed a vast variety
of expressions; but none of them responded precisely to
my expectation: indeed, some of them were of such
an equivocal and alarming character, that I deemed it
advisable not to prolong her suspense. I therefore
proceeded
.
Have you forgot your old sweet-heart, Abram
Baldwin
?
What! said she, looking more astonished
b
and confused than ever. Abram Baldwin! Abram
Baldwin! I don't think I ever heard the name before.
Do you remember Jim Johnson? said I.
Oh yes, said she, mighty well; her countenance
brightening with a smile.
And Bill Martin?
Yes, perfectly wellwhy,
who
are you?
Here we were interrupted by one of the gentlemen
who had led his partner to the floor, with come
stranger
,
we're getting mighty tired o' standing. It won't
do for old people that's going to dance, to take up much
time in standing; they'll lose all their
spryness
. Don't
stand begging Polly Gibson, she never dances; but take
my Sal there next to her, she'll run a reel with you, to
old Nick's house and back
agin
. No alternative was
left me, and therefore I offered my hand to Mrs. Sally
I didn't know who. Well, thought I, as I moved to
my place, the Squire is pretty secure from jealousy;
but Polly will soon remember me when she sees my steps
in the reel. I will dance precisely as I used to in my
youth, if it tire me to death. There was one step that
was almost exclusively my own, for few of the dancers
of my day could perform it at all, and none with the
grace and ease that I did. She'll remember Abram
Baldwin, thought I, as soon as she sees the
double
cros-shop
. It was performed by rising and crossing the
legs twice or thrice before lighting, and I used to carry
it to the third cross with considerable ease. It was a
step solely adapted to setting or ballancing, as all will
perceive; but I thought the occasion would justify a
little perversion of it, and therefore resolved to lead off
with it, that Polly might be at once relieved from suspense.
Just however as I reached my place, Mrs. Gibson's
youngest son, a boy about eight years old, ran in and
cried out, Mammy, old Boler's jumpt upon the planks
and dragg'd off a great hunk o' meat as big as your
head, and broke a dish and two plates all to durn
smashes
!
Away went Mrs. Gibson, and at the same instant,
off went the music. Still I hoped that matters would be
adjusted in time for Polly to return and see the double
cross hop; and I felt the mortification which my
delay in getting a partner had occasioned, somewhat
solaced by the reflection, that it had thrown me at the
foot of the reel.
The first and second couples had nearly completed
their performances, and Polly had not returned. I began
to grow uneasy and to interpose as many delays as I
could, without attracting notice.
The six reel is closed by the foot couple balancing at
the head of the setthen in the middlethen at the foot
again in the middlemeeting at the head, and leading
down.
My partner and I had commenced balancing at the
headand Polly had not returned. I balanced until my
partner forced me on. I now deemed it advisable to give
myself up wholly to the double cross hop; so that if
Polly should return in time to see any step, it should be
this; though I was already nearly exhausted.
Accordingly
I made the attempt to introduce it in the turns of the
reel; but the first experiment convinced me of three
things at once1st. That I could not have used the step
in this way in my best days2d. That my strength
would not more than support it in its proper place for the
remainder of the reel, and3d. If I tried it again in
this way, I should knock my brains out against the
puncheons
;
for my partner who seemed determined to confirm
her husband's report of her, evinced no disposition to
wait upon experiments; but fetching me a jirk while I
was up, and my legs crossed, had well nigh sent me head
foremost to Old Nick's house, sure enough.
We met in the middle, my back to the door, and from
the silence that prevailed in the yard, I flattered myself
that Polly might be even now catching the first glimpse
of the favorite step, when I heard her voice at some
distance from the houseGet you gone! G-e-e-e-t
you gone! G-e-e-e-e-e-t you gone! Matters out
doors were now clearly explained. There had been
a struggle to get the meat from BolerBoler had
triumphed
,
and retreated to the woods with his booty, and
Mrs. Gibson was heaping indignities upon him in the
last resort.
The three
Get-you-gones
met me precisely at the
three closing balances; and the last, brought my moral
energies to a perfect level with my physical.
Mrs. Gibson returned, however, in a few minutes after,
in a good humor; for she possessed a lovely disposition,
which even marriage could not spoil. As soon as I
could collect breath enough for regular conversation
(for to speak in my native dialect, I was
mortal
tired
) I took a seat by her, resolved not to quit the
house without making myself known to her, if possible.
How much said I, your Polly looks, and dances
like you used to, at her age.
I've told my old man so a hundred times said she.
Why, who upon earth are you!
Did you ever see two persons dance more alike than
Jim Johnson and Sammy Tant? NeverWhy who
can you be!
You remember Becky Lewis? Yes!
Well, look at Chloe Dawson, and you'll see her over
again.
Well, law me! Now I know I must have seen
you somewhere; but to save my life I can't tell where
Where did your father live?
He died when I was small.
And where did you use to see me?
At your father's, and old Mr. Dawson's, and at Mrs.
Barnes', and at Squire Nobles', and many other places.
Well goodness me! its mighty strange I can't call
you to mind.
I now began to get petulent, and thought it best to
leave her.
The dance wound up with the old merry jig; and
the company dispersed.
The next day I set out for my residence. I had been
at home rather more than two months, when I received
the following letter from Squire Gibson.
Dear Sir
:I send you the money collected on the
notes you left with me. Since you left here, Polly has
been thinking about old times, and she says, to save her
life she can't recollect you.
BALDWIN.
THE HORSE SWAP.
During the session of the Superior Court, in the village
of , about three weeks ago, when a number of
people were collected in the principal street of the
village
,
I observed a young man riding up and down the
street, as I supposed, in a violent passion. He galloped
this way, then that, and then the other. Spurred his
b2
horse to one group of citizens, then to another. Then
dashed off at half speed, as if fleeing from danger;
and suddenly checking his horse, returnedfirst in a
pace, then in a trot, and then in a canter. While he
was performing these various evolutions, he cursed, swore,
whooped, screamed, and tossed himself in every attitude
which man could assume on horse back. In short, he
cavorted
most magnanimously, (a term which, in our
tongue, expresses all that I have described, and a little
more) and seemed to be setting all creation at defiance.
As I like to see all that is passing, I determined to take a
position a little nearer to him, and to ascertain if possible,
what it was that affected him so sensibly. Accordingly
I approached a crowd before which he had stopt for a
moment, and examined it with the strictest scrutiny.
But I could see nothing in it, that seemed to have any
thing to do with the cavorter. Every man appeared to
be in a good humor, and all minding their own business.
Not one so much as noticed the principal figure. Still
he went on. After a semicolon pause, which my
appearance
seemed to produce, (for he eyed me closely as
I approached) he fetched a whoop, and swore that he
could out-swap any live man, woman or child, that ever
walked these hills, or that ever straddled horse flesh since
the days of old daddy Adam. Stranger, said he to
me, did you ever see the
Yallow
Blossom from Jasper?
No, said I, but I have often heard of him.
I'm the boy, continued he; perhaps a
leetle
jist a
leetle
of the best man, at a horse swap, that ever trod
shoe-leather.
I began to feel my situation a little awkward, when I
was relieved by a man somewhat advanced in years,
who stept up and began to survey the
Yallow
Blossom's
horse with much apparent interest. This drew
the rider's attention, and he turned the conversation from
me to the stranger.
Well, my old coon, said he, do you want to swap
hosses?
Why, I don't know, replied the stranger; I
believe
I've got a beast I'd trade with you for that one, if
you like him.
Well, fetch up your nag, my old cock; you're jist
the lark I wanted to get hold of. I am perhaps a
leetle
,
jist a
leetle
, of the best man at a horse swap, that ever
stole
cracklins
out of his mammy's fat gourd. Where's
your
hoss?
I'll bring him presently; but I want to examine your
horse a little.
Oh! look at him, said the Blossom, alighting and
hitting him a cutlook at him. He's the best piece of
hoss
flesh in the thirteen united universal worlds. There's
no sort o' mistake in little Bullet. He can pick up
miles on his feet and fling 'em behind him as fast as the
next man's
hoss
, I don't care where he comes from.
And he can keep at it as long as the Sun can shine
without resting.
During this harangue, little Bullet looked as if he
understood
it all, believed it, and was ready at any moment
to verify it. He was a horse of goodly countenance,
rather expressive of vigilance than fire; though an
unnatural
appearance of fierceness was thrown into it, by
the loss of his ears, which had been cropt pretty close to
his head. Nature had done but little for Bullet's head
and neck; but he managed, in a great measure, to hide
their defects, by bowing perpetually. He had obviously
suffered severely for corn; but if his ribs and hip bones
had not disclosed the fact,
he
never would have done it;
for he was in all respects, as cheerful and happy, as if
he commanded all the corn-cribs and fodder stacks in
Georgia. His height was about twelve hands; but as
his shape partook somewhat of that of the Giraffe, his
haunches stood much lower. They were short, strait,
peaked and concave Bullet's tail, however, made
amends for all his defects. All that the artist could do
to beautify it, had been done; and all that horse could
do to compliment the artist, Bullet did. His tail was
nicked in superior style, and exhibited the line of beauty
in so many directions, that it could not fail to hit the most
fastidious taste in some of them. From the root it dropt
into a graceful festoon; then rose in a handsome curve;
then resumed its first direction; and then mounted
suddenly
upwards like a cypress knee to a perpendicular
of about two and a half inches. The whole had a
careless
and bewitching inclination to the right. Bullet
obviously
knew where his beauty lay, and took all
occasions
to display it to the best advantage. If a stick
cracked, or if any one moved suddenly about him, or
coughed, or hawked, or spoke a little louder than
common
,
up went Bullet's tail like lightning; and if the
going up
did not please, the
coming down
must of
necessity
,
for it was as different from the other movement, as
was its direction. The first, was a bold and rapid flight
upward; usually to an angle of forty-five degrees. In
this position he kept his interesting appendage, until he
satisfied himself that nothing in particular was to be
done; when he commenced dropping it by half inches,
in second beatsthen in tripple timethen faster and
shorter, and faster and shorter still; until it finally died
away imperceptibly into its natural position. If I might
compare sights to sounds, I should say, its
settling
, was
more like the note of a locust than any thing else in
nature.
Either from native sprightliness of disposition, from
uncontrolable activity, or from an unconquerable habit
of removing flies by the stamping of the feet, Bullet
never stood still; but always kept up a gentle
fly-scaring
movement of his limbs, which was peculiarly
interesting
.
I tell you, man, proceeded the Yellow Blossom,
he's the best live hoss that ever trod the grit of
Georgia
.
Bob Smart knows the hoss. Come here, Bob,
and mount this hoss and show Bullet's motions. Here,
Bullet bristled up, and looked as if he had been hunting
for Bob all day long, and had just found him. Bob
sprang on his back. Boo-oo-oo,! said Bob, with a
fluttering noise of the lips; and away went Bullet, as
if in a quarter race, with all his beauties spread in
handsome
style.
Now fetch him back, said Blossom. Bullet turned
and came in pretty much as he went out.
Now trot him by. Bullet reduced his tail to
customary
sidled
to the right and left airily, and
exhibited
at least three varieties of trot, in the short space of
fifty yards.
Make him pace! Bob commenced twitching the
bridle and kicking at the same time. These inconsistent
movements obviously (and most naturally) disconcerted
Bullet; for it was impossible for him to learn, from them,
whether he was to proceed or stand still. He started to
trotand was told that wouldn't do. He attempted a
canterand was checked again. He stoptand was
urged to go on. Bullet now rushed into the wide field of
experiment, and struck out a gait of his own, that
completely
turned the tables upon his rider, and certainly
deserved a patent. It seemed to have derived its
elements
from the jig, the minuet and the cotillon. If it
was not a pace, it certainly had
pace
in it; and no man
would venture to call it any thing else; so it passed off
to the satisfaction of the owner.
Walk him! Bullet was now at home again; and
he walked as if money was staked on him.
The stranger, whose name I afterwards learned was
Peter Ketch, having examined Bullet to his heart's
content
,
ordered his son Neddy to go and bring up Kit.
Neddy soon appeared upon Kit; a well formed sorrel of
the middle size, and in good order. His
tout ensemble
threw Bullet entirely in the shade; though a glance was
sufficient to satisfy any one, that Bullet had the decided
advantage of him in point of intellect.
Why man, said Blossom, do you bring such a
hoss as that to trade for Bullet? Oh, I see you're no
notion of trading.
Ride him off, Neddy! said Peter. Kit put off at
a handsome lope.
Trot him back! Kit came in at a long, sweeping
trot, and stopt suddenly at the crowd.
Well, said Blossom, let me look at him; may be
he'll do to plough.
Examine him! said Peter, taking hold of the
bridle
close to the mouth; He's nothing but a tacky.
He an't as
pretty
a horse as Bullet, I know; but he'll do.
Start 'em together for a hundred and fifty
mile;
and if
Kit an't twenty mile ahead of him at the coming out,
any man may take Kit for nothing. But he's a monstrous
mean horse, gentlemen; any man may see that. He's
the scariest horse, too, you ever saw. He won't do to
hunt on, no how. Stranger, will you let Neddy have
your rifle to shoot off him? Lay the rifle between his
ears, Neddy, and shoot at the blaze in that stump. Tell
me when his head is high enough.
Ned fired, and hit the blaze; and Kit did not move a
hair's breadth.
Neddy, take a couple of sticks and beat on that
hogshead at Kit's tail.
Ned made a tremendous rattling; at which
Bullet
took fright, broke his bridle and dashed off in grand
style; and would have stopt all farther negotiations, by
going home in disgust, had not a traveller arrested him
and brought him back; but Kit did not move.
I tell you, gentlemen, continued Peter, he's the
scariest horse you ever saw. He an't as gentle as
Bullet
;
but he won't do any harm if you watch him. Shall
I put him in a cart, gig, or wagon for you, stranger?
He'll cut the same capers there he does here. He's a
monstrous mean horse.
During all this time, Blossom was examining him
with the nicest scrutiny. Having examined his frame
and limbs, he now looked at his eyes.
He's got a curious look out of his eyes, said
Blossom
.
Oh yes, sir, said Peter, just as blind as a bat.
Blind horses always have clear eyes. Make a motion
at his eyes, if you please, sir.
Blossom did so, and Kit threw up his head rather as
if something pricked him under the chin, than as if
fearing
a blow. Blossom repeated the experiment, and Kit
jirked back in considerable astonishment.
Stone blind, you see, gentlemen, proceeded Peter;
but he's just as good to travel of a dark night as if he
had eyes.
Blame my buttons, said Blossom, if I like them
eyes.
No, said Peter, nor I neither. I'd rather have
'em made of diamonds; but they'll do, if they don't
show as much white as Bullet's.
Well, said Blossom, make a pass at me.
No, said Peter; you made the banter; now
make your pass.
Well I'm never afraid to price my hosses. You
must give me twenty-five dollars boot.
Oh certainly; say fifty, and my saddle and bridle
in. Here, Neddy, my son, take away daddy's horse.
Well, said Blossom, I've made my pass; now
you make yours.
I'm for short talk in a horse swap; and therefore
always tell a gentleman, at once, what I mean to do.
You must give me ten dollars.
Blossom swore absolutely, roundly and profanely, that
he never would give boot.
Well, said Peter, I didn't care about trading;
but you cut such high shines, that I thought I'd like to
back you out; and I've done it. Gentlemen, you see
I've brought him to a hack.
Come, old man, said Blossom, I've been joking
with you. I begin to think you do want to trade;
therefore
,
give me five dollars and take Bullet. I'd rather
lose ten dollars, any time, than not make a trade; though
I hate to fling away a good hoss.
Well, said Peter, I'll be as clever as you are.
Just put the five dollars on Bullet's back and hand him
over, it's a trade.
Blossom swore again, as roundly as before, that he
would not give boot; and, said he, Bullet wouldn't
hold five dollars on his back, no how. But as I
bantered
you, if you say an even swap, here's at you.
I told you, said Peter, I'd be as clever as you;
therefore, here goes two dollars more, just for trade sake.
Give me three dollars, and it's a bargain.
Blossom repeated his former assertion; and here the
parties stood for a long time, and the by-standers (for
many were now collected,) began to taunt both parties.
After some time, however, it was pretty unanimously
decided that the old man had backed Blossom out.
At length Blossom swore he never would be
backed
out, for three dollars, after bantering a man; and
accordingly they closed the trade.
Now, said Blossom, as he handed Peter the three
dollars, I'm a man, that when he makes a bad trade,
makes the most of it until he can make a better. I'm
for no rues and after-claps.
That's just my way, said Peter; I never goes to
law to mend my bargains.
Ah, you're the kind of boy I love to trade with.
Here's your hoss, old man. Take the saddle and bridle
off him, and I'll strip yours; but lift up the blanket easy
from Bullet's back, for he's a mighty tenderbacked hoss.
The old man removed the saddle, but the blanket
stuck fast. He attempted to raise it, and Bullet bowed
himself, switched his tail, danced a little, and gave signs
of biting.
Don't hurt him, old man, said Blossom archly;
take it off easy. I am, perhaps, a leetle of the best
man at a horse-swap that ever catched a coon.
Peter continued to pull at the blanket more and more
roughly; and Bullet became more and more
cavortish:
in so much, that when the blanket came off, he had
reached
the
kicking
point in good earnest.
The removal of the blanket, disclosed a sore on
Bullet's
back-bone, that seemed to have defied all medical
skill. It measured six full inches in length, and four in
breadth; and had as many features as Bullet had motions.
My heart sickened at the sight; and I felt that the brute
who had been riding him in that situation, deserved the
halter.
The prevailing feeling, however, was that of mirth.
The laugh became loud and general, at the old man's
c
expense; and rustic witticisms were liberally bestowed
upon him and his late purchase. These, Blossom
continued
to provoke by various remarks. He asked the
old man, if he thought Bullet would let five dollars lie
on his back. He declared most seriously, that he had
owned that horse three months, and had never
discovered
before, that he had a sore back, or he never should
have thought of trading him, &c. &c.
The old man bore it all with the most philosophic
composure
.
He evinced no astonishment at his late
discovery
,
and made no replies. But his son, Neddy, had not
disciplined his feelings quite so well. His eyes opened,
wider and wider, from the first to the last pull of the
blanket; and when the whole sore burst upon his view,
astonishment and fright seemed to contend for the
mastery
of his countenance. As the blanket disappeared,
he stuck his hands in his breeches pockets, heaved a
deep sigh, and lapsed into a profound reverie; from
which he was only roused by the cuts at his father. He
bore them as long as he could; and when he could
contain
himself no longer, he began, with a certain wildness
of expression, which gave a peculiar interest to what he
uttered: His back's mighty bad off; but dod drot my
soul, if he's put it to daddy as bad as he thinks hehas, for
old Kit's both blind and
deef
, I'll be dod drot if he eint.
The devil he is, said Blossom. Yes, dod drot my
soul if he
eint
. You walk him and see if he
eint
. His
eyes don't look like it; but he
jist as live go agin
the
house with you, or in a ditch, as any how. Now you
go try him. The laugh was now turned on Blossom;
and many rushed to test the fidelity of the little boy's
report. A few experiments established its truth, beyond
controversy.
Neddy said the old man, you oughtn't to try and
make people discontented with their things. Stranger,
don't mind what the little boy says. If you can only
get Kit rid of them little failings, you'll find him all sorts
of a horse. You are a
leetle
the best man, at a horse
swap, that ever I got hold of; but don't fool away Kit.
Come, Neddy, my son, let's be moving; the stranger
seems to be getting snappish.
HALL.
THE CHARACTER OF A NATIVE GEORGIAN.
There are some yet living, who knew the man whose
character I am about to delineate; and these will
unanimously
bear testimony, that if it be not faithfully drawn,
it is not overdrawn. They cannot avouch for the truth
of the anecdotes which I am about to relate of him,
because of these they know nothing; but they will
unhesitatingly
declare, that there is nothing herein ascribed
to him, of which he was incapable, and of which he
would not readily have been the author, supposing the
scenes in which I have placed him to be real, and the
thoughts and actions attributed to him, to have actually
suggested themselves to him. They will further testify,
that the thoughts and actions, are in perfect harmony
with his general character.
I do not feel at liberty as yet to give the name of the
person in question, and therefore, he shall be designated
for the present, by the appellation of Ned Brace.
This man seemed to live only to amuse himself with his
fellow-beings, and he possessed the rare faculty,of deriving
some gratification of his favorite propensity, from almost
every person with whom he met, no matter what his
temper, standing or disposition. Of course he had
opportunities
enough of exercising his uncommon gift, and
he rarely suffered an opportunity to pass unimproved.
The beau in the presence of his mistress, the fop, the
pedant, the purse-proud, the over-fastidious and sensitive,
were Ned's favorite game. These never passed him
uninjured; and against such, he directed his severest
shafts. With these he commonly amused himself, by
exciting in them every variety of emotion, under
circumstances
peculiarly ridiculous. He was admirably
fitted to his vocation. He could assume any character
which his humor required him to personate, and he could
sustain it to perfection. His knowledge of the character
of others, seemed to be intuitive.
It may seem remarkable, but it is true, that though he
lived his own peculiar life for about sixteen years, after
he reached the age of manhood, he never involved
himself
in a personal recounter with any one. This was
owing in part to his muscular frame, which few would
be willing to engage; but more particularly to his
adroitness in the management of his projects of fun.
He generally conducted them in such a way, as to render
it impossible for any one to call him to account, without
violating all the rules of decency, politeness and chivalry
at once. But a few anecdotes of him, will give the
reader a much better idea of his character, than he can
possibly derive from a general description. If these
fulfil the description which I have given of my hero, all
will agree that he is no imaginary being: if they do
not, it will only be, because I am unfortunate in my
selection
.
Having known him from his earliest manhood
to his gravefor he was a native GeorgianI confess,
that I am greatly perplexed, in determining what portions
of his singular history, to lay before the reader, as a
proper specimen of the whole. A three day's visit,
which I once made with him to Savannah, placed him in
a greater variety of scenes, and among a greater
diversity
of characters, than perhaps any other period of his
life, embracing no longer time; and therefore, I will
choose this for my purpose.
We reached Savannah just at night-fall, of a cold
December's evening. As we approached the tavern of
Mr. Blank, at which we designed to stop, Ned proposed
to me, that we should drop our acquaintance, until
he
should choose to renew it. To this proposition I most
cordially assented, for I knew, that so doing, I should
be saved some mortifications, and avoid a thousand
questions, which I would not know how to answer.
According to this understanding, Ned lingered behind,
in order that I might reach the tavern alone.
On alighting at the public house, I was led into a large
dining-room, at the entrance of which, to the right, stood
the bar, opening into the dining-room. On the left, and
rather nearer to the centre of the room, was a fire-place,
surrounded by gentlemen. Upon entering the room,
my name was demanded at the bar: it was given, and
I took my seat in the circle around the fire. I had been
seated just long enough for the company to survey me
to their satisfaction, and resume their conversation, when
Ned's heavy footstep at the door, turned the eyes of the
company to the approaching stranger.
Your name sir, if you please? said the restless little
bar-keeper, as he entered.
Ned stared at the question with apparent alarm
cast a fearful glance at the companyfrowned and
shook his head in token of caution to the bar-keeper
looked confused for a momentthen, as if suddenly
recollecting
himself, jirked a piece of paper out of his
c2
pocketturned from the companywrote on it with his
pencilhanded it to the bar-keeperwalked to the left
of the fire-place, and took the most conspicuous seat in
the circle. He looked at no one, spoke to no one; but
fixing his eyes on the fire, lapsed into a profound reverie.
The conversation, which had been pretty general
before, stopped as short, as if every man in the room
had been shot dead. Every eye was fixed on Ned, and
every variety of expression was to be seen on the
countenances
of the persons present. The landlord came in
the bar-keeper whispered to him and looked at Ned.
The landlord looked at him too with astonishment and
alarmthe bar-keeper produced a piece of paper, and
both of them examined it, as if searching for a fig-mite with
the naked eye. They rose from the examination
unsatisfied
,
and looked at Ned again. Those of the company who
recovered first from their astonishment, tried to revive the
conversation; but the effort was awkward, met with no
support, and failed. The bar-keeper, for the first time
in his life, became dignified and solemn, and left the bar
to take care of itself. The landlord had a world of
foolish questions to ask the gentlemen directly opposite
to Ned, for which purpose he passed round to them
every two minutes, and the answer to none did he hear.
Three or four boarders coming in, who were
unapprized
of what had happened, at length revived the
conversation
;
not however, until they had created some
confusion
,
by enquiring of their friends, the cause of their
sober looks. As soon as the conversation began to
become
easy and natural, Ned rose, and walked out into
the entry. With the first movement, all were as hush as
death; but when he had cleared the door, another Babel
scene ensued. Some enquired, others suspected, and all
wondered. Some were engaged in telling the strangers
what had happened, others were making towards the
bar, and all were becoming clamorous, when Ned
returned
and took his seat. His re-entry was as fatal to
conversation, as was the first movement of his exit; but
it soon recovered from the shockwith the difference,
however, that those who
led
before, were now mute,
and wholly absorbed in the contemplation of Ned's
person.
After retaining his seat for about ten minutes, Ned
rose again, enquired the way to the stable, and left the
house. As soon as he passed the outer door, the
bar-keeper
hastened to the company with Ned's paper in his
hand. Gentlemen, said he, can any of you tell me
what name this is? All rushed to the paper in an
instantone or two pair of heads met over it with
considerable
force. After pondering over it to their heart's
content, they all agreed that the first letter was an E
and the second a B or an R, and the dl himself
could not make out the balance. While they were thus
engaged, to the astonishment of every body, Ned
interrupted
their deliberations with gentlemen, if you have
satisfied yourselves with that paper, I'll thank you for
it. It is easy to imagine, but impossible to describe the
looks and actions of the company, under their surprise
and mortification. They dropt off and left the bar-keeper
to his appropriate duty, of handing the paper to Ned.
He reached it forth, but Ned moved not a hand to
receive
it, for about the space of three seconds; during
which time he kept his eyes fixed upon the arch-offender
in awfully solemn rebuke. He then took it gravely and
put it in his pocket, and left the bar-keeper, with a
shaking
ague upon him. From this moment he became Ned's
most obsequious and willing slave.
Supper was announced; Mrs. Blank, the landlady,
took the head of the table, and Ned seated himself next
to her. Her looks denoted some alarm at finding him
so near to her; and plainly showed, that he had been
fully described to her by her husband, or some one else.
Will you take tea or coffee, sir? said she.
Why madam, said Ned, in a tone as courteous as
Chesterfield himself could have used, I am really
ashamed to acknowledge and to expose my very singular
appetite; but habitual indulgence of it, has made it
necessary
to my comfort, if not to my health, that I should
still favor it when I can. If you will pardon me, I will
take both at the same time.
This respectful reply, (which, by the way, she alone
was permitted to hear,) had its natural effect. It won
for him her unqualified indulgence, raised doubts whether
he could be the suspicious character which had been
described to her, and begat in her a desire to cultivate
a further acquaintance with him. She handed to him
the two cups, and accompanied them with some remarks
drawn from her own observation in the line of her
business
,
calculated to reconcile him to his whimsical
appetite
;
but she could extract from Ned nothing but
monosyllables
,
and sometimes not even that much.
Consequently
,
the good lady began very soon to relapse into
her former feelings.
Ned placed a cup on either side of him, and commenced
stirring both at the same time very deliberately. This
done, he sipped a little tea, and asked Mrs. B. for a drop
more milk in it. Then he tasted his coffee, and desired
a little more sugar in it. Then he tasted his tea again
and requested a small lump more sugar in itLastly he
tasted his coffee, and desired a few drops more milk in
that. It was easy to discover, that before he got suited,
the landlady had solemnly resolved, never to offer any
more encouragements to such an appetite. She waxed
exceedingly petulent, and having nothing else to scold,
she scolded the servants of course.
Waffles were handed to Ned, and he took one:
batter-cakes
were handed, and he took one; and so on of muffins,
rolls, and corn bread. Having laid in these provisions,
he turned into his plate, upon his waffle and batter-cake,
some of the crums of the several kinds of bread which he
had taken, in different proportions, and commenced
mashing all together with his knife. During this
operation
the landlady frowned and pouted,the servants
giggled,and the boarders were variously affected.
Having reduced his mess to the consistency of a hard
poultice, he packed it all up to one side of his plate in
the form of a terrapin, and smoothed it all over nicely
with his knife. Nearly opposite to Ned, but a little below
him, sat a waspish little gentleman, who had been
watching
him with increasing torments, from the first to the
last movement of Ned's knife. His tortures were visible
to blinder eyes than Ned's, and doubtless had been seen
by him in their earliest paroxysms. This gentleman
occupied a seat nearest to a dish of steak, and was in the
act of muttering something about `brutes' to his next
neighbor, when Ned beckoned a servant to him, and
requested
him to ask that gentleman for a small bit of
steak. The servant obeyed, and planting Ned's plate
directly between the gentleman's and the steak-dish,
delivered
his message. The testy gentleman turned his
head, and the first thing he saw was Ned's
party-coloured
terrapin, right under his nose. He started as if he
had been struck by a snapping-turtlereddened to
scarlet
looked
at Ned, (who appeared as innocent as a
lamb)looked at the servant, (who appeared as
innocent
as Ned) and then fell to work on the steak, as if he
were amputating all Ned's limbs at once.
Ned now commenced his repast. He ate his meat
and
breads
in the usual way; but he drank his liquids
in all ways. First a sip of tea, then of coffee; then
two of the first and one of the last; then three of the
last, and one of the first, and so on.
His steak was soon consumed, and his plate was a
second time returned to the mettlesome gentleman for
another
very
small bit of steak. The plate paid its
second visit, precisely as it had its first; and as soon as
the fiery gentleman saw the half-demolished terrapin
again under his nose, he seized a fork, drove it into the
largest slice of steak in the dish, dashed it into Ned's
plate, rose from the table, and left the room; cursing
Ned from the very inmost chamber of his soul. Every
person at the table, except Ned, laughed outright at the
little man's fury; but Ned did not even smilenay, he
looked for all the world, as if he thought the laugh was
at him.
The boarders, one after another, retired, until Ned
and the landlady were left alone at the table.
Will you have another cup of tea and coffee sir?
said she, by the way of convincing him that he ought to
retire, seeing that he had finished his supper.
No I thank you madam, returned Ned.
Will you have a glass of milk and a cup of tea or
coffee; or all three together?
No ma'am, said Ned. I am not blind madam,
continued he, to the effects which my unfortunate
eccentricities
have produced upon yourself and your
company
;
nor have I witnessed them without those feelings
which they are well calculated to inspire in a man of
ordinary sensibilities. I am aware, too, that I am
prolonging
and aggravating your uneasiness, by detaining
you beyond the hour which demands your presence at
the table; but I could not permit you to retire, without
again bespeaking your indulgence of the strange,
unnatural
appetite, which has just caused you so much
astonishment
and mortification. The story of its beginning
might be interesting, and certainly would be instructing
to you if you are a mother: but I am indisposed at this
time to obtrude it upon your patience, and I presume you
are still less disposed to hear it. My principal object,
however, in claiming your attention for a moment at this
time, is to assure you, that out of respect to your feelings,
I will surrender the enjoyment of my meals for the few
days that I have to remain in Savannah, and conform to
the customs of your table. The sudden change of my
habits will expose me to some inconvenience, and may
perhaps effect my health; but I willingly incur these
hazards, rather than to renew your mortification, or to
impose upon your family the trouble of giving me my
meals at my room.
The good lady, whose bitter feelings had given place
to the kinder emotion of pity and benevolence, before
Ned had half concluded his apology, (for it was delivered
in a tone of the most melting eloquence,) caught at this
last hint, and insisted upon sending his meals to his room.
Ned reluctantly consented, after extorting a pledge from
her, that
she
would assume the responsibilities of the
trouble that he was about to give the family.
As to your
boarders
, madam, said Ned, in
conclusion
,
I have no apology to make to them. I grant
them the privilege of eating what they please, and as
they please; and so far as they are concerned I shall
exercise the same privileges, reckless of their feelings or
opinions; and I shall take it as a singuular favor if you
will say nothing to them or to any one else, which may
lead them to the discovery, that I am acquainted with
my own peculiarities.
The good lady promised obedience to his wishes, and
Ned, requesting to be conducted to the room, retired.
A group of gentlemen at the fire-place had sent many
significant hems and smiles to Mrs. Blank, during her
tete a tete
with Ned; and as she approached them, on
her way out of the room, they began to taunt her
playfully
,
upon the impression which she seemed to have
made upon the remarkable stranger.
Really, said one, I thought the
impression
was
on the other side.
And in truth, so it was, said Mrs. B. At this
moment
her husband stept in.
I'll tell you what it is, Mr. Blank, said one of the
company, you'd better keep a sharp look out on that
stranger; our landlady is wonderfully taken with him.
I'll be bound, said Mr. B. for my wife; the less
like any body else in the world he is, the better will she
like him.
Well I assure you, said Mrs. B. I never had my
feelings so deeply interested in a stranger in my life.
I'd give the world to know his history.
Why, then, rejoined the landlord; I suppose he
has been quizzing us all this time.
No, said she, he is incapable of quizzing. All
that you have seen of him is unaffected, and perfectly
natural to him.
Then, really, continued the husband, he is a very
interesting object, and I congratulate you upon getting
so early into his confidence; but as I am not quite as
much captivated with his unaffected graces as you
seem to be, I shall take the liberty, in charity to the
rest of my boarders, of requesting him to-morrow, to
seek other lodgings.
Oh, exclaimed Mrs. B. in the goodness of her heart,
and with a countenance evincive of the deepest feeling,
I would not have you do such a thing for the world.
He's only going to stay a few days.
How do you know?
He told me so, and do let's bear with him that short
time. He sha'nt trouble you or the boarders any more.
Why Sarah, said the landlord, I do believe you
are out of your senses!
Gone case! said one boarder. Terrible affair!
said another. Bewitching
little
fellow, said a third.
Come, Mrs. Blank, tell us all he said to you? We
young men wish to know how to please the ladies, so
that we may get wives easily. I'm determined the next
party I go to, to make a soup of every thing on the
waiters
,
and eat all at once. I shall then become irresistible
to the ladies.
Get along with your nonsense, said Mrs. B. smiling
as she left the room.
At 8 o'clock, I retired to my room, which happened
(probably from the circumstance of our reaching the
hotel within a few minutes of each other,) to be
adjoining
Ned's. I had no sooner entered my room, than Ned
followed me, where we interchanged the particulars
which make up the foregoing story. He now expended
freely the laughter which he had been collecting during
the evening. He stated that his last interview with Mrs.
Blank, was the result of necessityThat he found he
had committed himself in making up and disposing of
his odd supper; for that he should have to eat in the same
way, during his whole stay in Savannah, unless he could
manage to get his meals in private; and though he was
willing to do penance for one meal, in order to purchase
the amusement which he had enjoyed, he had no idea of
tormenting himself three or four days for the same
purpose
.
To tell you the honest truth, said he, nothing but
an appetite whetted by fasting and travelling, could have
borne me through the table scene. As it was, my
stomach several times threatened to expose my tricks to
the whole company, by downright open rebellion. I
feel that I must make it some atonement for the liberty I
d
have taken with it; and therefore, propose that we go
out and get an oyster supper before we retire to rest. I
assented: we set out, going separately, until we reached
the street.
We were received by the oyster-vender, in a small
shop, which fronted upon the street, and were conducted
through it to a back door, and thence, by a flight of steps,
to a convenient room, on a second floor of an adjoining
building. We had been seated about three minutes,
when we heard footsteps on the stairs, and distinctly
caught this sentence from the ascending stranger:
Aha, Monsieur Middletong! you say you hab de bes
oystar in de cittee? Well, me shall soon see.
The sentence was hardly uttered, before the door
opened, and in stept a gay, smerky little Frenchman.
He made us a low bow, and as soon as he rose from his
obeisance, Ned rushed to him in transports of joy
seized him by the hand, and shaking it with friendship's
warmest grasp, exclaimed, How do you do my old
friendI had no idea of meeting you herehow do you
do Mr. Squeezelfanter? how have you been this long
time?
Sair, said the Frenchman, me tank you ver' much
to lub me so hard; but you mistake de gentlemanmy
name is not de Squeezilfaunter.
Come, come John, continued Ned, quit your old
tricks before strangers. Mr. Hall, let me introduce you
to my particular friend, John Squeezelfanter, from Paris.
Perhaps, sir, said Inot knowing well what to say,
or how to act in such an emergencyperhaps you
have mistaken the gentleman.
Begar, sair, said Monsieur, he is mistake ebery
ting at once. My name is not
Zhaun
, me play no
treek
,
me is not de gentilmong fren', me did not come from
Paree
, but from Bordeauxand me did not suppose
dare was one man in all France, dat was name de
Squeezilfaunter.
If I am mistaken, said Ned, I humbly ask your
pardon; but really, you look so much like my old friend
Jack
, and talk so much like him, that I would have
sworn you were he.
Vel sair, said Monsieur, looking at Ned as though
he might be an acquaintance after allvell sair, dis
time you tell my name rightmy name is Jacques
[1]
[1]
This name in French is pronounced very nearly like Jack, in
English.
Jacques Sancric
.
There, proceeded Ned, I knew it was impossible
I could be mistakenyour whole family settled on
Sandy
Creek
I knew your father and mother, your sister
Patsy and Dilsy, your brother Ichabod, your aunt
Bridget, your .
Oh mon Dieu, mon Dieu! exclaimed the
Frenchman
,
no longer able to contain his surprise; dat is von
'Mericane familee. Dare vas not one French familee
hab all dat name since dis vorl' vas make.
Now look at me good Jack, said Ned, and see if
you don't recollect your old friend Obadiah Snoddleburg,
who used to play with you when a boy, in Sandy
Creek.
Vel, Monsieur Snotborg, me look at you ver' well;
and begar me neber see you in de creek, nor out de
creek'Tis ver' surprise, you not know one
name
, from
one
creek
.
Oh, very well sir, very well, I forgot where I was
I understand you now perfectly. You are not the
first gentleman I have met with in Savannah, who knew
me well in the country, and forgot me in town. I ask
your pardon sir, and hope you'll excuse me.
Me is ver' will to know you
now
, sair; but begar
me will not tell you one lie, to know you
twenty-five and
tirty years ago
.
It makes no difference sir, said Ned, looking
thoughtfully and chagrined. I beg leave, however,
before we close our acquaintance; to correct one
mistake
which I made.I said you were from ParisI
believe
on reflection, I was wrongI think your sister
Dilsy told me you
were
from Bordeaux.
Foutre, de sist, Dils!Here Monsieur Middletong!
My oystar ready?
Yes sir.
Vel, if my oystar ready, you give dem to my fren'
Monsieur Snotborg; and ask him to be so good to carry
dem to my sist' Dils, and my brodder Ichbod on Sand'
Creek.So saying, he vanished like lightning.
The next morning at breakfast, I occupied Ned's seat.
Mrs. Blank had no sooner taken her place, than she
ordered a servant to bring her a watter; upon which
she placed a cup of tea, and another of coffeethen
ordering three plates, she placed them on it; sent one
servant for one kind of bread, and another for another,
and so on through all the varieties that were on the table,
from which she made selections for plate No. 1. In the
same way did she collect meats for plate No. 2No. 3
she left blank. She had nearly completed her
operations
,
when her husband came to know why every
servant
was engaged, and no gentleman helped to any
thing, when the oddly furnished waiter met his eye, and
fully explained the wonder.
In God's name, Sarah, said he, who are you
mixing up those messes for?
For that strange gentleman we were speaking of
last night, was the reply.
Why doesn't he come to the table?
He was very anxious to come, but I would not let
him.
You
would not let him! Why not?
Because I did not wish to see a man of his delicate
sensibilities ridiculed and insulted at my table.
Delicate devilabilities! Then why did'nt you
send a
servant
to collect his mixtures?
Because I preferred doing it myself, to troubling the
boarders. I knew that wherever his plates went, the
gentlemen would be making merry over them, and I
could'nt bear to see it.
The landlord looked at her for a moment, with
commingled
astonishment, doubt, and alarm; and then upon
the breath of a deep drawn sigh proceeded.
`Wen, dn
[2]
[2]
I should certainly omit such expressions as this, could I do so with
historic fidelity; but the peculiarities of the times of which I am
writing, cannot be faithfully represented without them. In recording
things
as they are
, truth requires me sometimes to put profane
language
into the mouths of my characters.
the man! He has'nt been in the house
more than two hours, except when he was asleep, and
he has insulted one half my boarders, made fools of the
other half, turned the head of my bar-keeper, crazed all
my servants, and run my wife right stark, staring, raving
mad A man who is a perfect clown in his manners,
and who, I have no doubt, will, in the end, prove to be
a horse thief.
Much occurred between the landlord and his lady in
relation to Ned, which we must of necessity omit.
Suffice
it to say, that her assiduties to Ned, her unexplained
sympathies for him, her often repeated desires to become
better acquainted with him, conspiring with one or two
short interviews which her husband saw between her
and Ned, (and which consisted of nothing more than
expressions
of regret on his part, at the trouble he was
giving the family, and assurrance on hers, that it was no
d2
trouble at all,) began to bring upon the landlord, the
husband's worst calamity. This she soon observed, and
considering her duty to her husband as of paramount
obligation, she gave him an explanation that was entirely
satisfactory. She told him that Ned was a man of
refined
feelings and high cultivated mind, but that in his
infancy his mother had forced him to eat different kinds
of diet together, until she had produced in him a vitiated
and unconquerable appetite, which he was now
constrained
to indulge, as the drunkard does his, or be miserable.
As the good man was prepared to believe any story of
woman's
folly, he was satisfied.
This being the Sabbath, at the usual hour, Ned went
to Church, and selected for his morning's service, one of
those Churches in which the pews are free, and in which
the hymn is given out, and sung by the congregation, a
half recitative.
Ned entered the Church, in as fast a walk as he could
possibly assumeproceeded about half down the aisle,
and popt himself down in his seat as quick as if he had
been shot. The more thoughtless of the congregation
began to titter, and the graver peeped up slily, but
solemnly
at him.
The Pastor rose, and before giving out the hymn,
observed
,
that
singing
was a part of the service, in which
he thought the whole congregation ought to join. Thus
saying, he gave out the first lines of the hymn. As soon
as the tune was raised, Ned struck in, with one of the
loudest, hoarsest, most discordant voices, that ever
annoyed
a solemn assembly.
I would observe, said the preacher, before giving
out the next two lines, that there are some persons who
have not the gift of singing; such of course are not
expected
to sing. Ned took the hint, and sang no more;
but his entrance into church, and his entrance into the
hymn, had already dispersed the solemnity of three fifths
of the congregation.
As soon as the Pastor commenced his sermon, Ned
opened his eyes, threw back his head, dropt his
under-jaw
,
and surrendered himself to the most intense interest.
The preacher was an indifferent one, and by as much
as he became dull and insipid, by so much did Ned
become
absorbed in the discourse. And yet it was
impossible
for the nicest observer to detect any thing in his
looks or manner, short of the most solemn devotion.
The effect which his conduct had upon the congregation,
and their subsequent remarks must be left to the
imagination
of the reader. I give but one remarkBless
that good man who came in the Church so quick, said
a venerable matron as she left the church door, how
he was affected by the
sarment
.
Ned went to church no more on that day. About
four o'clock in the afternoon, while he was standing at
the tavern, door a funeral procession passed by, at the
foot of which, and singly, walked one of the smallest
men I ever saw. As soon as he came opposite the door,
Ned stept out and joined him with great solemnity.
The contrast between the two was ludicrously striking,
and the little man's looks and uneasiness, plainly showed
that he felt it. However, he soon became reconciled to
it. They proceeded but a little way before Ned
enquired
of his companion, who was dead?
Mr. Noah Bills, said the little man.
Nan? said Ned, raising his hand to his ear in token
of deafness, and bending his head to the speaker.
Mr. Noah Bills, repeated the little man loud
enough to disturb the two couple immediately before
him.
Mrs. Noel's Bill! said Ned, with mortification and
astonishment. Do the white persons pay such respect
to niggers in Savannah?
I
sha'nt do itSo saying he
left the procession.
The little man was at first considerably nettled; but
upon being left to his own reflections, he got into an
uncontrollable
fit of laughter, as did the couple
immediately
in advance of him, who overheard Ned's remark.
The procession now exhibited a most mortifying
spectacle
The
head of it in mourning and in tears, and the
foot of it convulsed with laughter.
On Monday, Ned employed himself in disposing of
the business which brought him to Savannah, and I saw
but little of him; but I could not step into the street
without hearing of him. All talked about him, and
hardly any two agreed about his character.
On Tuesday he visited the Market, and set it all in
astonishment or laughter. He wanted to buy something
of every body, and some of every thing; but could not
agree upon the terms of a trade, because he always
wanted his articles in such portions and numbers, as no
one would sell, or upon conditions to which no one would
submit. To give a single exampleHe beset an old
negro woman to sell him the half of a living chicken.
Do my good mauma, sell it to me, said he, my
wife is very sick, and is longing for chicken pie, and
this is all the money I have, (holding out twelve and
a half cents in silver,) and its just what a half chicken
comes to at your own price.
Ki, massa! How gwine cut live chicken in two?
I don't want you to cut it in two alivekill it, clean
it, and then divide it.
Name o' God! What sort o' chance got to clean
chicken in de market-house!Whay de water for scall
um, and wash um?
Don't scald it at all; just pick it so.
Ech-ech! Fedder fly all ober de buckera-man
meat, he come bang me fo' trueNo massa, I mighty
sorry for your wife, but I no cutty chicken open.
In the afternoon, Ned entered the dining room of the
tavern, and who should he find there but Monsieur
Sancric
,
of oyster-house memory. He and the
tavern-keeper
were alone. With the first glimpse of Ned, La
diable, exclaimed the Frenchman, here my broder
Ichbod gain!and away he went.
Mr. Sancric! said the landlord, calling to him as
if to tell him something just thought of, and following
him out, What did you say that man's name is?
He name Monsieur Snotborg.
Why that can't be his name, for it begins with a B.
or an R. Where is he from?
From Sand Creek.
Where did you know him?
Begar, me neber did know him. Here Ned
sauntered
in sight of the Frenchman, and he vanished.
Well, said the landlord, as he returned, it does
seem to me, that every body who has anything to do
with that man, runs crazy forthwith.
When he entered the dining room he found Ned deeply
engaged reading a child's primer, with which he seemed
wonderfully delighted. The landlord sat for a moment,
smiled, and then hastily left the room. As soon as he
disappeared, Ned laid down his book, and took his station
behind some cloaks in the bar, which at the moment was
deserted. He had just reached his place, when the
landlord returned with his lady.
Oh, said the first, he's gone! I brought you in to
show you what kind of books your man of `refined
feelings and highly cultivated mind' delights inBut
he has left his book, and here it is, opened at the place
where he left offand do let's see what's in it?
They examined, and found that he had been reading
the interesting poem of `Little Jack Horner.'
Now, continued the landlord, if you'll believe
me, he was just as much delighted with that story, as
you or I would be with the best written number of the
Spectator.
Well, it's very strange, said Mrs. Blank
I reckon he must be
flighty
, for no man could have
made a more gentlemanly apology than he did to me,
for his peculiarities; and no one could have urged it
more feelingly.
One thing is very certain, said the husband,
if he be not flighty himself, he has a wonderful
knack of making every body else so. Sancric ran
away from him just now, as if he had seen the devil
called him by one name when he left the room, by
another at the door, told me where he came from, and
finally swore he did not know him at all.
Ned having slipt softly from the bar into the entry,
during this interview, entered the dining room, as if from
the street.
I am happy, said he, smiling, to meet you
together and alone, upon the eve of my departure from
Savannah, that I may explain to you my singular
conduct
,
and ask your forgiveness of it. I will do so if you
will not expose my true character until I shall have left
the city.
This they promised My name then,
continued
he, is Edward Brace, of Richmond county.
Humor has been my besetting sin from my youth, up.
It has sunk me far below the station to which my native
gifts entitled me. It has robbed me of the respect of all
my acquaintances; and what is much more to be
regretted
,
the esteem of some of my best and most indulgent
friends. All this I have long known, and I have a
thousand
times deplored, and as often resolved to conquer,
my self-destroying propensity. But so deeply is it
wrought into my very natureso completely and
indissolubly
interwoven is it, with every fibre and filament
of my being, that I have found it impossible for me to
subdue it. Being on my first visit to Savannah,
unknowing
and unknown, I could not forego the opportunity
which it furnished, of gratifying my ungovernable
proclivity
.
All the extravagancies which you have seen,
have been in subservience to it.
He then explained the cause of his troubling the
kind lady before him, to give him his meals at his room,
and the strange conduct of Monsieur Sancric; at which
they both laughed heartily. He referred them to me
for confirmation of what he had told them. Having gone
thus far, continued he, I must sustain my character
until to-morrow, when I shall leave Savannah.
Having now two more to enjoy his humor with him
and myself, he let himself loose that night among the
boarders, with all his strength, and never did I see two
mortals laugh, as did Mr. and Mrs. Blank.
Far as I have extended this sketch, I cannot close,
without exhibiting Ned in one new scene, in which
accident
placed him before he left Savannah.
About 2 o'clock on the morning of our departure, the
town was alarmed by the cry of fire. Ned got up
before
me, and taking one of my boots from the door, and
putting one of his in its place, he marched down to the
front door with odd boots. On coming out and finding
what had been done, I knew that Ned could not have left
the house, for it was impossible for him to wear my boot.
I was about descending the stairs, when he called to me
from the front door, and said the servant had mixed our
boots, and that he had brought down one of mine. When
I reached the front door, I found Ned and Mr. and Mrs.
Blank there; all the inmates of the house having left it,
who designed to leave it, but Ned and myself.
Don't go and leave me Hall, said he, holding my
boot in his hand, and having his own on his leg.
How can I leave you, said I, unless you'll give me
my boot? This he did not seem to hear.
Do run gentlemen, said Mrs. Blank greatly alarmed
Mr. Brace, you've got Mr. Hall's boot, give it to
him.
In a minute madam, said he, seeming to be beside
himself. A second after, however, all was explained to
me. He designed to have my company to the fire, and
his own fun before he went.
A man came posting along in great alarm, and crying
fire loudly. Mister, Mister, said Ned, jumping
out of the house.
Sir, said the man, stopping and puffing awfully.
Have you seen Mr. Peleg Q. C. Stone, along
where you've been? enquired Ned, with anxious
solicitude
.
Dn Mr. Peleg Q. C. Stone, said the stranger,
What chance have I of seeing any body, hopping up
at two o'clock in the morning, and the town a fire! and
on he went.
Thus did he amuse himself with various questions and
remarks, to four or five passengers, until even Mrs.
Blank forgot for a while, that the town was in flames.
The last object of his sport, was a woman who came
along, exclaiming, Oh, its Mr. Dalby's houseI'm
sure it is Mr. Dalby's house! Two gentlemen assured
her, that the fire was far beyond Mr. Dalby's house; but
still she went on with her exclamations. When she had
passed the door about ten steps, Ned permitted me to
cover my frozen foot with my boot, and we moved on
towards the fire. We soon overtook the woman just
mentioned, who had become somewhat pacified. As
Ned came along side of her, without seeming to notice
her, he observed Poor Dalby, I see his house is gone.
I said so, she screamed outI knew it!and
on she went, screaming ten times louder than before.
As soon as we reached the fire, a gentleman in military
dress rode up and ordered Ned into the line, to hand
buckets. Ned stept in, and the first bucket that was
handed to him, he raised it very deliberately to his mouth,
and began to drink. In a few seconds, all on Ned's
right, were overburdened with buckets, and calling loudly
for relief, while those on his left were unemployed.
Terrible
was the cursing and clamor, and twenty voices at
once ordered Ned out of the line. Ned stept out, and
along came the man on horse back, and ordered him in
again.
Captain, said Ned, I am so thirsty that I can do
nothing until I can get some water, and they will not let
me drink in the line.
Well, said the Captain, step in, and I'll see that
you get a drink.
Ned stept in again, and receiving the first bucket,
began
to raise it to his lips very slowly, when some one
halloed to him to pass on the bucket, and he brought it
down again, and handed it on.
Why did'nt you drink, said the Captain?
Why don't you see they won't let me? said Ned.
Don't mind what they saydrink, and then go on
with your work.
Ned took the next bucket, and commenced raising it
as before, when some one again ordered him to pass on
the bucket.
There, said Ned, turning to the Captain, with the
bucket half-raised, you hear that?
e
Why, blast your eyes, said the Captain, what do you
stop for? Drink on and have done with it.
Ned raised the bucket to his lips and drank, or
pretended
to drink, until a horse might have been satisfied.
Ain't you done? said the Captain, general mutiny
and complaint beginning to prevail in the line.
Why ha'nt you drank enough? said the Captain,
becoming extremely impatient.
Most, said Ned, letting out a long breath, and still
holding the bucket near his lips.
Zounds and blood! cried the Captain, clear
yourselfyou'll drink an engine full of water.
Ned left the ranks, and went to his lodgings; and
the rising sun found us on our way homeward.
HALL.
THE FIGHT.
In the younger days of the Republic, there lived in
the county of , two men, who were admitted on
all hands to be the very
best men
in the countywhich,
in the Georgia vocabulary, means they could flog any
other two men in the county. Each, through many a
hard fought battle, had acquired the mastery of his own
battalion; but they lived on opposite sides of the Court
House, and in different battalions: consequently they
were but seldom thrown together. When they met,
however
,
they were always very friendly; indeed, at their
first interview, they seemed to conceive a wonderful
attachment
to each other, which rather increased than
diminished
,
as they became better acquainted; so that, but
for the circumstance which I am about to mention, the
question which had been a thousand times asked Which
is the best man, Billy Stallions, (Stallings,) or Bob
Durham
?
would probably never have been answered.
Billy ruled the upper battalion, and Bob the lower.
The former measured six feet and an inch, in his
stockings
,
and without a single pound of cumbrous flesh about
him weighed a hundred and eighty. The latter, was an
inch shorter than his rival, and ten pounds lighter; but
he was much the most active of the two. In running
and jumping, he had but few equals in the county; and
in wrestling, not one. In other respects they were nearly
equal. Both were admirable specimens of human nature
in its finest form. Billy's victories had generally been
achieved by the tremendous power of his blows; one of
which had often proved decisive of his battles; Bob's,
by his adroitness in bringing his adversary to the ground.
This advantage he had never failed to gain, at the onset,
and when gained, he never failed to improve it to the
defeat of his adversary. These points of difference,
have involved the reader in a doubt, as to the probable
issue of a contest between them. It was not so,
however
,
with the two battalions. Neither had the least
difficulty in determining the point by the most natural
and irresistible deductions
a priori:
and though, by the
same course of reasoning, they arrived at directly
opposite
conclusions, neither felt its confidence in the least
shaken by this circumstance. The upper battalion
swore that Billy only wanted one lick at him to knock
his heart, liver and lights out of him; and if he got two
at him, he'd knock him into a cocked hat. The lower
battalion retorted, that he would'nt have time to double
his fist, before Bob would put his head where his feet
ought to be; and that, by the time he hit the ground, the
meat would fly off his face so quick, that people would
think it was shook off by the fall. These disputes
often lead to the
argumentum ad hominem;
but with
such equality of success on both sides, as to leave the
main question just where they found it. They usually
ended, however, in the common way, with a bet; and
many a quart of old Jamaica, (whiskey had not then
supplanted rum,) were staked upon the issue. Still,
greatly to the annoyance of the curious, Billy and Bob
continued to be good friends.
Now there happened to reside in the county, just
alluded
to, a little fellow, by the name of Ransy Sniffle: a
sprout of Richmond, who, in his earlier days, had fed
copiously upon red clay and blackberries. This diet had
given to Ransy a complexion that a corpse would have
disdained to own, and an abdominal rotundity that was
quite unprepossessing. Long spells of the fever and
ague, too, in Ransy's youth, had conspired with clay and
blackberries, to throw him quite out of the order of
nature
.
His shoulders were fleshless and elevated; his
head large and flat; his neck slim and translucent; and
his arms, hands, fingers and feet, were lengthened out of
all proportion to the rest of his frame. His joints were
large, and his limbs small; and as for flesh, he could
not with propriety be said to have any. Those parts
which nature usually supplies with the most of this
article
the
calves of the legs for examplepresented in him
the appearance of so many well drawn blisters. His
height was just five feet nothing; and his average weight
in blackberry season, ninety-five. I have been thus
particular in describing him, for the purpose of showing
what a great matter a little fire sometimes kindleth.
There was nothing on this earth which delighted Ransy
so much as a fight. He never seemed fairly alive,
except
when he was witnessing, fomenting, or talking about
a fight. Then, indeed, his deep sunken grey eye,
assumed
something of a living fire; and his tongue
acquired
a volubility that bordered upon eloquence. Ransy
had been kept for more than a year in the most
torturing
suspense, as to the comparative manhood of Billy
Stallings and Bob Durham. He had resorted to all his
usual expedients to bring them in collision, and had
entirely
failed. He had faithfully reported to Bob all that
had been said by the people in the upper battalion agin
him, and he was sure Billy Stallings started it. He
heard Bill say himself, to Jim Brown, that he could whip
him,
or any other man in his battalion;
and this he told
to Bobadding, Dod durn his soul, if he was a little
bigger, if he'd let any man
put upon
his battalion in
such a way. Bob replied, If he, (Stallings) thought
so, he'd better come and try it. This Ransy carried
to Billy, and delivered it with a spirit becoming his own
dignity, and the character of his battalion, and with a
coloring well calculated to give it effect. These, and
many other schemes which Ransy laid, for the
gratification
of his curiosity, entirely failed of their object.
Billy and Bob continued friends, and Ransy had began
to lapse into the most tantalizing and hopeless despair,
when a circumstance occurred, which led to a
settlement
of the long disputed question.
It is said that a hundred game cocks will live in
perfect
harmony together, if you will not put a hen with
them: and so it would have been with Billy and Bob,
had there been no women in the world. But there were
women in the world, and from them, each of our heroes
had taken to himself a wife. The good ladies were no
strangers to the prowess of their husbands, and strange
as it may seem, they presumed a little upon it.
The two battalions had met at the Court House, upon
e2
a regimental parade. The two champions were there,
and their wives had accompanied them. Neither knew
the other's lady, nor were the ladies known to each
other. The exercises of the day were just over, when
Mrs. Stallings and Mrs. Durham stept simultaneously
into the store of Zepheniah Atwater, from down east.
Have you any Turkey-red? said Mrs. S.
Have you any curtain calico? said Mrs. D. at the
same moment.
Yes, ladies, said Mr. Atwater, I have both.
Then help me first, said Mrs. D., for l'm in a
hurry.
I'm in as great a hurry as she is, said Mrs. S., and
I'll thank you to help me first.
And pray, who are you, madam! continued the
other.
Your betters, madam, was the reply.
At this moment Billy Stallings stept in. Come,
said he, Nancy, lets be going; it's getting late.
I'd o' been gone half an hour ago, she replied, if
it had'nt o' been for that impudent huzzy.
Who do you call an impudent huzzy? you nasty,
good-for-nothing, snaggle-toothed gaub of fat, you,
returned Mrs. D.
Look here woman, said Billy, have you got a
husband here? If you have, I'll
lick
him till he learns
to teach you better manners, you
sassy
heifer you.
At this moment something was seen to rush out of the
store, as if ten thousand hornets were stinging it; crying
Take carelet me godon't hold mewhere's Bob
Durham? It was Ransy Sniffle, who had been
listening
in breathless delight, to all that had passed.
Yonder's Bob, setting on the Court-house steps,
cried one. What's the matter?
Don't talk to me! said Ransy. Bob Durham,
you'd better go long yonder, and take care of your
wife. They're playing hl with her there, in Zeph.
Atwater's store. Dod deternally durn my soul, if
any man was to talk to my wife as Bill Stallions
is talking to yours, if I did'nt drive blue blazes through
him in less than no time.
Bob sprang to the store in a minute, followed by a
hundred friends; for the bully of a county never wants
friends.
Bill Stallions, said Bob, as he entered, what have
you been saying to my wife?
Is that your wife? inquired Billy, obviously much
surprised, and a little disconcerted.
Yes, she is, and no man shall abuse her, I don't care
who he is.
Well, rejoined Billy, it an't worth while to go
over itI've said enough for a fight: and if you'll step
out, we'll settle it!
Billy, said Bob, are you for a fair fight?
I am, said Billy. I've heard much of your
manhood
,
and I believe I'm a better man than you are. If
you will go into a ring with me, we can soon settle the
dispute.
Choose your friends, said Bob; make your ring,
and I'll be in it with mine, as soon as you will.
They both stept out, and began to strip very
deliberately
;
each battalion gathering round its champion
except Ransy, who kept himself busy, in a most honest
endeavor to hear and see all that transpired in both
groups, at the same time. He ran from one to the other,
in quick successionpeeped here, and listened there
talked to this onethen to that oneand then to
himself
squatted
under one's legs, and another's arms;
and in the short interval between stripping and stepping
into the ring, managed to get himself trod on by half of
both battalions. But Ransy was not the only one
interested
upon this occasion:the most intense interest
prevailed
every where. Many were the conjectures,
doubts, oaths and imprecations uttered, while the
parties
were preparing for the combat. All the
knowing
ones were consulted as to the issue; and they all
agreed to a man, in one of two opinions: either that
Bob would flog Billy, or Billy would flog Bob. We
must be permitted, however, to dwell for a moment upon
the opinion of 'Squire Thomas Loggins; a man, who it
was said, had never failed to predict the issue of a fight, in
all his life. Indeed, so unerring had he always proved,
in this regard, that it would have been counted the most
obstinate infidelity, to doubt for a moment, after he had
delivered himself. 'Squire Loggins was a man who
said but little; but that little was always delivered with
the most imposing solemnity of look and cadence. He
always wore the aspect of profound thought, and you
could not look at him without coming to the conclusion,
that he was elaborating truth from its most intricate
combinations.
Uncle Tommy, said Sam Reynolds, you can tell
us all about it, if you willhow will the fight go?
The question immediately drew an anxious group
around the 'Squire. He raised his teeth slowly from
the head of his walking cane, on which they had been
restingpressed his lips closely and thoughtfully
together
threw
down his eye browsdropped his chin
raised his eyes to an angle of twenty three degrees
paused about half a minute, and replied: Sammy,
watch Robert Durham close in the beginning of the fight
take care of William Stallions in the middle of it
and see who has the wind at the end. As he
uttered the last member of the sentence, he looked slily
at Bob's friends, and winked very significantly;
whereupon
they rushed, with one accord, to tell Bob what
uncle Tommy had said. As they retired, the 'Squire
turned to Billy's friends, and said, with a smile: Them
boys think I mean that Bob will whip.
Here the other party kindled into joy, and hastened
to inform Billy how Bob's friends had deceived
themselves
as to Uncle Tommy's opinion. In the meantime,
the principals and seconds, were busily employed in
preparing
themselves for the combat. The plan of attack
and defence, the manner of improving the various turns
of the conflict, the best mode of saving wind, &c. &c.
were all discussed and settled. At length, Billy
announced
himself ready, and his crowd were seen
moving
to the centre of the Court House Square; he and
his five seconds in the rear. At the same time, Bob's
party moved to the same point, and in the same order.
The ring was now formed, and for a moment the silence
of death reigned through both battalions. It was soon
interrupted, however, by the cry of clear the way!
from Billy's seconds; when the ring opened in the centre
of the upper battalion, (for the order of march had
arranged
the centre of the two battalions on opposite sides
of the circle,) and Billy stept into the ring from the east,
followed by his friends. He was stript to the trowsers,
and exhibited an arm, breast and shoulders, of the most
tremendous portent. His step was firm, daring and
martial; and as he bore his fine form a little in advance
of his friends, an involuntary burst of triumph broke
from his side of the ring; and at the same moment, an
uncontrollable thrill of awe, ran along the whole curve
of the lower battalion.
Look at him! was heard from his friendsjust
look at him.
Ben, how much you ask to stand before that man
two seconds?
Pshaw, don't talk about it! Just thinkin' about it 's
broke three o' my ribs a'ready!
What's Bob Durham going to do, when Billy let's
that arm loose upon him?
God bless your soul, he'll think thunder and
lightning
a mint julip to it.
Oh, look here men, go take Bill Stallions out o' that
ring, and bring in Phil Johnson's stud horse, so that
Durham
may have some chance! I don't want to see the
man killed right away.
These and many other like expressions, interspersed
thickly with oaths of the most modern coinage, were
coming from all points of the upper battalion, while Bob
was adjusting the girth of his pantaloons, which walking
had discovered, not to be exactly right. It was just
fixed to his mind, his foes becoming a little noisy, and
his friends a little uneasy at his delay, when Billy called
out, with a smile of some meaning, Where's the bully
of the lower battalion? I'm getting tired of waiting.
Here he is, said Bob, lighting, as it seemed from
the clouds in the ring, for he had actually bounded clear
of the head of Ransy Sniffle, into the circle. His
descent
was quite as imposing as Billy's entry, and excited
the same feelings, but in opposite bosoms.
Voices of exultation now rose on his side.
Where did he come from?
Why, said one of his seconds, (all having just
entered
,)
we were girting him up, about a hundred yards
out yonder, when he heard Billy ask for the bully; and
he fetched a leap over the Court House, and went out of
sight; but I told them to come on, they'd find him here.
Here the lower battalion burst into a peal of laughter,
mingled with a look of admiration, which seemed to
denote
their entire belief of what they had heard.
Boys widen the ring, so as to give him room to
jump.
Oh, my little flying wild cat, hold him if you can!
and when you get him fast, hold lightning next.
Ned what you think he's made of?
Steel-springs and chicken-hawk, God bless you!
Gentlemen, said one of Bob's seconds, I
understand
it is to be a fair fight; catch as catch can, rough
and tumble:no man touch 'till one or the other hollos.
That's the rule, was the reply from the other
side.
Are you ready?
We are ready.
Then blaze away my game cocks!
At the word, Bob dashed at his antagonist at full speed;
and Bill squared himself to receive him with one of his
most fatal blows. Making his calculation from Bob's
velocity, of the time when he would come within striking
distance, he let drive with tremendous force. But Bob's
onset was obviously planned to avoid this blow; for
contrary
to all expectations, he stopt short just out of arms
reach; and before Billy could recover his balance
Bob had him all under-hold. The next second, sure
enough, found Billy's head where his feet ought to be.
How it was done, no one could tell; but as if by
supernatural
power, both Billy's feet were thrown full half
his own height in the air, and he came down with a force
that seemed to shake the earth. As he struck the
ground, commingled shouts, screams and yells burst
from the lower battalion, loud enough to be heard for
miles. Hurra my little hornet!Save him!
Feed him!Give him the Durham physic till his
stomach
turns! Billy was no sooner down than Bob was
on him, and lending him awful blows about the face and
breast. Billy made two efforts to rise by main strength,
but failed. Lord bless you man, don't try to get up!
Lay
still and take it!you
bleege
to have it.
Billy now turned his face suddenly to the ground, and
rose upon his hands and knees. Bob jerked up both his
hands and threw him on his face. He again recovered
his late position, of which Bob endeavored to deprive
him as before; but missing one arm, he failed, and
Billy rose. But he had scarcely resumed his feet
before
they flew up as before, and he came again to the
ground. No fight gentlemen! cried Bob's friends,
the man can't stand up!Bouncing feet are bad things
to fight in. His fall, however, was this time
comparatively
light; for having thrown his right arm round Bob's
neck, he carried his head down with him. This grasp,
which was obstinately maintained, prevented Bob from
getting on him, and they lay head to head, seeming, for
a time, to do nothing. Presently they rose, as if by
mutual
consent; and as they rose, a shout broke from both
battalions. Oh, my lark! cried the east, has he
foxed you? Do you begin to feel him! He's only
beginning
to fightHe ain't got warm yet.
Look yonder! cried the westdid'nt I tell you
so! He hit the ground so hard, it jarred his nose off.
Now ain't he a pretty man as he stands? He shall
have my sister Sall just for his pretty looks. I want to
get in the breed of them sort o' men, to drive ugly out
of my kin folks.
I looked and saw that Bob had entirely lost his left
ear, and a large piece from his left cheek. His right
eye was a little discolored, and the blood flowed
profusely
from his wounds.
Bill presented a hideous spectacle. About a third of
his nose, at the lower extremity, was bit off, and his face
so swelled and bruised, that it was difficult to discover
in it any thing of the human visagemuch more the fine
features which he carried into the ring.
They were up only long enough for me to make the
foregoing discoveries, when down they went again,
precisely
as before. They no sooner touched the ground
than Bill relinquished his hold upon Bob's neck. In this,
he seemed to all, to have forfeited the only advantage
which put him upon an equality with his adversary.
But the movement was soon explained. Bill wanted this
arm for other purposes than defence; and he had made
arrangements whereby he knew that he could make it
answer these purposes; for when they rose again, he
had the middle finger of Bob's left hand in his mouth.
He was now secure from Bob's annoying trips; and he
began to lend his adversary most tremendous blows,
every one of which was hailed by a shout from his
friends. Bullets!
Hoss
kicking!Thunder!
That'll do for the facenow feel his short ribs, Billy!
I now considered the contest settled. I deemed it
impossible
for any human being to withstand for five
seconds, the loss of blood which issued from Bob's ear,
cheek, nose and finger, accompanied with such blows as
he was receiving. Still he maintained the conflict, and
gave blow for blow with considerable effect. But the
blows of each became slower and weaker, after the first
three or four; and it became obvious, that Bill wanted
the room, which Bob's finger occupied, for breathing.
He would therefore, probably, in a short time, have let it
go, had not Bob anticipated his politeness, by jerking
away his hand, and making him a present of the finger.
He now seized Bill again, and brought him to his knees
but he recovered. He again brought him to his knees;
and he again recovered. A third effort, however,
brought him down, and Bob on top of him. These
efforts
seemed to exhaust the little remaining strength of
f
both; and they lay, Bill undermost, and Bob across his
breast, motionless, and panting for breath. After a short
pause, Bob gathered his hand full of dirt and sand, and
was in the act of grinding it in his adversary's eyes,
when Bill cried
Enough
!Language cannot describe
the scene which followedthe shouts, oaths, frantic
jestures
,
taunts, replies and little fights; and therefore I
shall not attempt it. The champions were borne off
by their seconds, and washed: when many a bleeding
wound, and ugly bruise, was discovered on each, which
no eye had seen before.
Many had gathered round Bob, and were in various
ways congratulating and applauding him, when a voice
from the centre of the circle cried out: Boys, hush
and listen to me! It proceeded from Squire Loggins,
who had made his way to Bob's side, and had gathered
his face up into one of its most flattering and intelligible
expressions. All were obedient to the Squire's
command
.
Gentlemen, continued he, with a most knowing
smile, isSammyReynoldinthiscompany
ofgentlemen. Yes, said Sam, here I am.
Sammy, said the Squire, winking to the company,
and drawing the head of his cane to his mouth with an
arch smile, as he closed, Iwishyouto tell
cousin
Bobbyandthesegentlemen
here present
whatyouruncleTommysaidbeforethe
fightbegan? Oh! get away, uncle Tom, says
Sam, smiling, (the Squire winked,) you don't know
nothing about
fighting
. (The 'Squire winked again.)
All you know about it, is how it 'll begin; how it 'll go
on; how it 'll end; that's all. Cousin Bob, when you
going to fight again, just go to the old man, and let him
tell you all about it. If he can't, don't ask nobody else
nothing about it, I tell you. The Squire's foresight
was complimented in many ways by the by-standers;
and he retired, advising the boys to be at peace, as
fighting was a bad business.
Durham and Stallings kept their beds for several
weeks, and did not meet again for two months. When
they met, Billy stepped up to Bob and offered his hand,
saying: Bobby you've
licked
me a fair fight; but you
would'nt have done it, if I had'nt been in the wrong. I
ought'nt to have treated your wife as I did; and I felt so
through the whole fight; and it sort o' cowed me.
Well Billy, said Bob, let's be friends. Once in the fight,
when you had my finger in your mouth, and was pealing
me in the face and breast, I was going to hollo; but I
thought of Betsy, and knew the house would be too hot
for me, if I got whipt, when fighting for her, after always
whipping when I fought for myself.
Now, that's what I always love to see, said a
by-stander
:
It's true, I brought about the fight; but I
would'nt have done it, if it had'nt o' been on account of
Miss
, (Mrs.) Durham. But dod deternally durn my
soul, if I ever could stand by and see any woman put
uponmuch less
Miss
Durham. If Bobby had'nt been
there, I'd o' took it up myself, be durned if I would'nt,
even if I'd o' got whipt for itBut we're all friends
now. The reader need hardly be told, this was Ransy
Sniffle.
Thanks to the Christian religion, to schools, colleges,
and benevolent associations, such scenes of barbarism
and cruelty, as that which I have been just describing,
are now of rare occurrence: though they may still be
occasionally met with in some of the new counties.
Wherever they prevail, they are a disgrace to that
community
.
The peace officers who countenance them,
deserve a place in the Penitentiary.
HALL.
THE SONG.
It is not to avoid the malediction of Shakspeare, upon
such as have not music in themselvesand are not
charmed with the concord of sweet sounds, that I
profess
to be fond of music; but because I am, in truth,
extravagantly fond of it. But I am not fond of French
music; and as for the Italian, I think that any one who
will dare to inflict it upon an American ear, ought to be
sent to the Penitentiary, without a trial. It is true that
some of the simple, national French airs, are very fine;
but there is not one in one thousand Italian tunes, simple
or compound, which is not
manslaughter
. The German
compositions are decidedly the best from the continent of
Europe; but even these are, of late, partaking so much
of the vices of France and Italy, that they have become
scarcely sufferable. As yet, however, they may be
safely admitted into a land of liberty and sense.
Scotland
has escaped the corruptions which have crept into
the empire of music, and consequently her music
recommends
itself, with irresistible charms, to every ear which
is not vitiated by the senseless rattle of the continent.
Ireland is a little more contaminated; but still her
compositions
retain enough of their primitive simplicity and
sweetness, to entitle them to the patronage of all who
would cultivate a correct taste in this interesting
department
of the fine arts. I would not be understood as
speaking here without any limitations or restrictions;
but I do maintain, that with some few exceptions, all of
the soul of music, which is now left in the world, is to
be found in Scotland or Ireland.
But Germans, Frenchmen and Italians, are decidedly
the best,that is,
the most expert
performers in the
world. They perform all over the world, and in order
to exhibit themselves to the best advantage, they select
the most difficult and complicated pieces. The people
at large, presume that the best performers must be the
best judges of music, and must make the best selections;
they therefore forego the trouble of forming an opinion
of their own, and pin their faith upon the decisionsor
rather the practice, of the amateurs. It was somehow
in this way, I presume, that the fashionable music of the
day, first obtained currency. Having become
prevalent
,
it has become tolerable; just as has the use of
tobacco
or ardent spirits. And while upon this head, I
would earnestly recommend to the friends of reform in
our favored country, to establish an Anti-mad-music
Society, in order to suppress, if possible, the cruelties of
our modern musical
entertainments
.
If the instrumental music of France and Italy be bad,
their vocal music is, if possible, a thousand times worse.
Neither the English,
nor the Georgia language
, furnishes
me with a term expressive of the horrors of a French
or Italian song, as it is agonized forth by one of their
professed singers. The law should make it justifiable
homicide in any man, to kill an Italian in the very act of
inflicting an
il penseroso
upon a refined American ear.
And yet with all the other European abominations
which have crept into our highly favoured country, the
French and Italian style of singing and playing, has
made its way hither; and it is not uncommon to hear
our boarding-school Misses piping away, not merely in
the style, but in the very language of these nations.
This I can bear very well, if there happen to be a
Frenchman or Italian present, because I know that he
suffers more from the
words
, than I do from the
music;
f2
for I confess, that upon such occasions, I feel something
of the savage malignity, which visits the sins of a nation
upon any of its citizens. But it most frequently happens
that I am put to the tortures of which I have been
speaking
,
without this mitigation. It was thus with me a few
evenings ago, at Mrs. B's party.
Tea had been disposed of, and the nonsensical
chit-chat
of such occasions had begun to flag, when I invited
Miss Mary Williams to the piano. She rose promptly
at my request, without any affected airs, and with no
other apology, than that she felt some diffidence at
playing in the presence of
Miss Crump
. The piano
was an admirable one; and its tones were exquisitely
fine. Mary seated herself at it, and after a short, but
beautiful prelude, she commenced one of Burns'
plaintive
songs, to a tune which was new to me, but which
was obviously from the poet's own land, and by one who
felt the inspiration of his verse. The composer and the
poet were both honored by the performer. Mary's voice
was inimitably fine. Her enunciation was clear and
distinct, with just emphasis enough to give the verse its
appropriate expression, without interrupting the melody
of the music; and her modulations were perfect.
She had closed, and was in the act of rising, before I
awoke from the delightful reverie into which she had
lulled me. I arrested her, however, and insisted upon
her proceeding; when she gave me one of Allan
Ramsey's
best, to measure equally appropriate. This she
followed with Tannahill's Gloomy Winter's now awa,
and was again retiring, when my friend Hall observed
See Miss Mary, you've brought a tear to Mr. Baldwin's
eye, and you must not cease until you chase it away
with some lively air. My friend was rightThe
touching pathos of Mary's voice, conspiring with a train
of reflections, which the song inspired, had really brought
me to tears. I thought of poor Tannahill's fate. He
was the victim of a Book-seller's stupidity. With men
of taste and letters, his fugitive pieces, particularly his
lyrics, had gained him a well-deserved reputation; but
he was not exempt from the common lot of authors. He
was attacked by the ignorant and the invidious; and
with the hopeless design of silencing these, he prepared
a volume or more of his poems, with great care, and
sent them to a Book-seller for publication. After the
lapse of several weeks, they were returned without a
compliment, or an offer for them. The mortification and
disappointment were too severe for his reason. It
deserted
him, and soon after, he was found dead in a tunnel
of the burn, which had been the scene of one of his
earliest songs. Unfortunately, in his madness, he
destroyed
his favorite works.
Such was the train of reflection, from which Mary
was kind enough, at the request of my friend, to relieve
me, by a lively Irish air. Had it not been admirably
selected, I could hardly have borne the transition. But
there was enough of softening melody, mingled with
the sprightliness of the air, to lead me gently to a gayer
mood;in which she left me.
In the meantime, most of the young ladies and
gentlemen
had formed a circle round Miss Aurelia Emma
Theodosia Augusta Crump, and were earnestly engaged
in pressing her to play. One young lady even went so
far as to drop on her knees before her, and in this posture
to beseech her dear Augusta, just to play the
delightful
overture of, something that sounded to me like
Blaze in the frets
. This petition was urged
with such a melting sweetness of voice, such a
bewitching leer at the gentlemen, and such a
theatric heave of the bosom, that it threw the young
gentlemen
into transports. Hall was rude enough to
whisper
in mine ear, that he thought it indelicate to expose
an unmantled bosom to a perpendicular view of a large
company; and he muttered something about
republican
simplicity, I knew not exactly what. But I
assured
him, the fair petitioner was so overcome by her
solicitude for the overture, that she thought of nothing
else, and was wholly unconscious that there was a
gentleman
in the room. As to his insinuation about points
of view, I convinced him by an easy argument that it
was wholly unfounded; for that this was the very point
of view in which an exposed neck must always be seen,
while men continue taller than women; and that, as the
young lady must have been apprised of this, she would
hardly take so much trouble for nothing. But to return.
Miss Crump was inexorableShe declared that she
was entirely out of practice. She scarcely ever
touched
the pianoMamma was always scolding her for
giving so much of her time to French and Italian, and
neglecting her music and painting; but she told mamma
the other day, that it really was so irksome to her to quit
Racine and Dante, and go to thrumming upon the piano,
that but for the obligations of filial obedience, she did not
think she should ever touch it again.
Here Mrs. Crump was kind enough by the merest
accident in the world, to interpose, and to relieve the
company from further anxiety.
Augusta, my dear, said she, go and play a tune or
two; the company will excuse your hoarseness.
Miss Crump rose immediately, at her mother's
bidding
,
and moved to the piano, accompanied by a large
group of smiling faces.
Poor child, said Mrs. Crump as she went forward,
she is frightened to death. I wish Augusta could
overcome her diffidence.
Miss Crump was educated at Philadelphia; she had
been taught to sing by Madam Piggisqueaki, who was a
pupil of Ma'm'selle Crokifroggietta, who had sung with
Madam Catalani; and she had taken lessons on the
piano, from Seignor Buzzifussi, who had played with
Paganini.
She seated herself at the piano, rocked to the right,
then to the leftleaned forward, then backward, and
began. She placed her right hand about midway the keys,
and her left about two octaves below it. She now put
off the right in a brisk canter up the treble notes, and
the left after it. The left then led the way back, and the
right pursued it in like manner. The right turned, and
repeated its first movement; but the left outran it this
time, hopt over it, and flung it entirely off the track.
It came in again, however, behind the left on its return,
and passed it in the same style. They now became
highly incensed at each other, and met furiously on the
middle ground. Here a most awful conflict ensued, for
about the space of ten seconds, when the right whipped
off all of a sudden, as I thought, fairly vanquished.
But I was in the error against which Jack Randolph
cautions usIt had only fallen back to a stronger
position
.
It mounted upon two black keys, and
commenced
the note of a rattle-snake. This had a wonderful
effect upon the left, and placed the doctrine of snake
charming beyond dispute. The left rushed furiously
towards it repeatedly, but seemed invariably
panic-struck
,
when it came within six keys of it; and as
invariably
retired with a tremendous roaring down the bass
keys. It continued its assaults, sometimes by the way
of the naturals, sometimes by the way of the sharps, and
sometimes by a zigzag, through both; but all its attempts
to dislodge the right from its strong hold, proving
ineffectual
,
it came close up to its adversary, and expired.
Any one, or rather no one, can imagine what kind of
noises the Piano gave forth, during the conflict. Certain
it is, no one can describe them, and therefore I shall not
attempt it.
The battle endedMiss Augusta moved as though
she would have arisen, but this was protested against by
a number of voices at once: One song, my dear
Aurelia
,
said Miss Small; you must sing that sweet little
French air you used to sing in Philadelphia, and which
Madam Piggisqueaki was so fond of.
Miss Augusta looked pitifully at her mama; and her
mama looked sing at Miss Augusta: accordingly
she squared herself for a song.
She brought her hands to the campus this time in fine
style, and they seemed now to be perfectly reconciled to
each other. They commenced a kind of colloquy; the
right whispering treble very softly, and the left
responding
bass very loudly. The conference had been kept
up until I began to desire a change of the subject, when
my ear caught, indistinctly, some very curious sounds,
which appeared to proceed from the lips of Miss Augusta
they seemed to be compounded of a dry cough, a
grunt, a hiccup and a whisper; and they were
introduced
,
it appeared to me, as interpreters between the right
and left. Things progressed in this way for about the
space of fifteen seconds, when I happened to direct my
attention to Mr. Jenkins, from Philadelphia. His eyes
were closed, his head rolled gracefully from side to side;
a beam of heavenly complacency rested upon his
countenance
;
and his whole man gave irresistible
demonstration
that Miss Crump's music made him feel good all
over. I had just turned from the contemplation of Mr.
Jenkins' transports, to see whether I could extract from
the performance any thing intelligible, when Miss Crump
made a fly-catching grab at a half dozen keys in a row,
and at the same instant she fetched a long dunghill-cock
crow, at the conclusion of which she grabbed as many
keys with the left. This came over Jenkins like a warm
bath; and over me, like a rake of bamboo briers.
My nerves had not recovered from this shock, before
Miss Augusta repeated the movement, and accompanied
it with the squall of a pinched cat. This threw me into
an ague fit, but from respect to the performer, I
maintained
my position. She now made a third grasp with the
right, boxed the faces of six keys in a row with the left,
and at the same time raised one of the most unearthly
howls that ever issued from the throat of a human
being. This seemed the signal for universal uproar
and destruction. She now threw away all reserve, and
charged the piano with her whole force.She boxed it,
she clawed it, she raked it, she scraped it. Her
neck-vein
swelled, her chin flew up, her face flushed, her eye
glared, her bosom heavedShe screamed, she howled,
she yelled, cackled, and was in the act of dwelling upon
the note of a screech owl, when I took the St. Vitus'
dance, and rushed out of the room. Good Lord,
said a by-stander, if this be her
singing
, what must
her
crying be!
As I reached the door, I heard a voice
exclaim, By heavens! she's the most enchanting
performer
I ever heard in my life! I turned to see who
was the author of this ill-timed compliment; and who
should it be but Nick Truck, from Lincoln, who seven
years before, was dancing Possum up the Gum Tree,
in the chimney corner of his father's kitchen. Nick
had entered the counting-room of a merchant in
Charleston
some five or six years before; had been sent out as
supercargo of a vessel to Bordeaux, and while the vessel
was delivering one cargo, and taking in another, had
contracted a wonderful relish for French music.
As for myself, I went home in convulsions, took sixty
drops of laudanum, and fell asleep. I dreamt that I
was in a beautiful city, the streets of which intersected
each other at right angles-That the birds of the air, and
the beasts of the forest had gathered there for battle;
the former, led on by a Frenchman, the latter by an
Italian-That I was looking on their movements towards
each other, when I heard the cry of Hecate is coming!
I turned my eye to the north east, and saw a female
flying through the air towards the city, and distinctly
recognized in her, the features of Miss Crump. I took
the alarm, and was making my escape, when she gave
command for the beasts and birds to fall on me.They
did so, and with all the noises of the animal world, were
in the act of tearing me to pieces, when I was waked by
the stepping of Hall, my room-mate into bed.
Oh, my dear sir, exclaimed I, you have waked
me from a horrible dream. What o'clock is it?
Ten minutes after twelve, said he.
And where have you been to this late hour?
I have just returned from the party.
And what kept you so late?
Why, I disliked to retire while Miss Crump was
playing.
In mercy's name! said I, is she playing yet?
Yes, said he, I had to leave her playing at last.
And where was Jenkins?
He was there, still in ecstasies, and urging her to
play on.
And where was Truck?
He was asleep.
And what was she playing?
An Italian.
Here I swooned, and heard no more.
BALDWIN.
THE TURN OUT.
In the good old days of
fescues, abisslefas
, and
anpersants
,
[3]
[3]
The
fescue
was a sharpened wire, or other instrument, used by
the preceptor, to point out the letters to the children.
terms which used to be familiar in this
country
during the Revolutionary war, and which lingered
in some of our county schools for a few years
afterwards
,
I visited my friend, Captain Griffin, who resided
about seven miles to the eastward of Wrightsborough,
then in Richmond, but now in Columbia county. I
reached the Captain's hospitable dome on Easter, and
was received by him and his good lady, with a
Georgia
welcome
of 1790. It was warm from the heart, and
taught me in a moment, that all the obligations of the
visit were upon their side, not mine. Such receptions
were not peculiar, at that time, to the Captain and his
family; they were common throughout the State.
Where are they now! and where the generous
hospitalities
which invariably foilowed them! I see them
occasionally
at the contented farmer's door, and at his
festive
board, but when they shall have taken leave of these,
Georgia will know them no more.
The day was consumed in the interchange of news
between the Captain and myself, (though I confess it
g
might have been better employed,) and the night found
us seated round a temporary fire, which the Captain's
sons had kindled up for the purpose of dying eggs. It
was a common custom of those days with boys, to dye and
peck eggs on Easter Sunday, and for a few days
afterwards
.
They were colored according to the fancy of
the dyer; some yellow, some green, some purple, and
some with a variety of colors, borrowed from a piece
of calico. They were not unfrequently beautified with
a taste and skill which would have extorted a
compliment
from Hezekiah Niles, if he had seen them a year
ago, in the hands of the
young operatives
, in some of
the northern manufactories. No sooner was the work
of dying finished, than our young operatives sallied
forth to stake the whole proceeds of their
domestic
industry
upon a peck. Egg was struck against egg,
point to point, and the egg which was broken was given
up as lost to the owner of the one which came whole
from the shock.
While the boys were busily employed in the manner
just mentioned, the Captain's youngest son, George,
gave us an anecdote highly descriptive of the Yankee
and Georgia character, even in their buddings, and at
this early date. What you think, pa, said he, Zeph.
Pettibone went and got his Uncle Zach. to turn him a
wooden egg; and he won a whole hat full o' eggs from
all us boys 'fore we found it outbut when we found it
out, may be John Brown did'nt smoke him for it, and
took away all his eggs, and give 'em back to us boys;
and you think he did'nt go then and git a guinea-egg,
and win most as many more, and John Brown would o'
give it to him agin, if all we boys had'nt said we thought
it was fair. I never see such a boy as that Zeph.
Pettibone
,
in all my life. He don't mind whipping no more
'an nothing at all, if he can win eggs.
This anecdote, however, only fell in by accident, for
there was an all-absorbing subject which occupied the
minds of the boys, during the whole evening, of which
I could occasionally catch distant hints, in under tones
and whispers, but of which I could make nothing, until
they were afterwards explained by the Captain himself.
Such as I'll be bound Peet Jones and Bill Smith
stretches himBy Jockey, soon as they seize him,
you'll see me down upon him like a duck upon a
Junebug
.
By the time he touches the ground, he'll think
he's got into a hornet's nest, &c.
The boys, said the Captain, as they retired, are
going to turn out the school-master to-morrow, and you
can perceive they think of nothing else. We must go
over to the school-house, and witness the contest, in
order to prevent injury to preceptor or pupils; for though
the master is always upon such occasions, glad to be
turned out, and only struggles long enough to present
his patrons a fair apology for giving the children a
holiday
,
which he desires as much as they do, the boys
always conceive a holiday gained by a turn out, as
a sole achievement of their valor, and in their zeal to
distinguish themselves, upon such memorable occasions,
they sometimes become too rough, provoke the master
to wrath, and a very serious conflict ensues. To
prevent
these consequences, to bear witness that the master
was
forced
to yield, before he would withhold a day of
his promised labor from his employers, and to act as a
mediator between him and the boys, in settling the
articles
of peace, I always attend; and you must
accompany
me to-morrow. I cheerfully promised to do so.
The Captain and I rose before the sun, but the boys
had risen, and were off to the school-house, before the
dawn. After an early breakfast, hurried by Mrs. G.
for our accommodation, my host and myself took up
our line of march towards the school-house. We
reached
it about a half hour before the master arrived, but
not before the boys had completed its fortifications. It
was a simple log pen, about twenty feet square, with a
door-way cut out of the logs, to which was fitted a rude
door, made of clapboards, and swung on wooden hinges.
The roof was covered with clapboards also, and retained
in their places by heavy logs placed on them. The
chimney was built of logs, diminishing in size from the
ground to the top, and overspread inside and out with
red clay mortar. The classic hut occupied a lovely
spot, overshadowed by majestic hickorys, towering
poplars
,
and strong armed oaks. The little plain on which
it stood, was terminated at the distance of about fifty
paces from its door, by the brow of a hill, which
descended
rather abruptly to a noble spring, that gushed
joyously forth from among the roots of a stately beach,
at its foot. The stream from this fountain scarcely
burst in view, before it hid itself beneath the dark shade
of a field of cane, which overspread the dale, through
which it flowed, and marked its windings, until it turned
from the sight, among vine-covered hills, at a distance
far beyond that to which the eye could have traced it,
without the help of its evergreen belt. A remark of
the Captain's, as we viewed the lovely country around
us, will give the reader my apology for the minuteness
of the foregoing description. These lands, said he,
will never wear out. Where they lie level, they will
be as good fifty years hence as they are now.
Forty-two
years afterwards I visited the spot on which he stood,
when he made the remark. The sun poured his whole
strength upon the bald hill which once supported the
sequestered
school-houseMany a deep-washed gully met
at a sickly bog, where gushed the limpid fountaina
dying willow rose from the soil which nourished the
venerable beachflocks wandered among the dwarf
pines, and cropt a scanty meal from the vale, where the
rich cane bowed and rustled to every breezeand all
around was barren, dreary and cheerless. But to
return
.
As I before remarked, the boys had strongly fortified
the school-house, of which they had taken possession.
The door was barricaded with logs, which I should have
supposed would have defied the combined powers of the
whole school. The chimney, too, was nearly filled with
logs of goodly size; and these were the only passways
to the interior. I concluded, if a
turn-out
was all that
was necessary to decide the contest in favor of the boys,
they had already gained the victory. They had,
however
,
not as much confidence in their outworks as I had,
and therefore had armed themselves with long sticks;
not for the purpose of using them upon the master, if the
battle should come to close quarters, for this was
considered
unlawful warfare; but for the purpose of guarding
their
works
from his approaches, which it was considered
perfectly lawful to protect, by all manner of jobs and
punches through the cracks. From the early
assembling
of the girls, it was very obvious that they had
been let into the conspiracy, though they took no part in
the active operations. They would, however,
occasionally
,
drop a word of encouragement to the boys, such as
I would'nt turn out the master; but if I did turn him
out, I'd die before I'd give up. These remarks
doubtless
had an emboldening effect upon
the young
free-borns
,
as Mrs. Trollope would call them; for I never
knew the Georgian of any age, who was indifferent to
the smiles and praises of the ladiesbefore his
marriage
.
At length, Mr. Michael St. John, the school-master,
made his appearance.Though some of the girls had
g2
met him a quarter of a mile from the school-house, and
told him all that had happened; he gave signs of sudden
astonishment and indignation, when he advanced to
the door, and was assailed by a whole platoon of sticks
from the cracks: Why, what does all this mean?
said he, as he approached the Captain and myself, with
a countenance of two or three varying expressions.
Why, said the Captain, the boys have turned you
out, because you have refused to give them an Easter
holiday.
Oh, returned Michael, that's it, is it? Well, I'll
see whether their parents are to pay me for letting their
children play when they please. So saying, he
advanced
to the school-house, and demanded, in a lofty tone,
of its inmates, an unconditional surrender.
Well, give us holiday then, said twenty little
urchins
within, and we'll let you in.
Open the door of the
Academy
, (Michael would allow
no body to call it a school-house)Open the door of
the Academy this instant, said Michael, or I'll break
it down.
Break it down, said Peet Jones and Bill Smith, and
we'll break you down.
During this colloquy I took a peep into the fortress, to
see how the garrison were affected by the parley. The
little ones were obviously panic struck at the first words
of command; but their fears were all chased away by
the bold determined reply of Peet Jones and Bill Smith,
and they raised a whoop of defiance.
Michael now walked round the Academy three times,
examining all its weak points with great care. He then
paused, reflected for a moment, and wheeled off suddenly
towards the woods, as though a bright thought had just
struck him. He passed twenty things which I supposed
he might be in quest of, such as huge stones, fence-rails,
portable logs, and the like, without bestowing the least
attention upon them. He went to one old log, searched
it thoroughly, then to another, then to a hollow stump,
peeped into it with great care, then to a hollow log, into
which he looked with equal caution, and so on.
What is he after? enquired I.
I'm sure I don't know, said the Captain, but the
boys do. Dont you notice the breathless silence which
prevails in the school-house, and the intense anxiety with
which they are eying him through the cracks?
At this moment Michael had reached a little excavation
at the root of a dog-wood, and was in the act of putting
his hand into it, when a voice from the garrison
exclaimed
,
with most touching pathos, Lo'd o' messy, he's
found my eggs! boys let's give up.
I wont give up, was the reply from many voices at
once.
Rot your cowardly skin, Zeph. Pettibone, you
would'nt give a wooden egg for all the holidays in the
world.
If these replies did not reconcile Zepheniah to his
apprehended loss, it at least silenced his complaints. In
the meantime, Michael was employed in relieving Zeph's
store-house of its provisions; and truly its contents told
well for Zeph's skill in egg-pecking. However,
Michael
took out the eggs with great care, and brought
them within a few paces of the school-house, and laid
them down with equal care, in full view of the besieged.
He revisited the places which he had searched, and
to which he seemed to have been led by intuition; for
from nearly all of them did he draw eggs, in greater or
less numbers. These he treated as he had done Zeph's;
keeping each pile separate. Having arranged the eggs
in double files before the door, he marched between
them with an air of triumph, and once more demanded
a surrender, under pain of an entire destruction of the
garrison's provisions.
Break 'em just as quick as you please, said George
Griffin, our mothers 'll give us a plenty more, won't
they Pa?
I can answer for your's, my son, said the Captain;
she would rather give up every egg on the farm, than
see you play the coward or traitor, to save your
property
.
Michael finding that he could make no impression
upon the fears or the avarice of the boys, determined to
carry their fortifications by storm. Accordingly, he
procured a heavy fence-rail, and commenced the
assault
upon the door. It soon came to pieces, and the
upper logs fell out, leaving a space of about three feet
at the top. Michael boldly entered the breach when by
the articles of war, sticks were thrown aside, as no longer
lawful weapons. He was resolutely met on the half
demolished
rampart by Peter Jones and William Smith,
supported
by James Griffin. These were the three largest
boys in the school; the first about sixteen years of age,
the second about fifteen, and the third just eleven. Twice
was Michael repulsed by these young champions, but
the third effort carried him fairly into the fortress.
Hostilities
now ceased for a while, and the Captain and I
having levelled the remaining logs at the door, followed
Michael into the house. A large three inch plank, (if
it deserve that name, for it was wrought from the half
of a tree's trunk, entirely with the axe,) attached to the
logs by means of wooden pins, served the whole school
for a writing desk. At a convenient distance
below it, and on a line with it, stretched a smooth log,
resting upon the logs of the house, which answered for
the writers' seat. Michael took his seat upon the desk,
placed his feet on the seat, and was sitting very compo
sedly, when with a simultaneous movement, Peet and
Bill seized each a leg, and marched off with it in quick
time. The consequence is obviousMichael's head first
took the desk, then the seat, and finally the ground, (for
the house was not floored,) with three sonorous thumps,
of most doleful portent. No sooner did he touch the
ground, than he was completely buried in boys. The
three elder, laid themselves across his head, neck and
breast, the rest arranging themselves
ad libitum
.
Michael's
equanimity was considerably disturbed by the
first thumpbecame restive with the second, and took
flight with the third. His first effort was to disengage
his legs, for without them he could not rise, and to lie in
his present position, was extremely inconvenient and
undignified
.
Accordingly, he drew up his right, and kicked
at random. This movement laid out about six in various
directions upon the floor. Two rose cryingDing his
old red-headed skin, said one of them, to go and
kick me right in my sore belly, where I fell down and
raked it, running after that fellow that cried `
school-butter
.
[4]
[4]
I have never been able to satisfy myself clearly, as to the literal
meaning of these terms. They were considered an unpardonable
insult
to a country school, and always justified an attack by the whole
fraternity, upon the person who used them in their hearing. I have
known the scholars pursue a traveller two miles to be revenged of the
insult. Probably they are a corruption of The School's better.
Better
, was the term commonly used of old, to denote a
superior
,
as it sometimes is in our dayWait till your
betters
are served, for
example. I conjecture therefore, the expression just alluded to, was
one of challenge, contempt and defiance, by which the person who used
it, avowed himself the
superior
in all respects, of the whole school,
from the preceptor down. If any one can give a better account of it,
I shall be pleased to receive it.
Drot his old snaggle-tooth picture, said the other,
to go and hurt my sore toe, where I knocked the nail
off, going to the spring, to fetch a gourd of
warter
for
him, and not for myself n'other.
Hut! said Capt. Griffin, young Washingtons
mind these trifles! At him again.
The name of Washington cured their wounds, and
dried up their tears in an instant, and they legged him
de novo
. The left leg treated six more as
unceremoniously
as the right had those just mentionedbut the
talismanic name, had just fallen upon their ears before
the kick, so they were invulnerable. They therefore
returned to the attack without loss of time. The
struggle
seemed to wax hotter and hotter, for a short time
after Michael came to the ground, and he threw the
children about in all directions and postures, giving some
of them thumps which would have placed the
ruffle-shirted
little darlings of the present day, under the discipline
of paregoric and opodeldoc for a week; but these hardy
sons of the forest, seemed not to feel them. As Michael's
head grew easy, his limbs, by a natural sympathy
became
more quiet, and he now sued for peace, offering
one day's holiday as the price. The boys demanded a
week; but here the Captain interposed, and after the
common, but often unjust custom of arbitrators, split the
difference. In this instance the terms were equitable
enough, and were immediately acceded to by both
parties
.
Michael rose in a good humor, and the boys were
of course. Loud was their talking of their deeds of
valor, as they retired. One little fellow, about seven
years old, and about three feet and a half high, jumped
up, cracked his feet together, and exclaimed, by gingo,
Peet Jones, Bill Smith and
me
can hold any
Sinjin
that
ever trod Georgy grit. By the way, the name of
St.
John
, was always pronounced
Sinjin
, by the
common
people of that day; and so it must have been by
Lord Bolingbroke himself, else his friend Pope would
never have addressed him in a line so unmusical as
Awake my St. John, leave all meaner things.
Nor would Swift, the friend and companion of both,
have written
What
St. John's
skill in state affairs,
What Ormond's valor, Oxford's cares.
Where folly, pride, and faction sway,
Remote from
St. John
, Pope and Gray.
HALL.
Abisselfa
is a contraction of the words a, by itself, a. It was
usual, when either of the vowels constituted a syllable of a word, to
pronounce it and denote its independent character, by the words just
mentioned, thus: a by itself,
a
-c-o-r-n corn,
acorn
.e by itself,
e
-v-i-l,
evil
, &c.
The character which stands for the word
and
(&) was probably
pronounced by the same accompaniment, but in terms borrowed from
the Latin language, thus: &
per se
(by itself) &. Hence,
anpersant
.
THE CHARMING CREATURE AS A WIFE.
My nephew, George Baldwin, was but ten years
younger than myself. He was the son of a plain,
practical
,
sensible farmer, who, without the advantages of a
liberal education, had enriched his mind by study and
observation, with a fund of useful knowledge, rarely
possessed
by those who move in his sphere of life.His wife
was one of the most lovely of women. She was pious,
but not austere; cheerful, but not light; generous, but
not prodigal; economical, but not close; hospitable, but
not extravagant. In native powers of mind, she was
every way my brother's equalin acquirements, she was
decidedly his superior.To this I have his testimony, as
well as my own; but it was impossible to discover in
her conduct, any thing going to shew that she coincided
with us in opinion. To have heard her converse, you
would have supposed she did nothing but readto have
looked through the departments of her household, you
would have supposed she never read. Every thing
which lay within her little province, bore the impress of
her own hand, or acknowledged her supervision. Order,
neatness, and cleanliness prevailed every where. All
provisions were given out with her own hands, and she
could tell precisely the quantity of each article that it
would require to serve a given number of persons,
without stint or wasteful profusion. In the statistics of
domestic economy, she was perfectly versed. She would
tell you, with astonishing accuracy, how many pounds of
cured bacon, you might expect from a given weight of
fresh porkHow many quarts of cream, a given
quantity
of milk would yieldHow much butter, so much
creamHow much of each article it would take to
serve so many persons, a month or a year. Supposing
no change in the family, and she would tell you to a day,
when a given quantity of provisions of any kind would
be exhausted. She reduced to certain knowledge every
thing that could be; and she approximated to it as nearly
as possible, with those matters which could not be. And
yet she scolded less, and whipt less, than any mistress of
a family I ever saw. The reason is obvious. Every
thing under her care went on with perfect system. To
each servant was allotted his or her respective duties; and
to each was assigned the time in which those duties were
to be performed. During this time, she suffered them
not to be interrupted, if it was possible to protect them
from interruption. Her children were permitted to give
no orders to servants but through her, until they
reached
the age at which they were capable of regulating
their orders by her rules. She laid no plans to detect
her servants in theft, but she took great pains to convince
them that they could not pilfer without detection; and
this did she, without betraying any suspicions of their
integrity. Thus, she would have her biscuits uniformly
of a size, and under the form of
instructions
to her cook,
she would show her precisely the quantity of flour which
it took to make so many biscuit. After all this, she exposed
her servants to as few temptations as possible. She never
sent them to the larder unattended, if she could avoid it;
and never placed them under the watch of children.
She saw that they were well provided with every thing
they needed, and she indulged them in recreations when
she could. No service was required of them on the
Sabbath, further than to spread the table, and to attend it
a service which was lightened as much as possible, by
having the provisions of that day very simple, and
prepared
the day before.
Such, but half described, were the father and mother
of George Baldwin. He was their only son and eldest
child; but he had two sisters, Mary and Martha; the
first four, and the second six years younger than
himself
a
son next to George having died in infancy. The
two eldest children inherited their names from their
parents
,
and all of them grew up worthy of the stock from
which they sprang.
George having completed his education at Princeton,
where he was graduated with great honor to himself,
returned
to Georgia, and commenced the study of the law.
After studying a year, he was admitted to the bar, just
after he had completed his one and twentieth year. I
have been told by gentlemen who belong to this
profession
,
that one year is too short a time for preparation
for the intricacies of legal lore; and it may be so, but I
never knew a young man acquit himself more creditably
than George did, in his maiden speech.
He located himself in the city of , seventy
miles from his father's residence; and after the lapse of
three years, he counted up eight hundred dollars, as the
net profits of his last year's practice. Reasonably
calculating
,
that his receipts would annually increase for
several years to come, having no expenses to encounter,
h
except for his board and clothing, (for his father had
furnished
him with a complete library,) he now thought of
taking to himself a helpmate. Hitherto he had led a
very retired, studious life; but now he began to court
the society of ladies.
About this time, Miss Evelina Caroline Smith returned
to the city, from Philadelphia, where, after an absence
of three years, she had completed her education. She
was the only child of a wealthy, unlettered merchant,
who, rather by good luck than good management, had
amassed a fortune of about fifty thousand dollarsMr.
Smith, was one of those men, who conceived that all
earthly greatness, and consequently, all earthly bliss,
concentred in wealth. The consequence was
inevitable
.
To the poor, he was haughty, supercilious and
arrogant
,
and not unfrequently, wantonly insolent; to the
rich he was friendly, kind, or obsequious, as their purses
equalled or overmeasured his own. His wife was even
below himself in moral stature: proud, loquacious,
silly. Evelina was endowed by nature with a good
mind, and, what her parents esteemed of infinitely more
value, she was beautiful from her infancy to the time
when I idtroduced her to the reader; which was just
after she had completed her seventeenth year. Evelina's
time, between her six and fourteenth year, had been
chiefly employed, in learning from her father and mother
what a perfect beauty she was, and what kind of
gewgaws
exhibited her beauty to the greatest
advantage
how
rich she would be; and what havoc she
would make of young men's hearts, by-and-by. In
these instructive lectures, her parents sometimes found
gratuitous help, from silly male and female visiters, who,
purely to win favor from the parents, would expatiate on
the perfections of the lovely, charming, beautiful
little creature, in her presence. The consequence was,
that pride and vanity became, at an early age, the
leading
traits of the child's character; and admiration and
flattery, the only food which she could relish. Her
parents subjected themselves to the loss of her society
for three years, while she was at school in Phialdelphia,
from no better motive, than to put her on an equality
with Mr. B's and Mr. C's daughtersor rather, to
imitate
the examples of Messrs. B. & C., merchants of the
same city, who were very rich.
While she was in Philadelphia, Evelina was well
instructed
.
She was taught, in what female loveliness
truly consiststhe qualities which deservedly command
the respect of the wise and good; and the deportment
which ensures to a female, the admiration of all. But
Evelina's mind had received a bias, from which these
lessons could not relieve it; and the only effect of them
upon her, was to make her an accomplished hypocrite,
with all her other foibles. She improved her
instructions
,
only to the gratification of her ruling passion. In
music she made some proficiency, because she saw in it,
a ready mean of gaining admiration.
George Baldwin had formed a partial acquaintance
with Mr. Smith, before the return of his daughter; but
he rather shunned, than courted a closer intimacy.
Smith, however, had entrusted George with some
professional
business, found him trust-worthy, and thought
he saw in him, a man, who at no very distant day, was
to become distinguished, for both wealth and talents; and
upon a very short acquaintance, he took occasion to tell
him, that whoever married his daughter, should
receive
the next day, a check for twenty thousand dollars.
That 'll do, continued he, to start upon; and when
I and the old woman drop off, she will get thirty more.
This had an effect upon George directly opposite to that
which it was designed to have.
Miss Smith had been at home about three weeks, and
the whole town had sounded the praises of her beauty
and accomplishments; but George had not seen her;
though Mr. Smith had in the mean time given him
several
notes to collect, with each of which, he wondered
how it happened that two so much alike as himself and
George, had never been more intimate; and hoped he
would come over in a sociable way and see him often.
About this time, however, George received a special
invitation
to a large tea-party, from Mr. and Mrs. Smith,
which he could not with propriety reject, and
accordingly
he went. He was received at the door by Mr. Smith,
announced upon entering the drawing-room, and
conducted
through a crowd of gentlemen to Miss Smith, to
whom he was introduced with peculiar emphasis. He
made his obeisance, and retired; for common politeness
required him to bestow his attentions upon some of the
many ladies in the room, who were neglected by the
gentlemen, in their rivalship for a smile, or word from
Miss Evelina. She was the admiration of all the
gentlemen
,
and with the exception of two or three
young
ladies, who thought her too affected, she was praised
by all the ladies. In short, by nearly universal
testimony
,
she was pronounced
a charming creature
.
An hour had elapsed before George found an
opportunity
of giving her those attentions, which, as a guest
of the family, courtesy required from him. The
opportunity
was at length, however, furnished by herself. In
circling round the room to entertain the company, she
reached George, just as the seat next to him had been
vacated. This she occupied, and a conversation ensued,
with every word of which she gained upon his respect
and esteem. Instead of finding her that gay, volatile,
vain creature, whom he expected to find in the rich and
beautiful daughter of Mr. and Mrs. Smith; he found her,
a modest, sensible, unassuming girl, whose views upon
all subjects, coincided precisely with his own.
She yielded to the wishes of her parents, from a
sense of duty, in giving and attending parties; but she
always left them, under the conviction that the time
spent at them was worse than wasted. It was really a
luxury to her, to retire from the idle chit-chat of them,
and to spend a few minutes in conversation with a male
or female friend, who would consider it no disrespect to
the company, to talk rationally upon such occasions.
And yet, in conducting such conversations at such times,
it was so difficult to avoid the appearance of pedantry,
and to keep it from running into something too stiff or
too grave for a social circle, that she really was afraid
to court them. As to books, she read but very few
novels, though her ignorance of them often exposed her
to some mortification; but she felt that her ignorance
here, was a compliment to her taste and delicacy, which
made ample amends for the mortifications to which it
forced her occasionally to submit. With Hannah
Moore, Mrs. Chapone, Bennett and other writers of the
same class, she was very familiar; (and she descanted
upon the peculiar merits of each,) But, after all,
books were of small consequence to a lady, without those
domestic virtues which enable her to blend superior
usefulness
with superior acquirements; and if learning, or
usefulness must be forsaken, it had better be the first.
Of music, she was extravagantly fond, and she
presumed
she ever would be; but she confessed, she had no
taste for its modern refinements.
Thus she went on with the turns of the conversation,
and as she caught George's views. It is true, she would
occasionally drop a remark which did not harmonize
exactly with these dulcet strains; and in her rambles
over the world of science, she would sometimes seem at
h2
fault, where George thought she ought to have been
perfectly
at home; but he found a thousand charitable ways
of accounting for all this; not one of which led to the
idea, that she might have learned these diamond
sentiments
by rote, from the lips of her preceptress.
Consequently
they came with resistless force upon the citadel
of George's heart, and in less than half an hour,
overpowered
it completely.
Truly, thought George, she is a charming
creature
!
When was so much beauty ever blended with
such unassuming manners, and such intellectual
endowments
!
How wonderful, that the daughter of
Mr. and
Mrs. Smith
should possess such accomplishments! How
dullwith all her filial affectionhow dull must be her
life, under the parental roof! Not a companion, not a
sympathetic feeling there! How sweet it would be to
return from the toils of the Courts, to a bosom friend, so
soft, so benevolent, so intelligent!
Thus ran George's thoughts, as soon as Miss Smith
had left him, to go in quest of new conquests. The
effects of her short interview with him, soon became
visible to every eye. His conversation lost its spirit
was interrupted by moody abstractions, and was sillier
than it had ever been. George had a fine person, and
for the first time in his life, he now set a value upon it.
To exhibit it to the greatest advantage, he walked the
room under various pretence; and when in his
promenades
he caught the eye of Miss Smith resting upon
him, he assumed a more martial or theatric step, which
made him look ridiculous at the time, and feel so
immediately
afterwards. In his listless journeyings, his
attention
was arrested by a beautiful cottage scene, at the
foot of which glittered in golden letters,
By Evelina Caroline Smith, of , Georgia
.
This led him to another, and another, from the same
pencil. Upon these he was gazing with a look and
attitude
the most complimentary to Miss Evelina that he
could possibly assume, while the following remarks were
going the rounds.
Do you notice George Baldwin?
Oh yes! he's in for itdead sirgood bye to
bail-writs
and
sassiperaris!
Oh she's only put an
attachment
on him.
Really, Miss Smith, it was too bad, to serve George
Baldwin so cruelly!
Ah, sir, if reports are true, Mr. Baldwin is too fond
of his books to think of any lady; much less of one,
so unworthy of his attentions as I am.
George heard thisnestled a littlethrew back his
shouldersplaced his arms a kimbo, and looked at the
picture with wonderful independence.
Then Miss Evelina was handed to the piano, and to a
simple, beautiful air, she sang a well-written song, the
burden of which was, an apology for love at first sight.
This was wanton cruelty to an unresisting captive. To
do her justice, however, her performance had not been
equalled during the evening.
The company at length began to retire; and so long
as a number remained sufficient to give him an apology
for staying, George delayed his departure. The last
group of ladies and gentlemen finally rose, and George
commenced a fruitless search for his hatfruitless,
because
he looked for it where he knew it was not to be
found. But a servant was more successful, and brought
it to him, just as he was giving up the search as
hopeless
,
and commencing a conversation with Miss Smith,
for the night.
Why where did you find it? said George, with
seeming surprise and pleasure at the discovery.
Out da, in de entry, sir, whay all de gentleman put
da hats.
Oh, I ought to have known that.
Good
-bye, Miss Evelina! said George, throwing a
melting eloquence into the first word, and reaching forth
his hand.
Good evening, Mr. Baldwin! returned she, I
hope you will not be quite so great a stranger here as
you have been. Pa has often wondered that you never
visit him.Here she relinquished his hand with a gentle,
but sensible pressure, which might mean two or three
things. Whatever was its meaning, it ran like nitrous
oxide through every fibre of George's composition,
and robbed him for a moment of his last ray of
intellect
.
Believe me, Miss Smith, said he, as if he were
opening
a murder case, believe methere are fascinations
about this hospitable domein the delicate touches of
the pencil which adorn it, and in the soft breathings of
the piano, awaked by the hand which I have just
relinquished
,
which will not permit me to delay, as
heretofore
,
those visits which professional duty requires me to
make to your kind parent, (your father,) a single
moment
beyond the time that his claims to my respects
become
absoluteGood evening, Miss Smith.
Did ever mortal of common sense, talk and act so
much like an arrant fool as I have this evening! said
George, as the veil of night fell upon the visions which
had danced before his eyes, for the four preceding
hours.
Though it was nearly twelve o'clock at night when
he reached his office, he could not sleep until he laid the
adventures of the evening before his father and mother.
The return mail brought him a letter from his parents,
written by his mother's hand, which we regret we
cannot
give a place in this narrative. Suffice it to say, it
was kind and affectionate, but entirely too cold for the
temperature of George's feelings. It admitted the
intrinsic
excellence of Miss Smith's views and sentiments,
but expressed serious apprehensions that her habits of
life would prove an insuperable barrier to her ever
putting
them in full practice. We all
admit
, my dear
George, said the amiable writer, the value of
industry
,
economyin short, of all the domestic and social
virtues; but how small the number who
practice
them!
Golden sentiments are to be picked up any where. In
this age they are upon the lips of every body; but we
do not find that they exert as great an influence upon
the morals of society, as they did in the infancy of our
Republic, when they were less talked of. For ourselves,
we confess we prize the gentleman or lady who
habitually
practices one christian virtue, much higher, than we
do the one who barely
lectures
eloquently, upon them
all. But we are not so weak or so uncharitable as to
suppose, that none who discourse fluently upon them,
can possess them.
The whole moral which we would deduce from the
foregoing remarks, is, one which your own observation
must have taught you a thousand times; that but little
confidence is to be reposed in fine sentiments, which do
not come recommended by the life and conduct of the
person who retails them. And yet, familiar as you are
with this truth, you certainly have more command over
your judgment, than have most young men of your age,
if you do not entirely forget it, the moment you hear
such sentiments from the lips of
a lady possessing
strong personal attractions
.' There is a charm in
beauty, which even philosophy is constrained to
acknowledge
;
and which youth instinctively transfers to all the
moral qualities of its possessor.
When you come to know the elements of which
connubial happiness is composed, you will be astonished
to find, that with few exceptions, they are things which
you now consider the veriest trifles imaginable. It is a
happy ordination of Providence, that it should be so;
for this brings matrimonial bliss within the reach of all
classes of persons.
Harmony of thought and feeling upon
the little daily occurrences of life, congeniality of views
and sentiments, between yourselves and your connexions
on either side, similarity of habits and pursuits among
your immediate relatives and friends, if not essential to
nuptial bliss, are certainly its chief ingredients.
Having pointed you
to the sources of conjugal felicity, your own judgment
will spare my trembling hand the painful duty of
pointing
you to those fountains of bitterness and wobut I
forget that I am representing your father as well as
myself.
George read the long letter, from which the foregoing
extracts are taken, with deep interest, and with some
alarm; but he was not in a situation to profit by his
parents' counsels. He had visited Miss Smith repeatedly
in the time he was waiting to hear from his parents;
and though he had discovered many little foibles in her
character, he found a ready apology, or an easy remedy
for them all.
The lapse of a few months found them engaged; and
George, the happiest mortal upon earth.
And now, my dear Evelina, said he, as soon as
they had interchanged their vows, I go to render
myself
worthy of the honor you have conferred upon me.
My studies, which love, doubt and anxiety have too long
interrupted, shall now be renewed with redoubled
intensity
.
My Evelina's interest being associated with all
my labors, will turn them to pleasures; my honor,
being hers, I shall court it with untiring zeal. She will
therefore, excuse me, if my visits are not repeated in
future, quite as often as they have been heretofore.
What a'ready, Mr. Baldwin! exclaimed she,
weeping
most beautifully.
Why no, not for the world, if my dear Evelina
says not! But I thought thatI flattered myselfI
hopedmy Evelina would find a sufficient apology in
the motive.
The little mistake was rectified in the course of an
hour, and they parted more in raptures with each other
than they had ever been.
George continued his visits as before, and in the mean
time his business began to suffer from neglect, of which
his clients occasionally reminded him, with all the
frankness
which one exhibits at seeing a love affair carried on
with too much zeal, and at his expense. In truth
George's heart had more than once entertained a wish,
(for his lips dare not utter it,) that his charming Evelina's
affection could come down to a hundred of Wedgewood,
when the Circuit commenced, and gave him a temporary
respite.
The evening before he set out, he spent with his
charming Evelina of course, and the interview closed,
with a most melting scene; but I may not stop to
describe
it. Candor constrains me to say, however, that
George got over it before he reached his office, which
he entered, actually whistling a merry tune.
He was at the second Court of the circuit, and had
been from home nearly a fortnight, when one of his
friends addressed him, withI'll tell you what it is,
Baldwin, you'd better go home, or Dr. Bibb will cut
you out. There have been two or three parties in
town, since you come away, at all of which Miss Smith
and Bibb were as thick as two pick-pockets.The
whole town's talking about them. I heard a young lady
say to her, she'd tell you how she was carrying on with
Bibb, and she declared upon her word and honor, (
looking
killniferously
at Bibb,) that she only knew you as
her father's collecting attorney.
George reddened deeper and deeper at every word of
this; but passed it off with a hearty, hectic laugh.
It was on Thursday afternoon that he received this
intelligence, and it met him forty miles from home, and
twenty-five from the next Court in order. Two of his
cases were yet undisposed of. Of these he gave hasty
notes to one of his brethren, in order to guide him, if he
should be forced to trial, but instructing him to continue
them if he could. Having made these arrangements,
Friday afternoon, at five o'clock, found his jaded horse
at his office-door. George tarried here no longer than
was necessary to change his apparel, and then he
hastened
to the habitation of his charming Evelina.
He was received at the door by a servant, who
escorted
him to the drawing-room, and who, to heighten
Evelina's
joy by surprise, instructed her maid to tell her,
that there was a
gentleman
in the drawing-room, who
wished to see her.
Minute after minute rolled away, and she did not
make her appearance. After he had been kept in
suspense
for nearly a quarter of an hour, she entered the
room, dressed in bridal richness and taste.
Why, is it you! said she, rushing to him in
transports
:
I thought it was Dr. Bibb.
And who is Dr. Bibb, Evelina? said George.
He's a young physician, with whom I had a partial
acquaintance in Philadelphia, and who has just settled
himself in this place. I want you to get acquainted with
him, for he is one of the most interesting young
gentlemen
I ever knew in my life.
No doubt I should be much pleased with him; but
do you think he would feel
himself
much honored or
improved by an acquaintance with `
your father's
collecting
attorney?
'
Why!Is it possible that Rebecca Freeman has
told you that! I never will speak to her again. I am
the most persecuted being upon earth. I can say
nothing
,
nor do nothing, no matter how innocent, which some
one does not make a handle of to injure me.
Here Miss Evelina burst into tears, as usual; but there
being a little passion mingled with her tears, on this
occasion
,
her weeping was not quite as interesting as it had been
before. It subdued George, however, and paved the
way to a reconciliation. The obnoxious expression was
explained, rather awkwardly, indeed, but satisfactorily;
and Miss Freeman was acquitted of all blame.
Matters were just placed in this posture, when a
servant
arrived to inform George that something was the
matter with his horse, and Mr. Cox, (his landlord,)
thought he was going to die.
George rose, and was hastening to the relief of his
favorite
of all quadrupeds, when Miss Smith burst in a
very significant, but affected laugh.
Why what is it amuses you so, Evelina? inquired
George, with some surprise.
Oh nothing, said she; I was only thinking how
quick Mr. Baldwin forgets me, when his
horse
demands
his attentions. I declare I'm right jealous of my rival.
i
Go back, boy, and tell your master I can't come
just now; but I'll thank him to do what he can for the
poor animal.
Mr. Cox, upon receiving this intelligence, and
learning
the business which engrossed George's attention, left
the horse to take care of himself; and he died just
before
George returned from Mr. Smith's.
These, and a thousand little annoyances, which we
may not enumerate, urged upon George the importance
of hastening the nuptials as speedily as possible.
Accordingly, by all the dangers, ills, alarms, and
anxieties, which attend the hours of engagement, he
pressed her to name the happy day within the coming
month, when their hearts and their destinies should be
inseparably united.
But she could not think of getting married for two
years yet to comethen, one year at least. At all
events, she could not appoint a day until she consulted
her dear Morgiana Cornelia Marsh, of Canaan, Vermont.
Morgiana was her classmate, and at parting in
Philadelphia
,
they had interchanged pledges that which ever
got married first, should be waited upon by the other.
In vain did George endeavor to persuade her that this
was a school-girl pledge, which Morgiana had already
forgotten, and which she never would fulfil. His
arguments
only provoked a reproof of his unjust suspicions
of the American fair.
Finding his arguments here unavailing, he then
entreated
his charming Evelina to write immediately to
Miss Marsh, to know when it would be agreeable to her
to fulfil her promise.
Weeks rolled away before Miss Smith could be
prevailed
upon even to write the all-important letter. She
despatched it at last, however; and George began to
entertain hopes, that a few months would make the dear
Evelina his own.
In the meantime his business fell in arrears, and his
clients complained loudly against him. He was
incessantly
tortured with false rumors, of his cold and
indifference
towards Miss Smith, and of the light and
disrespectful
remarks which he had made upon her; but he
was much more tortured by her unabated thirst for balls
and parties of pleasure; her undiminished love of
general
admiration, and the unconcealed encouragement
which she gave to the attentions of Dr. Bibb. The
effect
which these things had upon his temper was visible
to all his friends. He became fretful, petulent, impatient
and melancholy. Dr. Bibb proved, in truth, to be a
most accomplished, intelligent gentleman; and was the
man who, above all others, George would have selected
for his friend and companion, had not the imprudences
of Evelina transformed him into a rival. As things
were, however, his accomplishments only embittered
George's feelings towards him, provoked from George,
cruel, misplaced and unnatural sarcasms, which the
world placed to the account of jealousy, and in which
George's conscience forced him to admit that the world
did him nothing more nor less than sheer justice.
At length Miss Morgiana's letter arrived. It opened
with expressions of deep contrition that the writer should
have got married without giving her beloved Evelina
an opportunity of fulfilling her promise; but really, after
all, she was not to blame; for she did propose to write
to her beloved Evelina to come on to Canaan; but Papa
and Mr. Huntington, (her husband,) would not hear to
itIndeed, they both got almost vexed, that she should
think of such a thing.
But as soon as my beloved
Evelina gets married, she must appoint a time at which
we can meet at Philadelphia, with our husbands, and
compare notes.
I have a thousand secrets to tell you
about married life; but I must reserve them till we
meet. A thousand kisses to your dear George, for me;
and tell him if I were not a married woman I should
certainly fall in love with him, from your description of
him.
Well, I declare, said Evelina, as she folded up the
letter, I could not have believed that Morgiana would
have served me so. I would have died before I would
have treated her in the same way.
The great obstacle being now removed, the wedding
night was fixed at the shortest time that it could be, to
allow the necessary preparations; which was just three
months ahead.
Before these three months rolled away, George became
convinced that he had staked his earthly happiness upon
the forlorn hope of reforming Miss Smith's errors, after
marriage; but his sense of honor was too refined, to
permit him to harbor a thought of breaking the
engagement
;
and, indeed, so completely had he became
enamored
of her, that any perils seemed preferable to giving
her up forever.
He kept his parents faithfully advised of all the
incidents
of his love and courtship, and every letter which
he forwarded, went like a serpent into the Eden of peace
over which they presided. Their letters to him never
came unembalmed in a mother's tears, and were never
read without the tender response which a mother's tears
ever draws, from the eyes of a truly affectionate son.
The night came, and George and Evelina were
married
.
A round of bridal parties succeeded, every one of
which served only to heighten George's alarms, and to
depress his spirits. He could not discover that marriage
had abated, in the smallest degree, his wife's love of
general
admiration and flattery. The delight which she
felt at the attentions of the young gentlemen, was visible
to more eyes than his; as was plainly evinced by the
throngs which attended her wheresoever she moved.
Occasionally their assiduities assumed a freedom, which
was well calculated to alarm and to inflame one whose
notions of married life, were much less refined than those
which George had ever entertained; but there was
an apology for them, which he knew he would be forced
to admit, flimsey as it was, in truth; namely, they
were only those special attentions which were due to
the queen of a bridal party. Another consideration
forced him to look in silence upon those liberties.
His
wife
had taken no offence at them. She either did not
repel them at all, or she repelled them in such a good
humored way, that she encouraged, rather than
prevented
,
the repetition of them. For
him
therefore to have
interposed, would have been considered an act of
supererogation
.
To the great delight of George, the parties ended;
and the young couple set out on a visit to Lagrange, the
residence of George's parents. On their way thither,
Evelina was secluded, of course, from the gaze of every
person but her husband; and her attachment now
became
as much too ardent, as it had before been too cold.
If, at their stages, he left her for a moment, she was piqued
at his coldness, or distressed at his neglect. If he
engaged
in a conversation with an acquaintance or a
stranger
,
he was sure to be interrupted by his wife's
waiting-maid
,
Flora, with Miss 'V'lina say, please go da, sir;
and when he went, he always found her in tears, or in a
pet, at having been neglected so long by him, when he
i2
knew she had no friend or companion to entertain her,
but himself.
George had been long acquainted with the ladies of
the houses at which they stopt. They all esteemed
him, and were all anxious to be made acquainted with
his wife; but she could not be drawn from her room,
from the time she entered a house, until she rose to leave
it. All her meals were taken in her room; and George
was rebuked by her, because he would not follow her
example. It was in vain that he reasoned with her upon
the impropriety of changing his deportment to his old
acquaintances immediately after his marriage. He
stated
to her, that the change would be attributed to pride
that he should lose a number of humble, but valuable
acquaintances, which, to a professional gentleman, is no
small loss. But she could not understand that a
gentleman
is at liberty to neglect his wife, for `humble, but
valuable acquaintances.'
When they reached Lagrange, they received as warm
a welcome from George's parents, as parents, laboring
under their apprehensions, could give; but Mary and
Martha, having nothing to mar their pleasures, (for they
had not been permitted to know the qualifications which
George's last letters had annexed to his first,) received
her with all the delight which the best hearts could feel,
at welcoming to the family, in the character of a sister,
the beautiful, amiable, accomplished, intelligent, wealthy,
Miss Smith. In anticipation of her coming, the girls had
brushed up their history, philosophy, geography,
astronomy
and botany, for her especial entertainmentor rather,
that they might appear a little at home when their new
sister should invite them to a ramble over the fields of
science. The labor answered not its purpose, however;
Evelina would neither invite, nor be invited to any such
rambles.
The news of George's arrival at Lagrange with his
wife, brought many of his rustic acquaintances to visit
him. To many of them, George was as a son, or a
brother, for he had been acquainted with them, from his
earliest years, and he had a thousand times visited their
habitations, with the freedom with which he entered his
father's. They met him, therefore, with unrestrained
familiarity, and treated his wife as a part of himself.
George had endeavored to prepare her for the plain,
blunt, but honest familiarities, of his early friends. He
had assured her that however rude they might seem,
they were perfectly innocent; nay, they were tokens of
guileless friendship; for the natural disposition of plain,
unlettered farmers, was to keep aloof from the quality,
as they called the people of the town, and that by as
much as they overcame this disposition, by so much did
they mean to be understood as evincing favor; but
Evelina
profited but little by his lessons.
The first visitor was old Mr. Dawson, who had
dandled George on his knee a thousand times, and who,
next to his father, was the sincerest male friend that
George had living.
Well, Georgy, said the old man, and you've got
married?
Yes, uncle Sammy; and here's my wifewhat do
you think of her?
Why she's a mighty pretty creater; but you'd
better
took my Nance. She'd 'ave made you another sort
of wife, to this pretty little soft creater.
I don't know sir, said Evelina, a little fiery, how
you can tell what sort of a wife a person will make,
whom you never saw. And I presume Mr. Baldwin is
old enough to choose for himself.
Ah, well
now
I
know
he'd better 'ave took my
Nance, said the old man, with a dry smile. Georgy,
my son, I'm afraid you've got yourself into bad
business
;
but I wish you much happiness, my boy. Come,
neighbor Baldwin, let's go take a look at your farm.
Oh no, said old Mr. Baldwin, we will not go till
I make my daughter better acquainted with you. She
is unused to our country manners, and therefore does not
understand them. Evelina, my dear, Mr. Dawson is
one of our best and kindest neighbors, and you and he
must not break upon your first acquaintance. He was
only joking George in what he said, and had no idea
that you would take it seriously.
Well, sir, said Evelina, if Mr. Dawson will say
that he did not intend to wound my feelings, I'm willing
to forgive him.
Oh, God love your pretty little soul of you, said
the old man, I did n't even know you had any feelings;
but as to the
forgiving
part, why, that's neither here,
nor thereHere Evelina rose indignantly, and left
the room.
Well Georgy, my son, continued the old man,
I'm sorry your wife's so touchy! but
you
must n't
forget
old daddy Dawson. Come, my boy, to our house,
like you used to, when you and Sammy, and Nancy, used
to sit round the bowl of buttermilk under the big oak
that covered Mammy Dawson's dairy. I always think
of poor Sammy when I see you, (brushing a tear from
his eye, with the back of his hand.) I'm obliged to
love you, you young dog; and I want to love your wife
too, if she'd let me; but be that as it may, Sammy's
playmate won't forget daddy Dawson, will he, George.
George could only say Never! with a filling eye;
and the old men set out for the fields.
Most of the neighbors who came to greet George
upon his return to Lagrange shared Mr. Dawson's fate.
One wanted to span Evelina's waist, for he declared she
was the littlest creater round the waist he ever
seed
.
Another would
buss her
, because she was George's
wife, and because it was the first chance he ever had in
all his life to buss `the quality.' A third proposed a
swap of wives with George; and all made some remark
too blunt for Evelina's refined ear. Having no tact for
turning off these things playfully, and as little
disposition
to do so, she repelled them with a town dignity,
which soon relieved her of these intrusions; and in less
than a week, stopt the visits of George's first and
warmest
friends, to his father's house.
Her habits, views, and feelings, agreeing in nothing
with the family in which she was placed, Evelina was
unhappy herself, and made all around her unhappy.
Her irregular hours of retiring and rising, her
dilatoriness
in attending her meals, her continued complaints of
indisposition, deranged all the regulations of the family,
and begat such confusion in the household, that even the
elder Mrs. Baldwin occasionally lost her equanimity;
so that when Evelina announced a week before the
appointed
time that she must return home, the intelligence
was received with pleasure, rather than pain.
Upon their return home, George and his lady found
a commodious dwelling, handsomely furnished for their
reception. Mr. Smith presented him this in lieu of the
check of which he had spoken, before the marriage of
his daughter; and though the gift did not redeem the
promise by $14,000, George was perfectly satisfied.
Mrs. Smith added to the donation, her own cook and
carriage-driver. Flora, the maid, had been considered
Evelina's from her infancy. Nothing could have been
more agreeable to George, than the news that greeted
him on his arrival, that he was at liberty to name the
day when he would conduct Evelina to his own house;
for his last hope of happiness hung upon this last change
of life. He allowed himself but two days after his
return
,
to lay in his store of provisions; and on the third,
at four in the afternoon, he led his wife to their mutual
home.
To this moment, my dear Evelina, said George, as
they seated themselves in their own habitation, to this
moment have I looked forward for many months with
the liveliest interest. I have often figured to myself the
happy hours that we should enjoy under the common
roof, and I hope the hour has arrived, when we will unite
our endeavors to realize my fond anticipations. Let us
then, upon the commencement of a new life, interchange
our pledges, that we will each exert ourselves to
promote
the happiness of the other. In many respects, it
must be acknowledged that our views and dispositions
are different; but they will soon be assimilated by
identity
of interest, community of toil, and a frank and
affectionate
interchange of opinions, if we will but
consent
to submit to some little sacrifices in the beginning,
to attain this object. Now tell me, candidly and
fear-lessly
,
my Evelina, what would you have me be, and
what would you have me do, to answer your largest
wishes from your husband?
I would have you, said Evelina, think more of
me than all the world besideI would have you the
first lawyer in the StateI would have you overcome
your dislike to such innocent amusements as tea-parties
and ballsand I would have you take me to the Springs,
or to New-York, or Philadelphia, every summer.Now
what would you have me do?
I would have you rise when I doRegulate your
servants with systemSee that they perform their duties
in the proper way, and the proper timeLet all
provisions
go through your hands, and devote your spare time
to reading valuable works, painting, music, or any other
improving employment, or innocent recreation. Be
thus, and I `
will
think more of you than all the world
beside;' `I
will
be the first lawyer in the State,' and
after a few years you
shall
visit the North, or the
Springs every summer, if you desire it.
Lord, if I do all these things you mention, I shall
have no time for reading, music or painting.
Yes you will. My mother
Oh, for the Lord's sake, Mr. Baldwin, hush talking
about your mother. I'm sick and tired of hearing you
talk of my mother this, and my mother that
And when I went to your house, I did'nt see that she
got along a bit better than my motherexcept in her
cooking: and that was only because your mother
cooked
the meats, and your sisters made the pastry. I don't
see the use of having servants, if one must do every
thing herself.
My sisters make the pastry, to be sure; because
mother desires that they should learn how to do these
things, that they may better superinted the doing of
them, when they get married; and because she thinks
such things should not pass through the hands of
servants
,
when it can be avoided; but my mother never
cooks.
She does, for I saw her lifting off a pot myself.
She does not
Here the entry of the cook stopt a controversy that
was becoming rather warm for
the first evening at home
.
I want the keys Miss 'V'lina, to get out supper,
said the cook.
There they are,
aunt
[5]
[5]
Aunt and mauma, or maum, its abreviation, are terms of
respect, commonly used by children, to aged negroes. The first
generally
prevails in the up country, and the second on the sea-board.
Clary, said Evelina; try
and have every thing very nice.
My dear, I would n't send her to the provisions
unattended
:
every thing depends upon your commencing
right
Hush! said Evelina, with some agitation, I
would n't have her hear you for the world. She'd be
very angry if she thought we suspected her honesty.
Ma always gave her up the keys, and she says she never
detected her in a theft in all her life.
Very well, said George, we'll see.
After long waiting, the first supper made its
appearance
.
It consisted of smoked tea, half-baked biscuit,
butter, and sliced venison.
Why, said Evelina, as she sipped her first cup of
tea, this tea seems to me to be smoked. Here, Flora,
throw it out and make some more. Oh me! the biscuit
an't done. Aunt Clary's made quite an unfortunate
beginning. But I did 'nt want any supperdo you?
I can do without it, said George, coldly, if you
can.
Well, let's not eat any, and that will be the very way
to mortify aunt Clary, without making her mad.
Tomorrow
I'll laugh at her for cheating us out of our
supper; and she wont do so any more. The old
creature
has very tender feelings.
I'll starve for a week to save Clary's feelings, said
George, if you will only quit
aunting
her. How can
you expect her to treat you or your orders, with respect,
when you treat her as your superior?
Well, really, I can't see any great harm in treating
aged people with respect, even if their skins are black.
I wish you had thought of that when you were
talking to old Mr. Dawson. I should think he was
entitled to as much respect, as an infernal black
wench!
This was the harshest expression that had ever
escaped George's lips. Evelina could not stand it.
She left the room, threw herself on a bed, and burst
into tears.
In the course of the night the matter was adjusted.
The next morning George rose with the Sun, and he
tried to prevail upon his wife to do the same; but she
could not see what was the use of her getting up so soon,
just to set about doing nothing: and to silence all further
importunities then and after, upon that score, she told
him flatly she never would consent to rise at that
hour.
At half after eight, she made her appearance; and
breakfast came in. It consisted of muddy Coffee,
hardboiled
eggs, and hard-burnt biscuit.
Why, what has got into aunt Clary, said Evelina
that she cooks so badly!
Why, we mortified her so much, my dear, by
eating
no
supper; said George, and we have driven her
to the opposite extreme. Let us now throw the
breakfast
upon her hands, except the coffee, and perhaps she'll
be
mortified
back to a medium.
That's very witty, indeed, said Evelina; You
must have learnt it from the amiable and accomplished
Miss Nancy Dawson.
This was an allusion which George could not
withstand
;
and he reddened to scarlet.
Evelina, said he, you are certainly the strangest
being that I ever met with; you are more respectful to
negroes than whites, and to every body else than your
husband.
Because, returned she, negroes treat me with
more respect than some whites; and every body else,
with more respect than my husband.
j
George was reluctant to commence tightening the
reins of discipline with his servants, for the first few
weeks of his mastership: and, therefore, he bore in
silence, but in anger, their idleness, their insolence, and
their disgusting familiarities with his wife. He often
visited the kitchen, unobserved, of nights; and almost
always found it thronged with gay company, revelling
in all the dainties of his closet, smoke-house, sideboard,
and pantry. He communicated his discoveries to his
wife, but she found no difficulty in accounting
satisfactorily
for all that he had seen. Clary's husband had
always supplied her with every thing she wanted. Flora
had a hundred ways of getting money; and Billy, (the
carriage-driver,) was always receiving little presents
from her, and others.
At the end of three weeks
aunt
Clary announced that
the barrel of flour was out.
Now, said George, I hope you are satisfied that
it is upon
your
flour, and not upon her husband's, that
Aunt Clary
gives her entertainments.
Why, law me! said Evelina; I think it has
lasted
wonderfully. You recollect Ma and Pa have been
here most every day.
Had they
boarded
with us, said George, we
could not have consumed a barrel of flour in three
weeks.
In quick succession came the news that the tea,
coffee
,
and sugar were out; all of which Evelina thought
had lasted wonderfully.
It would be useless to recount the daily differences of
George and his wife. In nothing could they agree;
and the consequence was, that at the end of six weeks,
they had come to downright quarrelling; through all
which Evelina sought, and received the sympathy of
Miss Flora and aunt Clary.
About this time the Superior Court commenced its
session in the city; and a hundred like favors, received
from the judge and the bar, imposed upon George the
absolute necessity of giving a dinner to his brethren.
He used every precaution to pass it off well. He gave
his wife four days notice; he provided every thing
himself
,
of the best that the town would afford; he became
all courtesy and affection to his wife, and all respect
and cheerfulness to aunt Clary, in the interim. He
promised
all the servants a handsome present each, if they
would acquit themselves well upon this occasion, and
charged them all, over and over, to remember, that
the time between two, and half-past three, was all
that the bar could allow to his entertainment; and
consequently, dinner must be upon the table precisely
at two.
The day came, and the company assembled.
Evelina
,
attired like a queen, received them in the
drawing-room
;
and all were delighted with her. All were
cheerful, talkative and happy. Two o'clock came, and
no dinnerA quarter afterand no dinner. The
conversation
began to flag a little. Half past two rolled
roundand no dinnerConversation sunk to temperate,
and George rose to intemperate. Three quarters past
two camebut no dinnerConversation sunk to
freezing
,
and George rose to fever heat.
At this interesting moment, while he was sauntering
every way, George sauntered near his wife, who was
deeply engaged in a conversation with his brother Paine,
a grave, intelligent young man, and he detected her in
the act of repeating,
verbatim et literatim
, the pretty
sentences which first subdued his heart.
Good Lord! muttered George to himself;
Jenkinson
,
in the Vicar of Wakefield, with his one sentence
of learning, revived!
He rushed out of the room, in order to enquire what
delayed dinner; and on leaving the dining-room, was
met at the door by Flora, with two pale-blue, dry, boiled
fowls; boiled almost to dismemberment, upon a dish
large enough to contain a goodly sized shote; their legs
sticking straight out, with a most undignified straddle,
and bowing with a bewitching grace and elasticity to
George, with every step that Flora made.
Behind her followed Billy, with a prodidgious roast
turkey, upon a dish that was almost concealed by its
contents, his legs extended like the fowls, the back and
sides burnt to a crisp, and the breast raw. The old
gentleman
was handsomely adorned with a large black
twine necklace; and through a spacious window, that
by chance or design the cook had left open, the light
poured into his vacant cavity, gloriously.
George stood petrified at the sight; nor did he wake
from his stupor of amazement until he was roused by a
burnt round of beef, and a raw leg of mutton, making
by him for the same port in which the fowls and turkey
had been moored.
He rushed into the kitchen in a fury. You infernal
heifer! said he to aunt Clary; what kind of cooking
is this you're setting before my company?
EhEh! Name o' God, Mas. George; how
any body gwine cook ting good when you hurry 'em
so?
George looked for something to throw at her head;
but fortunately found nothing.
He returned to the house, and found his wife
entertaining
the company with a never ending Sonata, on the
piano.
Dinner was at length announced, and an awful sight
it was when full spread. George made as good
apologies
as he could; but his wife was not in the least
disconcerted
Indeed,
she seemed to assume an air of
self-complaisance
,
at the profusion and richness which
crowned
her board.
The gentlemen ate but little, owing, as they said, to
their having all eaten a very hearty breakfast that
morning. George followed his guests to the Court
House, craved a continuance of his cases for the
evening
,
on the ground of indisposition; and it was granted,
with an unaccountable display of sympathy. He
returned
home, and embarked in a quarrel with his wife,
which lasted until Evelina's exhausted nature sunk to
sleep under it, at three the next morning.
George's whole character now became completely
revolutionized. Universal gloom overspread his
countenance
He
lost his spirits, his energy, his life, his
temper
,
his everything ennobling; and he had just began
to surrender himself to the bottle, when an accident
occurred
which revived his hopes of happiness with his
wife, and determined him to make one more effort to
bring her into his views.
Mr. Smith, by an unfortunate investment in cotton,
failed; and after a bungling attempt to secrete a few
thousand dollars from his creditors, (for he knew George
too well to claim his assistance in such a matter,) he
was left without a dollar that he could call his own.
Evelina and her parents all seemed as if they would go
crazy under the misfortune; and George now assumed
the most affectionate deportment to his wife, and the
most soothing demeanor to her parents. The parents
were completely won to him; and his wife, for once,
seemed to feel towards him as she should. George
availed himself of this moment to make another, and
the last attempt, to reform her habits and sentiments.
My dear Evelina, said he, we have nothing now
to look to, but our own exertions, for a support. This,
j2
and indeed affluence, lies within our reach, if we will
but seek them in a proper way. You have only to use
industry and care within doors, and I without, to place
us in a very few years, above the frowns of fortune.
We have only to consult each other's happiness, to
make each other happy. Come then, my love,
forgeting
our disgraceful bickerings, let us now commence a
new life. Believe me, there is no being on this earth,
that my heart can love as it can you, if you will but
claim its affections; and you know how to command
them. Thus, at much greater length, and with much
more tenderness, did George address her. His appeal
had, for a season, its desired effect. Evelina rose with
him, retired with him, read with him. She took charge
of the keys, dealt out the stores with her own hand,
visited the kitchenin short, she became every thing
George could wish or expect from one of her
inexperience
.
Things immediately wore a new
aspect
.
George became himself again. He
recommenced
his studies with redoubled assiduity. The
community saw and delighted in the change, and the
bar began to tremble at his giant strides in his
profession
.But
alas! his bliss was doomed to a short
duration
.
Though Evelina saw, and felt, and
acknowledged
the advantages and blessings of her new course
of conduct, she had to preserve it by a struggle against
nature; and at the end of three months, nature
triumphed
over resolution, and she relapsed into her old habits.
George now surrendered himself to drink, and to
despair
,
and died the drunkard's death. At another time,
I may perhaps give the melancholy account of his ruin
in detail; tracing its consequences down to the moment
at which I am now writing. Should this time never
arrive, let the fate of my poor lost nephew, be a
warning
to mothers, against bringing up their daughters to be
Charming Creatures
.
BALDWIN.
THE GANDER PULLING.
In the year 1798, I resided in the City of Augusta,
and upon visiting the Market-House, one morning in
that year, my attention was called to the following
notice, stuck upon one of the pillars of the building:
advurtysement
.
Thos woo wish To be inform heareof, is heareof
notyfide that edwd. Prator will giv a gander pullin, jis
this side of harisburg, on Satterday of thes pressents
munth to All woo mout wish to partak tharof.
e Prator, thos wishin to purtak
will cum yearly, as the pullin will begin soon.
e. p.
If I am asked, why jis the side of harisburg was
selected for the promised feat, instead of the City
of Augusta? I answer from conjecture, but with
some confidence, because, the ground chosen, was
near the central point, between four rival towns,
the citizens of all which
mout wish to partak
tharof;
namely, Augusta, Springfield, Harrisburg, and
CampbelltonNot that each was the rival of all the
others
;
but, that the first and the last were competitors, and
each of the others backed the pretensions of its nearest
neighbor. Harrisburg sided with Campbellton,
not be
cause she had any interest in seeing the business of the
two States centre upon the bank of the river, nearly
opposite
to her;
but because, like the Union Democratic
Republican Party of Georgia, she thought, after the
adoption of the Federal Constitution, that the several
towns of the confederacy should no longer be
separated
by the distinction of local party; but that laying
down all former prejudices and jealousies, as a sacrifice
on the altar of their country, they should become united
in a
single body
, for the maintenance of those principles
which they deemed essential to the
public welfare
.
Springfield, on the other hand, espoused the State
Rights' creed. She admitted, that under the Federal
compact, she ought to love the sister States very much;
but that under the
Social Compact
, she ought to love
her own state a little more; and she thought the two
compacts perfectly reconcilable to each other. Instead
of the towns of the several States, getting into
single
bodies
, to preserve the
public welfare
, her doctrine was,
that they should be kept in
separate bodies
, to preserve
the
private welfare
. She admitted frankly, that living
as she always had lived, right amidst gullies, vapours,
fogs, creeks, and lagoon's, she was wholly incapable of
comprehending that expansive kind of benevolence,
which taught her to love people whom she knew
nothing
about, as much as her next door neighbors and
friends.Until therefore, she should learn it from the
practical operation of the Federal Compact, she would
stick to the old-fashioned Scotch love, which she
understood
perfectly, and go in for Augusta, live or die, hit
or miss, right or wrong. As in the days of Mr.
Jefferson
,
tho Springfield doctrines prevailedCampbellton
was literally
nullified;
in so much, that ten years ago,
there was not a house left to mark the spot where once
flourished this active, busy little village. Those who
are curious to know where Springfield stood, at the time
of which I am speaking, have only to take their position
at the intersection of Broad and Marbury Streets, in the
city of Augusta, and they will be in the very heart of
old Springfield. Sixty steps West, and as many East
of this position, will measure the whole length of this
Jeffersonian Republican village, which never boasted of
more than four dwelling-houses; and Broad-street,
measures
its width, if we exclude kitchens and stables.
And, while upon this subject, since it has been predicted
by a man, for whose opinions I entertain the profoundest
respect,
[6]
[6]
The Editor of the Hickory Nut.
(especially since the prediction,) that my
writings
will be read, with increased interest, a hundred
years to come; and as I can see no good reason, if this
be true, why they should not be read a thousand years
hence, with more interest; I will take the liberty of
dropping a word here, to the curious reader, of the year
1933. He will certainly wish to know the site of
Harrisburg
,
(seeing it is doomed, at no distant period, to
share the fate of Springfield,) and of Campbellton.
Supposing then, that if the great fire in Augusta, on
the 3d of April, 1829, did not destroy that city, nothing
will; I select this as a permanent object.
In 1798, Campbell street was the western verge of
Augusta, a limit to which it had advanced but a few
years before, from Jackson street. Thence to
Springfield
,
led a large road,now built up on either side, and
forming a continuation of Broad-streetThis road was
cut across obliquely, by a deep gully, the bed of which
was an almost impassable bog, which entered the road,
about one hundred yards below Collock street, on the
South, and left it, about thirty yards below Collock street,
on the North side of now Broad street. It was called
Campbell's-Gully, from the name of the gentleman,
through whose possessions, and near whose dwelling, it
wound its way to the river. Following the direction of
Broad-street, from Springfield, westward, 1347 yards,
will bring you to Harrisburg; which had nothing to boast
of over Springfield, but a Warehouse, for the storage
of Tobacco, then the staple of Georgia.Continue the
same direction, 700 yards, then face to your right hand,
and follow your nose directly across Savannah river,
and upon ascending the opposite bank, you will be in
the busiest part of Campbellton, in 1798. Between
Harrisburg
and Springfield, and 1143 yards from the latter,
there runs a stream which may be perpetual. At the
time just mentioned, it flowed between banks twelve or
fourteen feet high, and was then called, as it still is,
Hawk's Gully.
[7]
[7]
It took its name from an old man, by the name of Hawk, who lived
in a log hut, on a small knoll, on the Eastern side of the gully, and
about 100 yards South of the Harrisburg road.
Now, Mr. Prator, like the most successful politician
of the present day, was on all sides, in a doubtful
contest
;
and accordingly he laid off his gander-pulling
ground, on the nearest suitable unappropriated spot, to
the centre point between Springfield and Harrisburg.
This was between Harrisburg and Hawk's Gully, to
the south of the road, and embraced part of the road,
but within 100 yards of Harrisburg.
When
Satterday of thes presents munth
rolled
round, I determined to go to the gander-pulling. When
I reached the spot, a considerable number of persons of
different ages, sexes, sizes, and complexions, had
collected
from the rival towns, and the country around.
But few females were there, however; and those few,
were from the lowest walks of life.
A circular path of about forty yards diameter, had
already been laid out; over which, from two posts about
ten feet apart, stretched a rope, the middle of which was
directly over the path. The rope hung loosely, so as
to allow it, with the weight of a gander attached to it,
to vibrate in an arc of four or five feet span, and so as
to bring the breast of the gander, within barely easy
reach of a man of middle stature, upon a horse of
common
size.
A hat was now handed to such as wished to enter the
list; and they threw into it twenty-five cents each; this
sum was the victor's prize.
The devoted gander was now produced; and Mr.
Prator, having first tied his feet together, with a strong
cord, proceeded to the
neck-greasing
. Abhorrent as it
may be, to all who respect the tenderer relations of
life,
Mrs.
Prator had actually prepared a gourd of
goose
grease for this very purpose. For myself, when I saw
Ned dip his hands into the grease, and commence
stroking
down the feathers, from breast to head, my thoughts
took a melancholy turnThey dwelt in sadness upon
the many conjugal felicities which had probably been
shared between the
greasess
and the
greasee
.I could
see him as he stood by her side, through many a chilly
day and cheerless night, when she was warming into
life, the offspring of their mutual loves, and repelled,
with chivalrous spirit, every invasion of the consecrated
spot, which she had selected for her incubation. I could
see him moving with patriarchal dignity, by the side of
his loved one, at the head of a smiling, prattling group,
the rich reward of their mutual care, to the luxuries of
the meadow, or to the recreations of the pool. And now
alas! an extract from the smoking sacrifice of his bosom
friend, was disecrated to the unholy purpose of making
his neck a fit object for Cruelty to reach her quick,
unerring fingers at. Ye friends of the sacred tie!
judge what were my feelings, when in the midst of these
reflections, the voice of James Prator thundered on mine
ear, Durn his old dodging soul; brother Ned! grease
his neck till a fly can't light on it!
Ned having fulfilled his brother Jim's request as well
as he could, attached the victim of his cruelty to the rope,
directly over the path. On each side of the gander,
was stationed a man, whose office it was, to lash forward
any horse which might linger there for a moment; for
by the rules of the ring, all pulling was to be done at a
brisk canter.
The word was now given for the competitors to mount
and take their places on the ring. Eight appeared
Tall Zubley Zin, mounted upon Sally Spitfire; Arch
Odum, mounted on Bull-and-Ingons, (onions.) Nathan
Perdew, on Hell-cat; James Dickson, on Nigger; David
Williams, on Gridiron; Fat John Fulger, on Slouch;
Gorham Bostwick, on Gimblet; and Turner Hammond,
on Possum.
Come,
gentlemen
, said commandant Prator, fall
in! All of you git behind one another, sort o' in a
row.
All came into the track very kindly, but Sally
Spitfire
,
and Gridiron. The former, as soon as she saw a
general movement of horses, took it for granted, there
was mischief brewing, and because she could not tell
where it lay, she concluded it lay every where, and
therefore took fright at every thing.
Gridiron was a grave horse; but a suspicious eye
which he cast to the right and left, wherever he moved,
showed, that he was wide awake, and that nobody
better not go fooling with him, as his owner sometimes
used to say. He took a sober, but rather intense view of
things; in so much, that in his contemplations, he passed
over the track three times, before he could be prevailed
upon to stop in it. He stopt, at last, however, and when
he was made to understand, that this was all that was
expected of him for the present, he surrendered his
suspicions
at once, with a countenance which seemed plainly
to say, Oh, if this is all you want, I've no objection
to it.
It was long before Miss Spitfire could be prevailed
upon to do the like.
Get another horse; Zube, said one, Sall will
never do for a gander pullin.
I won't, said Zube. If she won't do, I'll make her
do. I want a nag that goes off with a spring; so that
when I get a hold, she'll cut the neck in two like a
steel-trap
.
At length Sally was rather flung than coaxed, into the
track, directly ahead of Gridiron.
Now gentlemen, said the Master of Ceremonies,
no man's to make a grab till all's been once round
and when the first man
are
got round, then the whole
twist and tucking of you grab away, as you come under,
(Look here Jim Fulger! you better not stand too close
to that gander, I tell you,) one after another. Now
blaze away! (the command for an onset of every
kind, with people of this order.)
Off they went, Miss Sally delighted; for she now
thought the whole parade would end in nothing more nor
less, than her favorite amusement, a race. But
Gridiron's
visage pronounced this, the most nonsensical
business
,
that ever a horse of sense was engaged in since the
world began.
For the first three rounds, Zubly was wholly
occupied
in restraining Sally to her place, but he lost
nothing
by this, for the gander had escaped unhurt. On
completing his third round, Zube reached forth his long
arm, grabbed the gander by the neck, with a firmness,
which seemed likely to defy
goose-grease
, and at the
k
same instant, he involuntarily gave Sally a sudden
check. She raised her head, which before had been
kept nearly touching her leader's hocks, and for the
first time, saw the gander in the act of descending upon
her; at the same moment she received two pealing
lashes from the whippers. The way she now broke,
for Springfield, is nothing to nobody. As Zube
dashed
down the road, the whole Circus raised a whoop after
him. This started about twenty dogs, hounds, curs and
pointers, in full chase of him, (for no man moved
without
his dog in those days.)The dogs alarmed some
belled cattle, which were grazing on Zube's path, just
as he reached them; these joined him, with tails up, and
a tremendous rattling. Just beyond these went three
tobacco-rollers, at distances of fifty and a hundred yards
apart; each of whom gave Zube a terrific whoop,
scream, or yell, as he passed.
He went in and out of Hawk's Gully, like a trapball,
and was in Springfield, in less than no time. Here
he was encouraged onward, by a new recruit of dogs;
but they gave up the chase as hopeless, before they
cleared the village. Just beyond Springfield, what
should Sally encounter, but a flock of geese! the tribe
to which she owed all her misfortunes. She stopt
suddenly
,
and Zube went over her head with the last
acquired
velocity. He was up in a moment, and the
activity
with which he pursued Sally, satisfied every
spectator
that he was unhurt.
Gridiron, who had witnessed Miss Sally's treatment
with astonishment and indignation, resolved not to pass
between the posts, until the whole matter should be
explained
to his satisfaction. He therefore stopt short,
and by very intelligible looks, demanded of the
whippers
,
whether if he passed between them, he was to be
treated as Miss Spitfire had been? The whippers gave
him no satisfaction, and his rider signified by reiterated
thumps of the heel, that he should go through, whether
he would or not. Of these, however, Gridiron seemed
to know nothing. In the midst of the conference,
Gridiron's
eye lit upon the oscilating gander, and every
moment's
survey of it begat in him a growing interest, as
his slowly rising head, suppressed breath, and projected
ears, plainly evinced. After a short examination, he
heaved a sigh, and looked behind him, to see if the way
was clear. It was plain that his mind was now made
up; but to satisfy the world that he would do nothing
rashly, he took another view, and then wheeled and went
for Harrisburg, as if he had set in for a year's running.
Nobody whooped at Gridiron, for all saw that his
running
was purely the result of philosophic deduction.
The reader will not suppose all this consumed half the
time which has been consumed in telling it, though it
might have been so, without interrupting the
amusement
;
for Miss Spitfire's flight had completely
suspended
it for a time.
The remaining competitors now went on with the
sport. A few rounds showed plainly, that Odum or
Bostwick would be the victor; but which, no one could
tell. Whenever either of them came round, the
gander's
neck was sure of a severe wrench. Many a half
pint of Jamaica was staked upon them, besides other
things. The poor gander withstood many a strong pull
before his wailings ceased. At length, however, they
were hushed by Odum. Then came Bostwick, and
broke the neck. The next grasp of Odum, it was
thought, would bear away the head; but it did not
Then Bostwick was sure of itbut he missed it. Now
Odum must surely have itAll is interest and
animation
the
horses sweep round with redoubled speed
every eye is upon Odumhis backers smiling,
Bostwick's
tremblingTo the rope he comeslifts his hand
when, lo! Fat John Fulger had borne it away the
second before. All were astonishedall disappointed
and some were vexed a little; for it was now clear, that
if it had n't o' been for his great fat greasy paw, to
use their own language, Odum would have gained the
victory. Others cursed, that long-legged Zube Zin,
who was so high, he did' n't know when his feet were
cold, for bringing such a nag as Sal' Spitfire, to a gander
pullen, for if he'd o'been in his place, it would o' flung
Bostwick right where that
gourd
o' hog's
lard
, (Fulger)
was.
Fulger's conduct was little calculated to reconcile
them to their disappointment.
Come here Neddy Prater, said he, with a
triumphant
smile, let your Uncle Johnny put his potato
stealer, (hand,) into that hat, and tickle the chins of them
are
shiners a little! Oh you little shining sons o'
bitches! walk into your Mas' Johny's pocket, and gingle,
so as Arch Odum and Gory Bostwick may hear you!
You hear 'em Gory?
Boys
, don't pull with
men
any
more. I've jist got my hand in; I wish I had a pond
full o' ganders here now, jist to show how I could make
their heads flyBet all I've won, you may hang three
upon that rope, and I'll set Slouch at full speed, and
take off the heads of all three, the first grab; two with
my hands, and one with my teeth.
Thus he went on, but really, there was no boasting
in all this; it was all fun, for John knew, and all were
convinced that he knew, that his success, was entirely
the result of accident. John was really a good
natured
fellow, and his
cavorting
had an effect directly
opposite
to that which the reader would suppose it had
it reconciled all to their disappointment, save one. I
except little Billy Mixen, of Spirit Creek; who had
staked the net proceeds of six quarts of huckle-berries
[8]
[8]
I give them their Georgia name. I should hardly be understood, if
I called them
whortleberries
.
upon Odom; which he had been long keeping for a safe
bet.
He
could not be reconciled, until he fretted
himself
into a pretty little
piney
-woods fight, in which he
got whipt; and then he went home perfectly satisfied.
Fulger spent all his winnings with Prater in treats to the
companymade most of them drunk, and thereby
produced
four Georgia
rotations;
I borrowed this term from Jim Inman, at the time.Why, Jim,
said I to him, just as he rose from a fight, what have you been doing?
Oh, said he, nothing but taking a little
rotation
with Bob
McManus
.
after which all parted
good friends.
HALL.
THE BALL.
Being on a visit to the city of , about ten years
ago, my old friend, Jack De Bathle gave me an invitation
to a ball, of which he was one of the managers. Jack
had been the companion of my childhood, my boyhood,
and my early manhood; and through many a merry
dance had we hopt, and laughed, and tumbled down
together, in the morning of life. Dancing was really,
in those days, a merry making business. Except the
minuet, which was introduced only to teach us the
graces
,
and the congo, which was only to chase away the
solemnities of the minuet, it was all a jovial,
heart-stirring
,
foot-stirring amusement. We had none of your
k2
mathematical cotillions; none of your immodest waltzes;
none of your detestable, disgusting gallapades. The
waltz
would have crimsoned the cheek of every young
lady who attended a ball in my day; and had the
gallapade
been
commenced
in the ball room, it would have
been
ended
in the street. I am happy to say that the
waltz has met with but very little encouragement in
Georgia as yetthe gallapade with none. Ye fair of
my native landYe daughters of a modest race! blush
them away from the soil, which your mothers honored
by their example, and consecrated with their ashes.
Born to woman's loftiest destinies, it ill becomes you to
stoop from your high estate, to ape the indecencies of
Europe's slaves. It is yours to commandnot to obey.
Let vice approach you in what form she mayas the
handmaid of wit and talents, the mistress of courts, or
the queen of fashion, fail not to meet her, with the frown
of indignant virtue, and the flush of offended modesty.
There is a majesty in these, which has ever commanded
her homageThere is a loveliness in these, which will
ever command the admiration of the world. The
interest
which I feel, in the character of the fair daughters of
America, is my apology for this sober digression.
Though DeBathle is but two months younger than I
am, he still dances occasionally; and to this circumstance
in part, but more particularly to the circumstance of his
being a married man, is to be ascribed his appointment,
of manager; the custom now being, to have one third,
or one half the managers, married men. This would
be a great improvement on the management of balls in
olden time, could the married men only
manage
to keep
out of the card-room. Would they take the direction
of the amusement into their hands, their junior
colleagues
would then have an opportunity of sharing the
pleasures of the evening, a privilege which they seldom
enjoy, as things are now conducted: However, married
men are not appointed with the expectation that they
will perform the duties of the office; but to quiet the
scruples of some half dozen or more
charming
creatures
,
who, though they never fail to attend a ball, will
not condescend to do so, until they are perfectly satisfied
it is to be conducted with the utmost gravity, dignity,
decorum and propriety. For these assurances they look
first to the face of the paper, (the ball-ticket,) and if
they do not find on it a goodly number of responsible
names, (such as by reasonable presumption, are well
broke to petticoat government,) they protest against it
tell a hundred amiable little fibs, to conceal the cause
of their oppositiontorture two or three beaux half to
death with suspense, and finally conclude to go
just to
keep from giving offence
. But if the endorsers be
potent, grave and reverend seniors, schooled as
aforesaid
;
why then, one difficulty at least is removed; for
though it is well known, that these are endorsers
without
recourse in the first instance, it is equally well
known, that they may be ultimately made liable; for if
the juniors fail to fulfil their engagements, a lady has
nothing
to do, but to walk into the card room, take a senior
by the nape of the neck, lead him into the ball room,
present her ticket with his name upon it, in the presence
of the witnesses there assembled, and she is sure of
ample satisfaction.
When De Bathle and I reached the ball room, a large
number of gentlemen had already assembled. They
all seemed cheerful and happy. Some walked in
couples
up and down the ball room, and talked with great
volubility; but none of them understood a word that
himself or his companion said.
Ah, sir; how do you know that?
Because the speakers showed plainly by their looks
and actions, that their thoughts were running upon their
own personal appearance, and upon the figure they
would cut, before the ladies, when they should arrive;
and not upon the subject of the discourse. And
furthermore
,
their conversation was like that of one talking in
his sleep,without order, sense, or connexion. The
hearer always made the speaker repeat in sentences and
half sentences; often interrupting him with what?
before he had proceeded three words in a remark; and
then laughed affectedly, as though he saw in the
senseless
unfinished sentence, a most excellent joke. Then
would come his reply, which could not be forced into
connexion with a word that he had heard; and in the
course of which, he was treated with precisely the
civility
which he had received. And yet they kept up
the conversation with lively interest, as long as I listened
to them.
Others employed themselves in commenting,
good-humoredly
,
upon each other's dresses, and figure; while
some took stepsawkwardly.
In the mean time the three junior managers met and
agreed upon the parts which they were to perform.
Herein I thought they were unfortunate. To Mr. Flirt,
a bustling, fidgety, restless little man, about five feet
two and a half inches high, was assigned the
comparatively
easy task of making out and distributing the
numbers
.
Mr. Crouch, a good humored, sensible, but rather
unpolished gentleman, undertook to attend the carriages,
and to transport their precious treasures to the ball-room,
where Mr. Dupree was to receive them, and see to their
safe keeping, until the dancing commenced. The parts
of the married men, up to the opening of the ball, was
settled by common law. They were to keep a sharp
look out, lend a helping hand in case of emergency,
drink plenty of wine, see that other gentlemen,
particularly
strangers, did the same; and finally, to give any
gentleman, who might have come to the ball, encumbered
with a little loose change, an opportunity of relieving
himself.
Things were thus arranged, Crouch standing with a
group of gentlemen, of which I was one, in the entry
leading to the ball room; when Mr. Flirt broke upon
us as if the whole town was on fire, and all the *******
had risen, with Good God, Crouch! There's Mrs.
Mushy's carriage at the door, full of ladies, and not a
manager there to recive them! I'll swear it is too bad!
Horrible! said Crouch; and away he went. But
Mrs. Mushy, with Miss Feedle and Deedle, had reached
the foot of the stairs unattended, before Crouch or even
Flirt, who was considerably in advance of him, met
them. Mrs. Mushy, who was a lady of very full habit,
looked huffishly as Flirt took her hand, and Miss Feedle,
and Miss Deedle blushed sarcastically; Flirt made a
hundred apologies, and Crouch looked first at Mrs.
Mushy, then at Flirt, and tittered. What a lovely
figure Mrs. Mushy is! said he, as he turned off from
delivering his charge to Dupree. Oh, Mr. Crouch,
said Flirt, if you begin making your fun of the ladies
a'-ready
,
we'd better break up the ball at once. By heaven,
it's a shame. Upon my honor, Mr. Flirt, said
Crouch, I think she's beautiful. I always liked a light
and airy figure; particularly for a ball room. By
this time Dupree had joined us. Flirt left us, obviously
in a pet; but we hardly missed him, before back he
rushed
from the ball room, exclaiming, Why, gracious
heavens
,
Dupree! there are those three ladies sitting in the
ball room, and not a gentleman in the room to entertain
them. Do go and introduce some of the gentlemen to
them, if you please. Flugens! said Dupree, what
an oversight! and off he went for
entertainers
. After
several ineffectual attempts, he at length prevailed on Mr.
Noozle and Mr. Boozle to be made acquainted with the
ladies.
Mr. N. seated himself to the right of Mr. F., and Mr.
B. to the left of Miss D.; Mrs. M. occupying a seat
between
the girls, and looking, for all the world, as if she
thoughtWell, this is the last ball I'll ever attend,
unless
it's a little better managed. But the young ladies
looked like a May morning, as soon as the gentlemen
approached. After a pause of two minutes,
It's a very pleasant evening, said Mr. Noozle to
Miss Feedle.
Delightful, said Miss Feedle to Mr. Noozle.
It's a delightful evening, said Miss Deedle to Mr.
Boozle.
Very pleasant, said Mr. Boozle to Miss Deedle.
I thought there were some
married
managers of the
ball, said Mrs. Mushy, emphatically. Here ensued a
long pause.
Are you fond of dancing? said Mr. Noozle.
Ah! what's that you say, Noozle?said Boozle;
you are not fond of dancing! Come, come, that'll
never do. You tip the pigeon-wing too well for that.
You quite misapprehend me, sir, returned Mr.
Noozle
.
Mine was not a declaration, touching in the
remotest
degree my personal predilections or antipathies,
but a simple interrogatory to Miss Feedle. No sir;
though I cannot lay claim to the proficiency of Noverre,
in the saltant art, I am, nevertheless, extravagantly fond
of dancing; too much so, I fear, for one who has but just
commenced the
veginti lucubrationes annorum
, as that
inimitable, and fascinating expositor of the elements of
British jurisprudence, Sir William Blackstone,
observes
.
To reach these high attainments in
forensic
Here the young gentlemen were forced to resign
their seats to a number of ladies, who now entered the
ball room.
What an intelligent young gentleman! said Miss
FeedleI declare I must set my cap for him.
I think the other much the most interesting of the
two, said Miss Deedle. He's too affected, and too
fond of showing off his learning. What did he call
that inimitable expositor?
Jinny Crashonis
.
The seats were soon filled with ladies; almost all of
whom, (except Mrs. Mushy,) entered the room in the
same style, which seemed to have been strictly copied from
the movement of the kildee. They took their seats, with
precisely the motion with which the school-girls, in my
younger days, used to make
cheeses
, as they called
them, with their frocks.
The musicians were all blacks, but neatly dressed.
The band consisted of three performers on the violin,
one on the clarionet, one on the tamborine, and one on
the triangle.
The ladies ceased coming, and nothing seemed now
wanting to begin the amusement, but the distribution of
the numbers; but Mr. Flirt was running up and down
stairs every minute afterno one knew what; and
with great anxiety, no one knew why. He would enter
the room, look the ladies all over, then down he would
go; then return and go through the same evolutions.
The band struck up a spirit-stirring tune, in which the
tamborine player distinguished himself. For dignified
complaisancy of countenance, under his own music, he
rivalled Mr. Jenkins; and he performed the rattle-snake
note with his middle finger, in a style which threw Miss
Crump entirely in the shade. The band ceased, and
the enquiry became general, Why doesn't the drawing
begin? but Mr. Flirt still kept up his anxious
movements
.
In the name of sense, Flirt, said Crouch,
impatiently
,
as the little man was taking a third survey of the
ladies, what are you bobbing up and down stairs for?
Why don't you distribute the tickets?
Oh, said Flirt, it's early yet. Let's wait for
Miss Gilt and Miss Rino. I know they're coming, for
Mr. Posey, and Mr. Tulip told me they saw them
dressed, and their carriages at the door, an hour ago.
Blast Miss Gilt and Miss Rino! returned Crouch.
Is the whole company to be kept waiting for them?
Now, sir, if the tickets are not handed round in three
minutes, I'll announce to the company that Mr. Flirt
will permit no dancing until Miss Gilt and Miss Rino,
shall think proper to honor us with their presence.
Oh, zounds! said Flirt, I'm not waiting for them.
I thought it was too early to begin the
drawing
.
It's quite unfashionable in New-York to commence
drawing before 9 o'clock. (Miss R.'s father was
computed
at a cool hundred and fifty, and Miss G.'s at a
round hundred thousand.)
In a few minutes the tickets were distributed, and Mr.
Flirt proceeded to call, No. I
First Cotillon
, with
most imposing majesty. Then numbers 2, 3 and 4, of
the same; then No. 1, of the second, and so on.
Five sets of cotillons could occupy the floor at a time;
and Flirt had just called No. 2, of the fifth, when Miss
Rino entered the room, and immediately afterwards Miss
Gilt. Flirt had put two supernumerary tickets in the
hat, in anticipation of their coming; and forgetting every
thing else, he suspended the calling, and rushed to
deliver
them, as soon as the ladies made their
appearance
.
He went to Miss Rino first, as she entered first; but
she was obviously piqued at seeing the sets on the floor
before her arrival. She refused to take a number;
declaring
,
(very sweetly,) that she left home with no idea of
dancing. Flirt insisted, earnestly and prettily, upon
her taking a number; but she hesitated, looked in the
hat, then looked at Flirt bewitchingly, and declared she
did not wish to dance.
In the mean time Miss Gilt began to feel herself
slighted
,
and she said, in a pretty audible tone, as for her
part, she would like very well to draw a number if she
could be permitted to do so. Several gentlemen who
had gathered around her, hastened to Flirt to remind
him of the indignity which he was offering to Miss Gilt;
but before they reached him, Miss Rino drew No. 3, of
the fifth cotillon from the hat.
Unfortunately, Crouch's patience had worn out, just
before Miss R. made up her mind to take a ticket; and
he took the office which Flirt had abdicated. He called
No. 3 twice; but the call was not responded to. He
then called No. 4, when Miss Jones appeared, and took
her place. He next called No. 1, of the sixth set, when
a lady appeared, which completed the cotillon. The last
lady had but just taken her place, when Miss Rino, led
on by Mr. Noozle, advanced, and announced that her's
was No. 3, of the fifth set. Miss Jones was instinctively
retiring from the august presence of Miss Rino, when
she was stopped by Crouch, with Keep your place,
Miss Jones, I think you are entitled to it.
Is'nt this No 3, of the fifth cotillon? said Miss Rino,
holding out her ticket to Mr. Crouch.
Yes, Miss, said Crouch, but I think it has forfeited
its place. Indeed, I do not think it was even drawn,
when Miss Jones took her place.
l
This drew from Miss Rino the expression of
countenance
,
which immediately precedes a sneeze.
Upon every principle of equity and justice, said
Mr. Boozle, Miss Rino is entitled to
Music! said Crouch.
Hands round! said the fiddler; and the whole band
struck into something like The Dead March.
This matter shall not end here, said Noozle, as he
led Miss Rino back to her seat.
Oh, Mr. Noozle, returned Miss Rino, don't think
any thing of it. I declare I had not the least wish in
the world to dance. Surely you would not object to
any thing the
polite
and
accomplished Mr. Crouch
would do!
Noozle walked the floor in portentous abstraction
wiped his face with terrific emphasisand knocked his
hair back with the slap belligerent.
The ladies who were not dancing became alarmed
and sedate: (Miss Gilt excepted;) the gentlemen
collected
in groups, and carried on an animated
conversation
.
As all but myself, who could give a correct
version
of the affair, were engaged in the dance, the Noozle
party had gained over to their side most the company
present, before the dance ended. After various
enquiries
,
rumors and corrections, the company generally
settled down upon the following statement, as confirmed
by the joint testimony of Rino, Flirt and Noozle.
Crouch had an old spite against Miss Rino, for
nothing
at allBegan cursing and abusing her because she
was not the first lady in the roomRefused to wait two
minutes for her arrivalAs soon as he saw her enter
the ball room, usurped Mr. Flirt's appointment, and
commenced
calling the numbers on purpose to cut her out.
She, seeing his object, snatched up a number, and rushed
to her place; but it was occupied by Miss Jones; who
seeing the superiority of her claims, offered to give way;
and was actually retiring, when Crouch seized her by
the arm, jerked her back, and said
Keep your place,
Miss! You're entitled to it, if Miss Rino has got the
number; and you shall have it
. And when Mr.
Noozle
was pleading with him just to look at Miss Rino's
ticket, he just turned upon his heel, and called for the
music. This was all reported to Crouch, as confirmed
by the trio before mentioned. He pronounced it all an
infamous
lie, from beginning to end, and was with difficulty
restrained from going immediately after Flirt, to pick
him up, as he said, and wear him out upon Noozle.
As soon as the first cotillon ended, the Crouch party
began to gain ground; but not without warm words
between
several gentlemen, and a general depression of
spirits through the company.
The dancing of the ladies was, with few exceptions,
much after the same fashion. I found not the least
difficulty
in resolving it into the three motions, of a
turkey-cock
strutting, a sparrow-hawk lighting, and a duck
walking. Let the reader suppose a lady beginning a
strut at her own place, and ending it (precisely as does
the turkey-cock,) three feet nearer the gentleman
opposite
her; then giving three sparrow-hawk bobs, and
then waddling back to her place like a duck; and he
will have a pretty correct idea of their dancing. Not
that the three movements were blended at every turn of
the dance; but that one or more of the three answered
to every turn. The strut prevailed most in ballancing;
the bobs, when ballanced to; and the waddle, when
going round. To all this, Mrs. Mushy was an
exception
.
When she danced, every particle of her danced,
in spite of herself.
There was as little variety in the gentlemen's dancing
as there was in the ladies'. Any one who has seen a
gentleman clean mud off his shoes on a door mat, has
seen nearly all of it; the principal difference being, that
some scraped with a pull of the foot, some with a push,
and some with both.
I suppose, said I to a gentleman, they take no
steps because the music will not admit of them?
Oh no, said he; It's quite ungenteel to take steps.
I thought of the wag's remarks about Miss Crump's
music. If this be their
dancing
, thought I, what
must their
mourning
be!
A splendid supper was prepared at twelve o'clock; and
the young ladies ate almonds, raisins, apples, oranges,
jelly, sillabub, custard, candy, sugar-plums, kisses and
cake, as if they had been owing them an old grudge.
But the married gentlemen did not come up to supper.
And how did the quarrel end?
Oh; I had like to have forgot the denouement of the
quarrel.
A correspondence opened the next morning between
the parties, in which Noozle was diffuse, and Crouch
laconic
.
They once came this near an amicable
adjustment
of the difference. Noozle's second, (for the
fashion
is, for the principals to get into quarrels, and for the
seconds to get them out,) agreed, if Crouch would strike
the word it, out of one of his letters, his friend would
be perfectly satisfied.
Mr. Crouch's second admitted that the removal of the
word would not change the sense of the letter the least;
but that Mr. Crouch having put his life and character in
his hands, he felt bound to protect them with the most
scrupulous fidelity; he could not therefore consent to
expunge the objectionable word, unless the challenge
were withdrawn. To show, however, his reluctance to
the shedding of blood; and to acquit his friend, in the eyes
of the public, of all blame, he would take it upon himself
to say, that if Mr. Noozle would withdraw his objections
to the t Mr. Crouch should expunge the i. This
proposition was rejected; but in return, it was submitted,
that if Mr. Crouch would expunge the t the i
might remain. To which it was replied, that the
alteration
would convert the whole sentence into nonsense;
making it read
i is
, instead of
it is
, &c. Here
the seconds separated, and soon after the principals met;
and Crouch shot Noozle, in due form, and according to
the latest fashion, through the knees. I went to see him
after he had received his wound; and poor fellow, he
suffered dreadful tortures. So much, said I, for a young
lady's lingering from a ball an hour too long, in order to
make herself conspicuous.
BALDWIN.
THE MOTHER AND HER CHILD.
Whence comes the gibberish which is almost invariably
used by mothers and nurses, to infants? Take for
example
the following, which will answer the two-fold
purpose
of illustrating my idea, and of exhibiting one of the
peculiarities of the age.
A few days ago, I called to spend an hour in the
afternoon
,
with Mr. Slang, whose wife is the mother of a child
about eight months old.
While I was there, the child in the nurse's arms, in an
adjoining room, began to cry.
12
You rose, said Mrs. Slang, quiet that child!
Rose walked it, and sang to it; but it did not hush.
You Rose! if you do not quiet that child, I lay I
make you.
I is tried, ma'am, said Rose, an' he would'nt get
hushed(
Child cries louder
.)
Fetch him here to me, you good for nothing hussy
you. What's the matter with him? reaching out her
arms to receive him.
I dun know ma'am.
Nheinhunnhonha'am! (
mocking and
grinning
at Rose
.)
As Rose delivered the child, she gave visible signs of
dodging, just as the child left her arms; and, that she
might not be disappointed, Mrs. Slang gave her a box:
in which there seemed to be no anger mixed at all;
and which Rose received
as a matter of course
,
without
even changing countenance under it.
Da den! said Mrs. Slang, come elong e muddy
(mother.) Did nassy Yosey, (Rose,) pague muddy
thweety chilluns? (children)pressing the child to her
bosom, and rocking it backward and forward tenderly.
Muddins will whippy ole nassy Yosey. Ah! you old
uggy Yosey, (
knocking at Rose playfully
.) Da den;
muddy did wippy bad Yosey.
(
Child continues crying
.)
Why what upon earth ails the child? Rose, you've
hurt this child, somehow or other!
No m'm, 'cla' I didn'tI was jis sitt'n down dar in
the rock'n chair long side o' Miss Nancy's bureau, an'
want doin' nothin' 't all to him, jis playin' wid him, and
he jis begin to cry heself, when nobody wa'n't doin'
nothin' 't all to him, and nobody wa'nt in dar nuther
sept jis me and him, and I was
Nhingnhingnhingand I expect you hit his
head against the bureau.
Let Muddy see where ole bad Yosey knocky heady
'gin de bureaus. Muddy
will
see, taking off the child's
cap, and finding nothing.
(
Child cries on
.)
Muddy's baby was hongry. Dat was what ails
muddy's darling, thsweety ones. Was cho hongry, an'
nobody would givy litty darling any sings 't all for eaty?'
(
loosing her frock bosom
.) No, nobody would gim
tshweety ones any sings fo'eat 't all(
offers the breast
to the child, who rejects it, rolls over, kicks, and screams
worse than ever
.)
Hush! you little brat! I believe it's nothing in the
world but crossness. Hush! (
shaking it
,) hush I tell
you. (
Child cries to the
NE PLUS ULTRA.)
Why surely a pin must stick the child.Yes, was
e bad pin did ticky chilluns. Let muddy see where de
uggy pin did ticky dear prettous creter(
examining
)
Why no, it isn't a pin. Why what can be the
matter
with the child! It must have the cholic surely.
Rose, go bring me the paragoric off the mantle-piece.
Yes, muddy's baby did hab e tolic. Dat was what did
ail muddy's prettous darly baby. (
Pressing it to her
bosom and rocking it. Child cries on
.)
Rose brought the paragoric, handed it, dodged, and
got her expectations realized as before.
Now go bring me the sugar, and some water.
Rose brought them, and delivered both without the
customary reward; for at that instant, the child being
laid perfectly still on the lap, hushed.
The paragoric was administered, and the child
received
it with only a whimper now and then. As soon
as it received the medicine, the mother raised it up and
it began to cry.
Why Lord help my soul, what's the matter with the
child! what have you done to him, you little hussy?
(
rising and walking towards Rose
.)
'Cla' Missis, I eint done nothin' 't allwas jis sittin'
down da by Miss Nancy's bu
You lie, you slut, (
hitting her a passing slap
,) I
know you've hurt him. Hush, my baby, (
singing the
Coquet
,) don't you cry, your sweet-heart will come
by'm'by; da, de dum dum dum day, da de dum diddle
dum dum day.
(
Child cries on
.)
Lord help my soul and body, what can be the
matter
with my baby! (
tears coming in her own eyes
.)
Something's the matter with it; I know it is, (
laying
the child on her lap, and feeling its arms, to see whether
it flinched at the touch of any particular part
.) But
the child cried less while she was feeling it than before.
Yes, dat was it; wanted litty arms yubb'd. Mud
will yub its sweet little arms.
(
Child begins again
.)
What upon earth can make my baby cry so!
rising
and walking to the window. (
Stops at the window,
and the child hushes
.)
Yes, dat was it: did want to look out 'e windys.
See the petty chickens. O-o-o-h! Look, at, the beauty,
rooster!! Yonder's old aunt Betty! See old aunt
Betty, pickin' up chips. Yes, ole aunt Betty, pickin' up
chip fo' bake bicky, (biscuit) fo' good chilluns. Good
aunt Betty fo' make bicky fo' sweet baby's supper.
(
Child begins again
.)
Hoo-o-o! see de windy! (
knocking on the
window
.
Child screams
.
You Rose, what have you done to this child! You
little hussy you, if you don't tell me how you hurt him,
I'll whip you as long as I can find you.
Missis I 'cla I never done noth'n' 't all to him. I
was jis sett'n' down da by Miss Nancy's bu
If you say `
Miss Nancy's bureau
' to me again, I'll
stuff Miss Nancy's bureau down your throat, you little
lying slut. I'm just as sure you've hurt him, as if I'd
seen you. How did you hurt him?
Here Rose was reduced to a
non plus;
for, upon the
peril of having a bureau stuffed down her throat, she
dare not repeat the oft-told tale, and she knew no other.
She therefore stood mute.
Julia, said Mr. Slang, bring the child to me, and
let me see if I can discover the cause of his crying.
Mr. Slang took the child, and commenced a careful
examination of it. He removed its cap, and beginning
at the crown of its head, he extended the search slowly
and cautiously downward, accompanying the eye with
the touch of the finger. He had not proceeded far in
this way, before he discovered in the right ear of the
child, a small feather, the cause, of course, of all its
wailing. The cause removed, the child soon changed
its tears to smiles, greatly to the delight of all, and to
none more than to Rose.
BALDWIN.
THE DEBATING SOCIETY.
The following is not strictly a
Georgia Scene;
but as Georgians were the chief actors in it, it may
perhaps
be introduced, with propriety, in these sketches.
About three and twenty years ago, at the celebrated
school in Wn, was formed a Debating Society,
composed of young gentlemen between the ages of
seventeen
and twenty-two. Of the number were two, who,
rather from an uncommon volubility, than from any
superior
gifts or acquirements, which they possessed over
their associates, were by common consent, placed at the
head of the fraternity.At least this was true of one of
them: the other certainly had higher claims to his
distinction
.
He was a man of the highest order of
intellect
,
who, though he has since been known throughout
the Union, as one of the ablest speakers in the country,
seems to me to have added but little to his powers in
debate, since he passed his twenty-second year. The
name of the first, was Longworth; and McDermot was
the name of the last. They were congenial spirits,
warm friends, and classmates, at the time of which I am
speaking.
It was a rule of the Society, that every member should
speak upon the subjects chosen for discussion, or pay a
fine; and as all the members valued the little stock of
change, with which they were furnished, more than they
did their reputation for oratory; not a fine had been
imposed
for a breach of this rule, from the organization of
the society to this time.
The subjects for discussion, were proposed by the
members, and selected by the President, whose
prerogative
it was also to arrange the speakers on either side, at
his pleasure; though in selecting the subjects, he was
influenced not a little, by the members who gave their
opinions freely of those which were offered.
It was just as the time was approaching, when most of
the members were to leave the society, some for college,
and some for the busy scenes of life, that McDermot
went to share his classmate's bed for a night. In the
course of the evening's conversation, the society came
upon the tapis. Mac, said Longworth, would'nt
we have rare sport, if we could impose a subject upon
the society, which has no sense in it, and hear the
members
speak upon it?
Zounds, said McDermot, it would be the finest
fun in the world. Let's try it at all eventswe can
lose nothing by the experiment.
A sheet of foolscap was immediately divided between
them, and they industriously commenced the difficult
task of framing sentences, which should possess the
form
of a debateable question, without a particle of the
substance
.After
an hour's toil, they at length exhibited
the fruits of their labor, and after some reflection, and
much laughing, they selected, from about thirty subjects
proposed, the following, as most likely to be received by
the society:
Whether at public elections, should the votes
of faction predominate by internal suggestions or
the bias of jurisprudence
.?
Longworth was to propose it to the society, and
McDermot
was to advocate its adoption.As they had
every reason to suppose, from the practice of the past,
that they would be placed at the head of the list of
disputants
,
and on opposite sides, it was agreed between them,
in case the experiment should succeed, that they would
write off, and interchange their speeches, in order that
each might quote literally from the other, and thus
seem
at least, to understand each other.
The day at length came for the triumph or defeat of
the project; and several accidental circumstances
conspired
to crown it with success. The society had
entirely
exhausted their subjects; the discussion of the day
had been protracted to an unusual length, and the horns
of the several boarding-houses began to sound, just as it
ended. It was at this auspicious moment, that
Longworth
rose, and proposed his subject. It was caught at
with rapture by McDermot, as being decidedly the best,
that had ever been submitted; and he wondered that
none of the members had ever thought of it before.
It was no sooner proposed, than several members
exclaimed
,
that they did not understand it; and demanded
an explanation from the mover. Longworth replied,
that there was no time then for explanations, but that
either himself or Mr. McDermot would explain it, at
any other time.
Upon the credit of the
maker
and
endorser
, the
subject
was accepted; and under pretence of economising
time, (but really to avoid a repitition of the question,)
Longworth kindly offered to record it, for the Secretary.
This labor ended, he announced that he was prepared
for the arrangement of the disputants.
Put yourself, said the President, on the
affirmative
,
and Mr. McDermot on the negative.
The subject, said Longworth, cannot well be
resolved into an affirmative and negative. It consists
more properly, of two conflicting affirmatives: I have
therefore drawn out the heads, under which the speakers
are to be arranged thus:
Internal Suggestions. Bias of Jurisprudence
.
Then put yourself Internal SuggestionsMr.
McDermot
the other side, Mr. Craig on your sideMr.
Pentigall the other side, and so on.
Mc Dermot and Longworth now determined that they
would not be seen by any other member of the society
during the succeeding week, except at times when
explanations
could not be asked, or when they were too
busy to give them. Consequently, the week passed
away, without any explanations; and the members were
summoned to dispose of the important subject, with
no other lights upon it than those which they could
collect
from its terms. When they assembled, there was
manifest alarm on the countenances of all but two of
them.
The Society was opened in due form, and Mr.
Longworth
was called on to open the debate. He rose and
proceeded as follows:
Mr. President
The subject selected for this day's
discussion, is one of vast importance, pervading the
profound
depths of psychology, and embracing within its
comprehensive range, all that is interesting in morals,
government, law and politics. But, sir, I shall not
follow
it through all its interesting and diversified
ramifications
;
but endeavor to deduce from it those great and
fundamental principles, which have direct bearing, upon
the antagonist positions of the disputants; confining
myself
more immediately to its psycological influence,
when exerted, especially upon the
votes of faction:
for here is the point upon which the question mainly
turns. In the next place, I shall consider the effects of
those suggestions emphatically termed
internal
when applied to the same subject. And in the third
place, I shall compare these effects, with the bias of
jurisprudence, considered as the only resort in times of
popular excitementfor these are supposed to exist by
the very terms of the question.
The first head of this arrangement, and indeed the
whole subject of dispute, has already been disposed of
by this society. We have discussed the question, are
there any innate maxims? and with that subject and
this, there is such an intimate affinity, that it is
impossible
to disunite them, without prostrating the vital
energies
of both, and introducing the wildest disorder and
confusion, where, by the very nature of things, there
exists the most harmonious coincidences, and the most
m
happy and euphonic congenialities. Here then might I
rest, Mr. President, upon the decision of this society,
with perfect confidence. But, sir, I am not forced to
rely upon the inseparable affinities of the two questions,
for success in this dispute, obvious as they must be to
every reflecting mind. All history, ancient and modern,
furnish examples corroborative of the views which I
have taken of this deeply interesting subject.By what
means did the renowned poets, philosophers, orators and
statesmen of antiquity, gain their immortality? Whence
did Milton, Shakspeare, Newton, Locke, Watts, Paley,
Burke, Chatham, Pitt. Fox, and a host of others whom
I might name, pluck their never-fading laurels! I
answer
boldly, and without the fear of contradiction, that,
though they all reached the temple of fame by different
routes, they all passed through the broad vista of
internal
suggestions
. The same may be said of
Jefferson
,
Madison, and many other distinguished personages
of our own country.
I challenge the gentlemen on the other side to
produce
examples like these in support of their cause.
Mr. Longworth pressed these profound and logical
views to a length to which our limits will not permit us to
follow him, and which the reader's patience would hardly
bear, if they would. Perhaps, however, he will bear
with us, while we give the conclusion of Mr.
Longworth's
remarks: as it was here, that he put forth all
his strength:
Mr. President
Let the bias of jurisprudence
predominate
,
and how is it possible, (considering it merely
as extending to those impulses which may with propriety
be termed a
bias
,) how is it possible, for a government
to exist, whose object is the public good! The
marble-hearted
marauder might seize the throne of civil
authority
,
and hurl into thraldom the votaries of rational
liberty. Virtue, justice and all the nobler principles of
human nature, would wither away under the pestilential
breath of political faction, and an unnerved constitution,
be left to the sport of demagogue and parasite.Crash
after crash, would be heard in quick succession, as the
strong pillars of the republic give way, and Despotism
would shout in hellish triumph amidst the crumbling
ruinsAnarchy would wave her bloody sceptre over the
devoted land, and the blood-hounds of civil war, would
lap the crimson gore of our most worthy citizens. The
shrieks of women, and the screams of children, would
be drowned amidst the clash of swords, and the cannon's
peal: and Liberty, mantling her face from the horrid
scene, would spread her golden-tinted pinions, and wing
her flight to some far distant land, never again to re-visit
our peaceful shores. In vain should we then sigh for
the beatific reign of those suggestions which I am
proud to acknowledge as peculiarly and exclusively
`internal.'
Mr. McDermot rose promptly at the call of the
President
,
and proceeded as follows:
Mr. President
If I listened unmoved to the very
labored appeal to the passions, which has just been made,
it was not because I am insensible to the powers of
eloquence
;
but because I happen to be blessed with the
small measure of sense, which is necessary, to
distinguish
true eloquence from the wild ravings of an
unbridled
imagination. Grave and solemn appeals, when
ill-timed and misplaced, are apt to excite ridicule; hence
it was, that I detected myself more than once, in open
laughter, during the most pathetic parts of Mr.
Longworth's
argument, if so it can be called.
[9]
[9]
This was extemporaneous, and well conceived; for Mr.
McDermot
had not played his part with becoming gravity.
In the midst
of crashing pillars, crumbling ruins, shouting
despotism, screaming women, and flying Liberty,
the question was perpetually recurring to me, what has
all this to do with the subject of dispute? I will not
follow the example of that gentlemanIt shall be my
endeavor to clear away the mist which he has thrown
around the subject, and to place it before the society, in
a clear, intelligible point of view: for I must say, that
though his speech
bears strong marks of the pen
,
(sarcastically,) it has but few marks of sober
reflection
.
Some of it, I confess, is very intelligible and very
plausable; but most of it, I boldly assert, no man living
can comprehend. I mention this, for the edification of
that gentleman(who is usually clear and forcible,)
to teach him, that he is most successful when he labors
least.
Mr. President: The gentleman, in opening the
debate
,
stated that the question was one of vast importance;
pervading the profound depths of
psychology
, and
embracing
,
within its ample range, the whole circle of arts
and sciences. And really, sir, he has verified his
statement
;
for he has extended it over the whole moral and
physical world. But, Mr. President, I take leave to
differ from the gentleman, at the very threshhold of his
remarks. The subject is one which is confined within
very narrow limits. It extends no further than to the
elective franchise, and is not even commensurate with
this important privilege; for it stops short at the
vote of
faction
. In this point of light, the subject comes within
the grasp of the most common intellect; it is plain,
simple
,
natural and intelligible. Thus viewing it, Mr.
President
,
where does the gentleman find in it, or in all nature
besides, the original of the dismal picture which he has
presented to the society? It loses all its interest, and
becomes supremely ridiculous. Having thus, Mr.
President
,
divested the subject of all obscurityhaving reduced
it to those few elements, with which we are all familiar;
I proceed to make a few deductions from the premises,
which seem to me inevitable, and decisive of the
question
.
I lay it down as a self-evident proposition, that
faction in all its forms, is hideous; and I maintain, with
equal confidence, that it never has been, nor ever will
be, restrained by those suggestions, which the gentleman
emphatically terms internal
. No, sir, nothing short
of the bias, and the very strong bias too, of jurisprudence,
or the potent energies of the sword, can restrain it.
But, sir, I shall here, perhaps, be asked, whether there
is not a very wide difference between a turbulent, lawless
faction, and the
vote
of faction? Most unquestionably
there is; and to this distinction I shall presently advert,
and demonstrably prove that it is a distinction, which
makes altogether in our favor.
Thus did Mr. McDermot continue to dissect and
expose
his adversary's argument, in the most clear,
conclusive
and masterly manner, at considerable length.
But we cannot deal more favorably by him, than we
have dealt by Mr. Longworth. We must, therefore,
dismiss him, after we shall have given the reader his
concluding remarks. They were as follows:
Let us now suppose Mr. Longworth's principles
brought to the test of experiment. Let us suppose his
language addressed to all mankind`We close the
temples
of justice as useless; we burn our codes of laws as
worthless; and we substitute in their places, the more
valuable restraints of
internal suggestions
. Thieves,
invade not your neighbor's property: if you do, you will
be arraigned before the august tribunal of
conscience
.
Robbers, stay your lawless hand; or you will be visited
with the tremendous penalties of
psychology
.
Murderers
,
spare the blood of your fellow creatures; you will
be exposed to the excrutiating tortures of
inate maxims
m2
when it shall be discovered that there are any
. Mr.
President, could there be a broader license to crime than
this? Could a better plan be devised for dissolving the
bands of civil society? It requires not the gift of
prophecy
,
to foresee the consequences, of these novel and
monstrous principles. The strong would tyrannize over
the weak; the poor would plunder the rich; the servant
would rise above the master; the drones of society
would fatten upon the hard earnings of the industrious
Indeed, sir, industry would soon desert the land; for it
would have neither reward nor encouragement.
Commerce
would cease; the arts and sciences would
languish
;
all the sacred relations would be dissolved, and
scenes of havoc, dissolution and death ensue, such as
never before visited the world, and such as never will
visit it, until mankind learn to repose their destinies upon
those suggestions,
emphatically termed internal
.
From all these evils there is a secure retreat behind the
brazen wall of the `bias of jurisprudence.'
The gentleman who was next called on to engage in
the debate, was John Craig; a gentleman of good hard
sense, but who was utterly incompetent to say a word
upon a subject which he did not understand. He
proceeded
thus:
Mr. President
When this subject was proposed, I
candidly confessed I did not understand it, and I was
informed by Mr. Longworth and Mr. McDermot, that
either of them would explain it, at any leisure moment.
But, sir, they seem to have taken very good care, from
that time to this, to have no leisure moment. I have
inquired of both of them, repeatedly for an explanation;
but they were always too busy to talk about it. Well,
sir, as it was proposed by Mr. Longworth, I thought he
would certainly explain it in his speech; but I
understood
no more of his speech than I did of the subject.
Well, sir, I thought I should certainly learn something
from Mr. McDermot; especially as he promised at the
commencement of his speech to clear away the mist that
Mr. Longworth had thrown about the subject, and to
place it in a clear, intelligible point of light. But, sir,
the only difference between his speech and Mr.
Longworth's
,
is, that it was not quite as flighty as Mr.
Longworth's. I could n't understand head nor tail of
it. At one time they seemed to argue the question, as
if it were this: Is it better to have law or no law?
At another, as though it was, should faction be
governed
by law, or be left to their own consciences?
But most of the time they argued it, as if it were, just
what it seems to bea sentence without sense or
meaning
.
But, sir, I suppose its obscurity is owing to my
dullness of apprehensionfor they appeared to argue it
with great earnestness and feeling, as if they
understood
it.
I shall put my interpretation upon it, Mr. President,
and argue it accordingly.
`
Whether at public elections
'that is, for
members
of Congress, members of the Legislature, &c.
`SHOULD THE VOTES
of faction
'I don't know what `
faction
'
has got to do with it; and therefore I shall throw
it out. `
Should the votes predominate, by internal
suggestions or the bias
'I don't know what the
article
is put in here for. It seems to me, it seems to be,
be
BIASED
by
`jurisprudence' or lawIn short, Mr.
President
,
I understand the question to be, should a man vote
as he pleases, or should the law say how he should
vote?
Here Mr. Longworth rose and observed, that though
Mr. Craig was on his side, he felt it due to their
adversaries
,
to state, that this was not a true exposition of the
subject. This exposition settled the question at once on
his side; for nobody would, for a moment, contend, that
the law
should declare how men should vote. Unless
it be confined to the vote
of faction
and
the
bias of
jurisprudence, it was no subject at all. To all this Mr.
McDermot signified his unqualified approbation; and
seemed pleased with the candor of his opponent.
Well, said Mr. Craig, I thought it was impossible
that any one should propose such a question as that to the
society; but will Mr. Longworth tell us, if it does not
mean that, what does it mean? for I don't see what great
change is made in it by his explanation.
Mr. Longworth replied, that if the remarks which he
had just made, and his argument, had not fully
explained
the subject to Mr. Craig, he feared it would be out of
his power to explain it.
Then, said Mr. Craig, I'll pay my fine, for I don't
understand a word of it.
The next one summoned to the debate was Mr.
Pentigall
.
Mr. Pentigall was one of those who would
never acknowledge his ignorance of any thing, which
any person else understood; and that Longworth and
McDermot were both masters of the subject, was clear,
both from their fluency and seriousness. He therefore
determined to understand it, at all hazards.
Consequently
he rose at the President's command, with
considerable
self-confidence. I regret, however, that it is
impossible to commit Mr. Pentigall's
manner
to paper,
without which, his remarks loss nearly all their interest.
He was a tall, handsome man; a little theatric in his
manner, rapid in his delivery, and singular in his
pronunciation
.
He gave to the
e
and
i
, of our language,
the sound of
u
at least his peculiar intonations of voice,
seemed to give them that sound; and his rapidity or
utterance seemed to change the termination,
tion
into
ah
. With all his peculiarities, however, he was a
fine fellow. If he was ambitious, he was not invidious,
and he possessed an amicable disposition. He proceeded
as follows:
Mr. President
This internal suggestion which has
been so eloquently discussed by Mr. Longworth, and the
bias of jurisprudence which has been so ably advocated
by Mr. McDermothem!Mr. President, in order to
fix the line of demarkation betweenahthe internal
suggestion and the bias of jurisprudenceMr. President,
I think, sir, thatahthe subject must be confined to
the
vote of faction
, and
the
bias of jurisprudence.
Here Mr. Pentigall clapt his right hand to his
forehead
,
as though he had that moment heard some
overpowering news; and after maintaining this position
for about the space of ten seconds, he slowly withdrew
his hand, gave his head a slight inclination to the right,
raised his eyes to the President as if just awakening
from a trance, and with a voice of the most hopeless
despair, concluded with I dont understand the subject,
Muster Prusidunt.
The rest of the members on both sides submitted to
be fined rather than attempt the knotty subject; but by
common consent, the penal rule was dispensed with.
Nothing now remained to close the exercises, but the
decision of the Chair.
The President, John Nuble, was a young man, not
unlike Craig in his turn of mind; though he possessed
an intellect a little more sprightly than Craig's.His
decision was short.
Gentlemen, said he, I do not understand the
subject
.
This, continued he (pulling out his knife, and
pointing to the silvered or
cross
side of it) is `Internal
Suggestions.' And this (pointing to the other, or
pile
side) is `Bias of Jurisprudence': so saying, he threw
up his knife, and upon its fall, determined that `Internal
Suggestions' had got it; and ordered the decision to be
registered accordingly.
It is worthy of note, that in their zeal to accomplish
their purpose, Longworth and McDermot forgot to
destroy
the lists of subjects, from which they had selected
the one so often mentioned; and one of these lists
containing
the subject discussed, with a number more like it,
was picked up by Mr. Craig, who made a public
exhibition
of it, threatening to arraign the conspirators before
the society, for a contempt. But, as the parting hour
was at hand, he overlooked it with the rest of the
brotherhood
,
and often laughed heartily at the trick.
HALL.
THE MILITIA COMPANY DRILL.
[10]
[10]
This is from the pen of a friend, who has kindly permitted me to
place it among the
Georgia Scenes
It was taken from the life,
and published about twenty years ago.
The Author
.
I happened, not long since, to be present at the muster
of a captain's company, in a remote part of one of the
counties; and as no general description could convey
an accurate idea of the achievements of that day, I must
be permitted to go a little into detail, as well as my
recollection
will serve me.
The men had been notified to meet at nine o'clock,
armed and equipped as the law directs; that is to say,
with a gun and cartridge box at least, but, as directed by
the law of the United States, with a good firelock, a
sufficient bayonet and belt, and a pouch with a box to
contain no less than twenty-four sufficient cartridges
of powder and ball.
At twelve, about one third, perhaps one half, of the
men had collected, and an inspector's return of the
number
present, and of their arms, would have stood nearly
thus: I captain, 1 lieutenant, ensign, none; fifers, none;
privates, present 24; ditto, absent 40; guns, 14;
gun-locks
,
12; ramrods, 10; rifle pouches, 3; bayonets,
none; belts, none; spare flints, none; cartridges, none;
horsewhips, walking canes and umbrellas, 10. A
little before one, the captain, whom I shall distinguish
by the name of Clodpole, gave directions for forming
the line of parade. In obedience to this order, one
of the sergeants, whose lungs had long supplied the
place of a drum and fife, placed himself in front of
the house, and began to ball with great vehemence,
All Captain Clodpole's company parade here! Come
Gentlemen
, parade here! says heall you that has
n't got guns fall into the lower
eend
. He might have
bawled till this time, with as little success as the syrens
sung to Ulysses, had he not changed his post to a
neighboring
shade. There he was immediately joined by all
who were then at leisure; the others were at that time
engaged as parties or spectators at a game of fives, and
could not just then attend. However, in less than half
an hour the game was finished, and the captain enabled
to form his company, and proceed in the duties of the day.
Look to the right and dress!
They were soon, by the help of the non-commissioned
officers, placed in a straight line; but, as every man
was anxious to see how the rest stood, those on the
wings pressed forward for that purpose, till the whole
line assumed nearly the form of a crescent.
Why, look at 'em, says the captain; why,
gentlemen
,
you are all a crooking in at both
eends
, so that you
will get on to me bye and bye! Come, gentlemen,
dress, dress!
This was accordingly done; but, impelled by the
same motives as before, they soon resumed their former
figure, and so they were permitted to remain.
Now, gentlemen, says the captain, I am going to
carry you through the
revolutions
of the manuel
exercise
,
and I want you, gentlemen, if you please, to pay
particular attention to the word of command, just exactly
as I give it out to you. I hope you will have a little
patience, gentlemen, if you please, and if I should be
agoing wrong, I will be much obliged to any of you,
gentlemen, to put me right again, for I mean all for the
best, and I hope you will excuse me if you please. And
one thing, gentlemen, I caution you against, in
particular
and
that is thisnot to make any
mistakes
if you
can possibly help it; and the best way to do this, will
be to do all the motions right at first; and that will help
us to get along so much the faster; and I will try to
have it over as soon as possible.Come boys, come to
a shoulder.
Poise, foolk!
[11]
[11]
A contraction and corruption of Firelock. Thus: Firelock,
f'lock, foolk.
Cock, foolk!
Very handsomely done.
Take aim!
Ram down catridge!
No! No!
Fire!
I recollect
now that firing comes next after taking aim, according
to Steuben; but, with your permission, gentlemen, I'll
read
the words of command just exactly as they are
printed in the book, and then I shall be sure to be right.
Oh yes! read it Captain, read it! (exclaimed twenty
voices at once;) that will save time.
'
Tention the whole!
Please to observe, gentlemen,
that at the word fire! you must fire; that is, if any
of your guns are
loaden'd
, you must not shoot in
yearnest
,
but only make pretence like; and you, gentlemen
fellow soldiers, who's armed with nothing but sticks,
riding switches and corn stalks, need n't go through the
firings, but stand as you are, and keep yourselves to
yourselves.
Half cock, foolk!
Very well done.
S, h, e, t
, (spelling)
Shet pan!
That too would have
been handsomely done, if you had'nt handled cartridge
instead of shetting pan; but I suppose you was n't
noticing
.Now
'tention one and all, gentlemen, and do that
motion again.
Shet pan!
Very good, very well indeed; you did
that motion equal to any old soldieryou improve
astonishingly
.
Handle cartridge!
Pretty well, considering you done
it wrong end foremost, as if you took the cartridge out
of your mouth, and bit off the twist with the cartridge
box.
Draw rammer!
Those who have no rammers to
their guns need not draw, but only make the motion; it
will do just as well, and save a great deal of time.
Return rammer!
Very well againBut that would
have been done, I think, with greater expertness, if you
had performed the motion with a little more dexterity.
S, h, o, u, lShoulder foolk!
Very handsomely done
indeed! Put your guns on the other shoulder,
gentlemen
.
Order foolk!
Not quite so well, gentlemennot
quite altogether; but perhaps I did not speak loud enough
for you to hear me all at once. Try once more, if you
please. I hope you will be patient, gentlemen; we will
soon be through.
n
Order foolk!
Handsomely done, gentlemen!Very
handsome done! and altogether too, except that one half
of you were a
leetle
too soon, and the other half a
leetle
too late.
In laying down your guns, gentlemen, take care to
lay the locks up and the other side down.
'
Tention the whole! Ground foolk!
Very well.
Charge bayonet!
(
Some of the men
)That can't
be, Captainpray look again; for how can we charge
bayonet without our guns?
(
Captain
.) I don't know as to that, but I know I'm
right, for here 'tis printed in the book; c, h, a, ryes,
charge bayonet
, that's right, that's the word, if I know
how to read. Come, gentlemen, do pray charge
bayonet
!
Charge, I say!Why don't you charge? Do you
think it aint so? Do you think I have lived to this time
o' day, and don't know what charge bayonet is? Here,
come here, you may see for yourselves; it's plain as the
nose on your faStopstaynohalt! no! Faith
I'm wrong! I turned over two leaves at once. I beg
your pardon, we will not stay out long; and we'll have
something to drink as soon as we have done. Come,
boys, get up off the stumps and logs and take up your
guns, we'll soon be done: excuse me if you please.
Fix Bayonet!
Advance arms!
Very well done; turn the stocks of
your guns in front, gentlemen, and that will bring the
barrels behind; hold them strait up and down if you
please; let go with your left, and take hold with your
right hand below the guard. Steuben says the gun
should be held p, e, r,
pertic'lar
yes, you must always
mind and hold your guns very pertic'lar. Now boys,
'tention the whole!
Present arms!
Very handsomely done! only hold
your gun over t'other kneet'other hand upturn your
bands round a little and raise them up higherdraw
t'other foot backnow you are nearly rightvery well
done.
Gentlemen, we come now to the
revolutions
. Men,
you have all got into a sort of snarl, as I may say; how
did you get all into such a higglet pigglety?
The fact was, the shade had moved considerably to
the eastward, and had exposed the right wing of these
hardy veterans to a galling fire of the sun. Being
poorly
provided with umbrellas at this end of the line, they
found it convenient to follow the shade, and in huddling
to the left for this purpose, they changed the figure of
their line from that of a crescent to one which more
nearly resembled a pair of pothooks.
Come, gentlemen, (says the captain,) spread
yourselves
out again in a straight line; and let us get into
the wheelings and other matters as soon as possible.
But this was strenuously opposed by the soldiers.
They objected going into the
revolutions
at all, inasmuch
as the weather was extremely hot, and they had already
been kept in the field upwards of three quarters of an
hour. They reminded the captain of his repeated
promise
to be as short as he possibly could, and it was clear
he could dispense with all this same wheeling and
flourishing
,
if he chose. They were already very thirsty,
and if he would not dismiss them, they declared they
would go off without dismission, and get something to
drink, and he might fine them if that would do him any
good; they were able to pay their fine, but would not
go without drink to please any body; and they swore
they would never vote for another captain who wished
to be so unreasonably strict.
The captain behaved with great spirit upon the
occasion
,
and a smart colloquy ensued; when at length
becoming
exasperated to the last degree, he roundly
asserted
that no soldier ought ever to
think hard
of the orders
of his officer; and, finally, he went so far as to say that
he did not think any gentleman on that ground had any
just cause to be offended with him. The dispute was
finally settled by the captain sending for some grog for
their present accommodation, and agreeing to omit
reading
the military law, and the performance of all the
manuvres
,
except two or three such easy and simple ones
as could be performed within the compass of the shade.
After they had drank their grog, and had spread
themselves, they were divided into platoons.
'
Tention the whole!To the right wheel!
Each
man faced to the right about.
Why, gentlemen, I did not mean for every man to
stand still and turn himself
na
'trally right round; but
when I told you to wheel to the right, I intended you to
wheel round to the right as it were. Please to try again,
gentlemen; every right hand man must stand fast, and
only the others turn round.
In the previous part of the exercise, it had, for the
purpose of sizing, been necessary to denominate every
second person a right hand man. A very natural
consequence was, that on the present occasion those right
hand men maintained their position, all the intermediate
ones facing about as before.
Why, look at 'em now! exclaimed the captain, in
extreme vexationI'll be dd if you understand a
word I say. Excuse me, gentlemen, it
rayly
seems as
if you could not come at it exactly. In wheeling to the
right, the right hand
eend
of the platoon stands fast, and
the other
eend
comes round like a swingletree. Those
on the outside must march faster than those on the inside.
You certainly must understand me now, gentlemen; and
please to try it once more.
In this they were a little more successful.
'
Tention the whole! To the leftleft, noright
that is, the leftI mean the rightleft wheel, march!
In this, he was strictly obeyed; some wheeling to the
right, some to the left, and some to the right-left, or both
ways.
Stop! halt!
Let us try it again! I could not just
then tell my right hand from left! You must excuse me,
if you pleaseexperience makes perfect, as the saying
is. Long as I have served, I find something new to learn
every day; but all's one for that. Now, gentlemen, do
that motion once more.
By the help of a non-commissioned officer in front of
each platoon, they wheeled this time with considerable
regularity.
Now, boys, you must try to wheel by divisions; and
there is one thing in particular which I have to request
of you, gentlemen, and that is, not to make any blunder
in your wheeling. You must mind and keep at a
wheeling
distance, and not talk in the ranks, nor get out of fix
again; for I want you to do this motion well, and not to
make any blunder now.
'
Tention the whole! By divisions, to the right wheel,
march!
In doing this, it seemed as if Bedlam had broke loose:
every man took the command. Not so fast on the
right!Slow now?Haul down those umbrellas!
Faster on the left!Keep back a little there!Don't
scrouge
so!Hold up your gun Sam!Go faster
there!faster! Who trod on my ? dn your
huffs!Keep back! Stop us, Captaindo stop us!
Go faster there! I've lost my shoe! Get up again,
Ned! Halt! halt! halt!Stop, gentlemen! stop! stop!
By this time they had got into utter and inextricable
confusion and so I left them.
TIMOTHY CRABSHAW.
n2
THE TURF.
Come
, said my friend Baldwin to me, a few months
ago, let us go to the turf.
No, said I, I take no interest in its amusements.
Nor do I, rejoined he; but I visit it to acquire
a knowledge of the human character, as it exhibits itself
in the various scenes of life, and with the hope of turning
the knowledge thus acquired, to some good account. I
am the more desirous that you should accompany me,
continued he, because, as one pair of eyes and ears
cannot catch all that passes, within a scene so spacious,
I shall loose many instructing, interesting, or amusing
incidents, without the assistance of a friend; and
therefore
I wish to enlist your services.
Well, said I, with this view, I will accompany
you.
We went; and the following is the result of our joint
observations:
We went early, when as yet no one had reached the
ground but those who occupied the booths for the purpose
of traffic. It was not long, however, before crowds of
persons of all ages, sexes, conditions and complexions,
were seen moving towards the booths; some on foot,
some on horseback, some in gigs, some in carriages,
some in carts, and some in wagons. The carriages,
(generally filled with well dressed ladies,) arranged
themselves about thirty or forty paces from the starting
point, towards the centre of the turf. Around these,
circled many young gentlemen, each riding his prettiest,
whipping, spurring, and curbing his horse into the most
engaging antics, and giving visible token that he thought
every eye from the carriages was on him, and every
heart overpowered by his horsemanship. As many
more plied between the booths and carriages, bearing
messages, rumors, apples, oranges, raisins, lemonade,
and
punch
.
But surely no lady drank the punch!
Yes, three of them did; and if I know what large
swallows mean, they loved it toobut they did'nt drink
long. The ladies ought to be informed, however, that a
countryman passing them, observed, `the way
them
women
love punch is nothing to nobody!'
The gentlemen generally collected about the booths,
and employed themselves in loud talking and drinking.
Here I saw Maj. Close, who two hours before declared
he had not enough to pay a poor woman for the making
the vest he had on, treat a large company to a dollar
bowl of punch; and, ten minutes after, I saw the same
man stake fifty dollars on the race. I saw another
gentleman
do the same, who, four days before, permitted his
endorser to lift his note in bank, for one hundred dollars,
which note the endorser still held. But, thought I, the
way these gentlemen treat their creditors, is nothing to
nobody. One thing I remarked upon this occasion,
which should not be passed in silence. I saw many
gentlemen
drink
spirits
upon the turf, whom I never saw
taste it any where elsesome, because it seemed
fashionable
;
and some, because they would bet nothing but
a glass of toddy, or a bowl of punch, and having bet it,
they must help drink it.
I had been employed, perhaps three quarters of an
hour, in making observations upon the scene which was
before me, when I observed a group of negroes and boys
enter one of the gates of the turf, following with much
seeming interest, a horse which was led by an aged
black, by whose side walked a little negro boy about
thirteen years of age, dressed in pink, throughout. I
had no doubt but that the horse was one which was
entered for the day's running; and as I was desirous of
seeing all the competitors before the race, I advanced to
meet him apart from the crowd. As soon as I
approached
near enough to distinguish the features of the old
negro who led the animal, I discovered that he was a
gentleman who, upon that day at least, was to be
approached
only with the most profound respect. His
step was martial, his eye looked directly forward, and
his countenance plainly indicated that he had many deep
things shut up in his brain, which the world had long
been trying to pry into, in vain. I concluded, however,
that I might venture to ask him a question, which all who
had read the morning's Chronicle could have answered.
I therefore took the liberty of addressing him, as soon
as he came near me, with old man, what horse is that?
The question seemed to come like a thunder-bolt among
his contemplations; and without speaking a word, he
bent upon me a look which I perfectly understood to
mean, Pray, sir, where were you born and brought
up? Having been thus foiled by the old man, I
resolved
to try my luck with the rider; accordingly, I
repeated the question to him. He stopt, and was in the
act, as I thought, of answering, when the old man
bawled
out to him, in an angry tone
Come along, you Bill; never keep behind you
hoss
,
when you
fuss
(first) come on the ground.
Bill obeyed promptly, and took his position by
his
majesty
, who observed to him in an under tone, as he
came along side
Never tell de name you hoss; it's bad luck.
Bill's confusion plainly showed that he ought to have
known a thing so obvious, from his infancy. I was as
much disconcerted as Bill; but was soon relieved by a
pert little blackmoor, who, rather to persuade me that he
was in all the secrets of the turf, than in charity to me,
addressed me with
Master, I'll tell you what hoss dat is.
Well, my boy, said I, what horse is it?
He young Butteram, son o'
ole
Butteram, dat usen to
belong to Mr. Swingletree.
And do you know all the horses that are going to
run do-day? said I.
La, yes sir; said he: I know ebery one dat's
gwine to run ebery day.
I concluded I would take advantage of the boy's
knowledge; and therefore gave him twelve and a half
cents to stand by me, and give me the names of the racers
as they past; for by this time they were all on the
ground, and following the direction of the first.
This one, said my Mentor, as the next approached,
name Flory Randle; she b'long to Mr. Pet; but I
don't know what hoss he daddy, though.
This one, (as the next came up) name Sir William;
he come all de way from Virginy, and I tink dey say he
got by Virginy too.
And this, (as the last approached) name Clipse;
by jokey, he look to me like he could clip it too; and
I be swinged if I don't go my seb'n-pence on him any
how.
Thus I learned that the four horses which were to
run, were Bertrand, Flora Randolph, Sir William, and
Eclipse. At this moment, a voice from the Judges'
stand cried, Prepare your horses! and in an instant
the grooms were engaged in saddling the animals. This
preliminary was soon disposed of, and the owners
proceeded
to give the riders their instructions.
Now, Bob, said Mr. Pet, I know that I have the
heels of any horse on the turf, but I'm a little afraid of
my bottom; therefore, save your wind as much as
possible
.
Trail the leading horse upon a hard rein, about
a half distance behind, until you come to the last half
mile, and then let Flora off at full speed. As soon as
you pass the leading horse about a length, bear your
rein, and don't come in more than a length ahead.
Sam, said the owner of Sir William, you've got
none to fear but Bertrand, and you've got the bottom of
him; therefore give him no rest from the word go!
unless you find that your heels are as good as his; and
if so, you need'nt waste your wind. Feel Bertrand at
the first rise of the course; if he stands it pretty well,
try how you can move with him, going down the hill;
and if you find that you are too hard for him, either at
the rises or falls, pinch him hard at all of
them
places
and when you come to the last half mile of each heat,
run his heart, liver, lights, and soul-case out of him.
Ned, said the owner of Eclipse, you are not to
run for the first heat at all, unless you find you can take
it very easy. Let Sir William take the first heat.
You can beat the others when you please, and William
can't stand a push for two heats; therefore, just play
along side of him handsomely, for the first three miles,
and at the coming in, just drop in the distance pole.
The next heat take the track, and press him from the
start.
Bill, said the owner of Bertrand, do you take the
track at the start, and keep it, and run only just fast
enough to keep it.
Here the roll of the drum, and a cry from the Judges'
stand, put the horses in motion for the starting point.
Over this point, I now observed suspended from a pole,
a beautiful blue silk purse, spangled with silver, and
embroidered with gold, on both sides of which were
marked in golden characters, $500!!!
It would require a volume to describe the scene which
now ensued. Captain, do you run Bertrand for the
heat? I do, sir. Five hundred dollars, Bertrand
against the field. Done, sir. Major, will Eclipse
run for the heat? No, sir. One hundred to fifty,
that Flora Randolph beats Eclipse the first heat! Done,
sirDone, sirDone, sir. I took the bet first.
No, sir, I took it first. No matter, gentlemen, I'll
go you all fifty apiece. It's a bet, sirIt's a
betA bet, sir. Here, Uncle Sam, hold dese
trupsNow mind de bet. Bob, he bet dat Flory
Randle take de fus heat. I bet he take no heat at all.
Yes, dat de betyou hear him, Uncle Sam?
Tell him over agin, le' me listen. Well, dis him:
If Florey take de fus heat, Bob winif he take no heat
at all, I win. Berry well, I got him now fass in my
head.
Pa, give me a quarter to bet. What horse do
you want to bet upon, my son? Eclipse. Oh
nothere's a quarterbet it upon Bertrand.
Well, Miss Flora, don't you wish to bet? Yes,
sir, I'll bet you a pair of gloves. Well, what horse
will you take? Oh, my namesake, of course. It's
a betyou take Flora against the field, of course.
To be sure I do.
Thus it wentmen, women and children, whites and
blacks, all betting.
Such was the bustle, confusion and uproar among the
men, that I could hardly see or hear any thing distinctly;
and therefore I resolved to take my position among the
carriages, in order to observe the ladies under the
delights
of the turf.
The signal was now given, and off went the horses
Flora ahead, Bertrand next, Sir William next, and
Eclipse in the rear.
Only look at that rascal, said Mr. Pet, as he
charged
by us at full speed; how he is riding. Hold her
in, you rascal, or I'll give you five hundred lashes as
soon as you lightHold her in, I tell you, you
abominable
puppy, or I'll cut your throat. Bob did his best to
restrain her, for he bore upon the rein until his back came
nearly in contact with Flora's; but to no purpose.
Ahead she would go for the first two miles.
Only see, mamma, said Miss Flora, how
beautifully
Flora runs! Oh, that dear little rider, (
a negro
,)
how handsomely he carries himself. I knew I should
win my gloves.
At the completion of the second mile, Flora became
more manageable, and the other horses passed her in
their order. As the last gained about a length of her
now, said Pet, keep her at that. The rider
straightened
himself in the saddle, but the space widened,
perceptibly
,
between him and Eclipse. Don't bear upon the
rein so hard, said Pet. Let her play easy. Bob
slackened
the rein; but Flora seemed not to improve her
liberty. Look how you're dropping behind,
continued
Pet. Let her out, I tell you! Bob
let
her out,
but she would not
go out
. Let her out, I tell you, or
I will blow your brains out. Here Bob gave her a
cutYou infernal rascal you, don't give her the whip!
Bring her up to Eclipse. Bob gave her the lash again;
but Flora obstinately refused to keep company with
Eclipse. Very well, sir, said Pet, ride your own
way, and I'll whip mine when you get home; I see how
it is. Bob seemed to hear only the first member of
the sentence, and he gave the whip without mercy.
Why, Pet, said a gentleman, what is the matter
with Flora to-day? What's the matter with her, sir!
Don't you see that I can't make Bob do any thing I tell
him? I'll learn him how to take a
bride
in future.
As Flora received the twentieth cut she switched her
tail. Ah! said Mr. Dimple, I fear you've lost your
gloves Miss Florasee, your favorite switches her tail.
Does Flora switch her tail? said Miss Flora.
Mamma, Mr. Dimple says Flora switches her tail?
Does Flora Switch her tail? said Mrs. Blue. Does
Flora switch her tail? said Miss Emma. Oh, what
a pity!
The horses preserved their order through the heat.
Flora was distanced; but her rider maintained his grace
and dignity to the last, and rode as if perfectly satisfied
that every eye was upon him, and that all were saying:
to be sure Flora is beaten; but her rider is decidedly
the best on the ground. In spite of his cry of clear
the track! however, the crowd closed in between him
and the foremost horses, extinguished his graces from
general view, and forced him to come in, in the mere
character of a spectator.
Between the first and second heats, I saw the owners
of Sir William and Eclipse in a pleasing conversation;
but I did not hear what they said.
After a rest of about a quarter of an hour, the horses
were again brought to the starting point; and at the tap
of the drum went off with great velocity. Bertrand took
the lead as before, and William pursued him very
closely
.
They kept within two lengths of each other for
three miles and a half, when William locked his
adversary
,
and both riders commenced giving the whip and
spur without mercy. When they came in, it was evident
to my eye, that Bertrand's
rider
(for I could not see the
horses' heads) was more than his width ahead of
William's
;
but the judges decided that William won the
heat by two inches and a quarter. Eclipse just saved
his distance. At the close of the heat the two former
exhibited a pitiable spectacle. There was not a dry
hair upon either of them, and the blood streamed from
the flanks and sides of both.
o
Mr. Dimple, said Miss Emma, which horse shall
I bet on next time? Which seems the most distressed?
I declare, Miss, said Dimple, I don't knowthey
both seem to be very much distressed; but I think
William
seems to be in rather the worse plight.
Between this and the following heat, two little boys
engaged in a fight, and not less than fifty grown men
gathered around them to witness the conflict, with as
great an uproar as if a town were on fire. This fight
produced two more between grown persons; one of
whom was carried from the turf with a fractured scull,
as it was thought, from the blow of a stick. But none of
the ladies went to the fights.
Again the horses were brought up and put off.
Bertrand
once more led the way, and Eclipse followed close
at his heels, for about a mile and three quarters, when
William ran up under whip, nose and tail to Bertrand.
Eclipse fell some distance behind, and continued so for a
mile and a half, when he came up and nearly locked
Bertrand. Thus they ran three fourths of the
remaining
distance. On the last stretch they came side to side,
and so continued through. On this heat, I concurred
with the judges, that it was a draw race. William was
double distanced.
Bertrand and Eclipse put off upon the fourth heat:
Bertrand still taking the lead by about half his length.
Eclipse now pushed for the track; but Bertrand
maintained
it. For two miles did the riders continue so close
together that they might have joined hands. They had
entered upon the third mile in this way, when at the first
turn of the course from the judges' stand, Eclipse fell and
killed his rider. Bertrand being now left without a
competitor, galloped slowly round to the goal, where
with great pomp and ceremony, the pole which held the
purse was bent down to his rider, who dislodged it, and
bore it on high, backwards and forwards, in front of the
booth, to the sound of drum, fife and violin.
I declare, said Mrs. Blue, as her carriage wheeled
off, had it not been for that little accident, the sport
would have been delightful.
I left the turf in company with a large number of
gentlemen
,
all of whom concurred in the opinion, that they
had never witnessed such sport in all their lives. What
a pity it is, said General Grubbs, that this amusement
is not more encouraged! We never shall have a fine
breed of horses until the turf is more patronized.
I returned home, and had been seated perhaps an
hour, when Baldwin entered. Well, said he, I
have just been favored with a sight of the contents of
that beautiful purse which Bertrand wonand what do
you think it contained?
Why, five hundred dollars, certainly, returned I.
No, continued he, it contained two half eagles,
sixteen dollars in silver, twelve one dollar bills, and a
subscription paper, which the owner offered to the largest
subscriber on it, for one hundred and fifty dollars, and
it was refused. It is but right to observe, however, that
the gentleman to whom the offer was made assured the
owner that it was as good as gold.
HALL.
AN INTERESTING INTERVIEW.
I hope the day is not far distant, when drunkenness
will be unknown in our highly favored country. The
moral world is rising in its strength against the
all-destroying
vice, and though the monster still struggles,
and stings, and poisons, with deadly effect, in many parts
of our wide spread territory, it is perceptibly wounded
and weakened; and I flatter myself, if I should live to
number ten years more, I shall see it driven entirely,
from the higher walks of life at least, if not from all
grades of society. For the honor of my
contemporaries
,
I would register none of its crimes or its follies;
but, in noticing the peculiarities of the age in which I
live, candor constrains me to give this vice a passing
notice. The interview which I am about to present to my
readers, exhibits it in its mildest and most harmless forms.
In the county of , and about five miles
apart, lived old Hardy Slow and old Tobias Swift
They were both industrious, honest, sensible farmers,
when sober; but they never visited their county-town,
without getting drunk; and then they were
precisely
what the following narrative makes them.
They both happened at the Court House on the same
day, when I last saw them together; the former
accompanied
by his wife, and the latter by his youngest son, a
lad about thirteen. Tobias was just clearly on the
wrong side of the line, which divides drunk from sober;
but Hardy was
royally corned
(but not falling) when
they met, about an hour by sun in the afternoon, near
the rack at which both their horses were hitched.
They stopped about four feet apart, and looked each
other full in the face for about half a minute; during all
which time, Toby sucked his teeth, winked, and made
signs with his shoulders and elbows to the by-standers
that he knew Hardy was drunk, and was going to quiz
him for their amusement. In the meantime, Hardy
looked at Tobias, like a polite man dropping to sleep in
spite of himself, under a long dull story.
At length Toby broke silence:
How goes it, uncle Hardy? (
winking to the
company
and shrugging his shoulders
.)
Why, Toby!is that you? Wellupon mywhy,
Toby!Lordhelpmysoul andWhy,
Toby
!
what, in, the, worl', set, you, to, gitt'n, drunkthis,
time o' day? Swear, poin' blank, you're drunk! Why
youmust be, an old, foolto, get, drunk, right, before,
all these, gentlemena'ready, Toby.
Well, but, now you see, (
winking
) uncle Hardy, a
gill-cup an't a quart-pot, nor a quart-pot an't a two
gallon jug; and therefore, (
winking and chuckling
)
uncle Hardy, a thing is a thing, turn it which way you
will, it just sticks at what it was before you give it first
exexploit.
Well, the, Lord, help, myWhy, Toby! what,
is the reas'n, you, never, will, answer, me this, one
circumstanceand, that, isI, always, find, you,
drunk, when, I come, here.
Well, now, but uncle Hardy, you always know
circumstances alters cases, as the fellow said; and
therefore
,
if one circumstance alters another circumstance
how's your wife and children?
I, swear, poin' blank, I shan't tell youbecause, you
r'ally, is, too drunk, to know, my wife, when, you, meet,
her, in the street, all, day, long, and, she'll, tell, you, the,
very, same, thing, as, all, these, gentlemen, can
testimony
.
Well, but now you see, uncle Hardy, thinking's one
thing and knowing's another, as the fellow said; and the
proof o' the pudding's chawin' the bag, as the fellow
o2
said; and you seetoll-doll-diddle-de-doll-doll-day,
(
singing and capering
) you think I can't dance? Come,
uncle Hardy, let's dance.
Why, Toby!youcometo this?
I
did'nt make,
you, drunk, did I? You, an't, took, a drink, with, me,
this, live, long, dayis you? I, say, is you, Toby?
No, uncle Har
Well, then, let's go, take a drink.
Well, but you see, uncle Hardy, drinkin's drinkin';
but that's neither here nor there, as the fellow said.
Come (
singing
) all ye young sparkers, come listen to me,
And I'll sing you a ditti, of a pretti ladee.
Why, Toby! hahahaWell, I r'ally, did, think,
you, was, drunk, but, now I believeblast the flies!
I b'lieve, they, jest, as li'f, walk, in my, mouth, as, in,
my nose. (
Then looking with eyes half closed at Toby
for several minutes
,) Why, Toby, you, spit 'bacoo
spit, all over, your jacketand, that's jist, the very,
way, you, got, in yourfix.
At this moment, Mrs. Slow came up, and immediately
after, Swift's son, William.
Come, said the good lady, old man, let's go
home; it's getting late, and there's a cloud rising; we'll
get wet.
Why, Nancy! what in the worl' has got into you!
Is you drunk too? Well, 'pon, my word, and honor, I,
b'lieve, every body, in this town, is, got drunk to-day.
Why, Nancy! I never, did, see, you, in, that fix, before,
in, all, my, live, long, born, days.
Well, never mind, said she, come, let's go home.
Don't you see the rain coming up?
Well, will, it rain, upon, my, corn-field, or my
cotton-patch
?
Say, Nancy! which one, will it, rain on?
But, Lord, help, my, soul, you are, too drunk, to tell me,
any, thing, about it. Don't my corn want rain, Nancy?
Now, jist, tell me, that?
Yes; but let's go home.
Then, why, upon, the face, of the earth, won't you,
let it, rain, then? I, rather, it, should rain, than not.
Come, old man, said several by-standers, touched
with sympathy for the good lady, come get on your
horse and go home, and we will help you.
Oh yes, uncle Hardy, said Tobias, affecting to
throw all humor aside, and to become very sober all at
once, go home with the old womanCome, gentlemen
let's help 'em on their horsesthey're groggymighty'
groggy. Come, old man, I'll help you. (staggering
to Hardy.)
Jist look at daddy now! said Billy; he's going
to help Mr. Swift, and he's drunk as Mr. Swift is. Oh,
daddy, come, let's go home, or we'll get mazin' wet.
Toby stooped down to help Hardy on his horse, (
before
the horse was taken from the rack,) and throwing
his arm round Hardy's legs, he fell backwards, and so
did Hardy.
WhyLord, bless, my, soul, said Hardy, I
b'lieve I'm drunk too. What, upon the, face, of the
earth, has got, into, all, of us, this day!
Why, uncle Hardy, said Toby, you pull us both
down together. The old man's mighty groggy, said
Toby to me, in a half whisper, and with an arch wink
and smile, as he rose up, (I happening to be next to him
at the moment,) S'pose we help him up and get him off.
The old woman's in for it too, continued he; winking,
nodding, and shrugging up his shoulders very
significantly
.
Oh no, said I, the old woman is perfectly
sober
,
and I never heard of her tasting a drop in all my
life.
Oh, said Toby, assuming the gravity of a parson,
loves it mightily, mightily!Monstrous woman for
drinking!at least that's my opinion. Monstrous fine
woman though! monstrous fine!
Oh, daddy, for the Lord's sake let's go home; only
see what a rain is coming! said Billy.
Daddy 'll go presently my son.
Well here's your horse, git up and let's go.
Mammy
'll be sure to be sendin' for us.
Don't mind him, said Toby, winking to me; he's
nothing but a boy; I would'nt take no notice of what he
said. He want's me (
winking and smiling
) to go home
with him; now you listen.
Well, come, said I to uncle Toby, get on your
horse, and go home, a very heavy rain is coming up.
I'll go presently, but you just listen to Bill, said
he to me, winking and smiling.
Oh, daddy, for the Lord's sake let's go home.
Toby smiled archly at me, and winked.
Daddy, are you going home or not? Jist look at
the rain comin'.
Toby smiled and winked.
Well, I do think a drunken man is the biggest fool
in the county, said Bill, I don't care who he is.
Bill! said the old man, very sternly, `honor thy
father and mother,' thatthat the woman's seed may
bruise the serpent's head.
Well, daddy, tell me if you won't go home! You
see it's going to rain powerful. If you won't go, may
I go?
Bill! `Leave not thy father who begat
thee;
for
thou art my beloved son Esau, in whom I am well
pleased.'
Why, daddy, it's dropping rain now.Here Bill
was relieved from his anxiety by the appearance of
Aaron, a trusty servant, whom Mrs. Slow had
despatched
for his master, to whose care Bill committed him,
and was soon out of sight.
Aaron's custom had long been to pick up his master
without ceremony, put him on his horse, and bear him
away. So used to this dealing had Toby been, that
when he saw Aaron, he surrendered at discretion, and
was soon on the road. But as the rain descended in
torrents, before even Bill could have proceeded half a
mile, the whole of them must have been drenched to
the skin.
As to Hardy, whom in the proper order we ought to
have disposed of first, he was put on his horse by main
force; and was led off by his wife, to whom he was
muttering as far as I could hear himWhy, Nancy!
How, did, you, get, in, such a fix? Youl'll, fall, off, your,
horse, sure, as you're borne, and I'll have to put you up
again. As they were constrained to go in a walk,
they too must have got wringing wet, though they had a
quarter of an hour the start of Toby.
HALL.
THE FOX HUNT.
I had often read of the fox chase, and its
soul-enlivening
pleasures, before I was permitted to enjoy them;
and had my reading upon this head been confined to
Somerville's Chase alone, I should have been inspired
with an irrepressible curiosity to experience its thrilling
enjoyments. Listen how he sanctifies the sport, and
mingles with it all that is gay and spirit-stirring:
But yet, alas! the wily fox remained
A subtle, pilfering foe, prowling around
In midnight shades, and wakeful to destroy.
In the full fold, the poor defenceless lamb,
Seized by his guileful arts, with sweet warm blood
Supplies a rich repast. The mournful ewe,
Her dearest treasure lost through the dim night,
Wanders perplex'd and darkling bleats in vain,
While in th' adjacent bush, poor Philomel
(Herself a parent once, till wanton churls
Despoil'd her nest,) joins in her loud laments,
With sweeter notes, and more melodious woe.
For these nocturnal thieves, huntsmen prepare
This sharpest vengeance. Oh! how glorious 'tis
To right th' oppress'd, and bring the felon vile
To just disgrace! Ere yet the morning peep
Or stars retire from the first blush of day,
With thy far echoing voice alarm thy pack
And rouse thy bold compeers. Then to the copse
Thick with entangling grass, and prickly furze,
With silence lead thy many colour'd hounds,
In all their beauty's pride. See! how they range
Dispersed, how busily this way, and that,
They cross, examining with curious nose
Each likely haunt. Hark! on the drag I hear
Their doubtful notes, preluding to the cry
More nobly full, and swell'd with every mouth.
Heavens! what melodious strains! how beat our hearts
Big with tumultuous joy! the loaded gales
Breathe harmony; and as the tempest drives
From wood to wood, through every dark recess,
The forest thunders and the mountain's shake
he breaks away.
Shrill horns proclaim his flight. Each straggling hound
Strains o'er the lawn to reach the distant pack:
'Tis triumph all and joy. Now, my brave youths,
Now give a loose to the clean generous steed;
Flourish the whip nor spare the galling spur;
But in the madness of delight, forget
Your fears. For o'er the rocky hills we range
And dangerous our course; but in the brave
True courage never fails. In vain the stream
In foaming eddies whirls; in vain the ditch
Wide-gaping threatens death. The craggy steep
Where the poor dizzy shepherd crawls with care
And clings to every twig, gives us no pain;
But down we sweep, as stoops the falcon bold
To pounce his prey.
Filled with such ideas as these lines are calculated to
inspire, (and long as is the extract, it does but half
justice
to the
poet
, whatever we may think of his
subject
,)
it was with kindling enthusiasm that I met the question
from my old friend Dause, on a clear, chill, December's
evening, Will you not join us in a fox chase
tomorrow
?
That I will, replied I, with pleasure.
Have you ever been in a fox chase? continued he.
Never, said I; but I have no doubt, but that I should
be delighted with it.
Oh, it's the finest sport in the world, with a full pack!
and we shall have a splendid pack to-morrow. Major
Crocket is coming in with his hounds, and George Hurt
is to bring in his, and all unite with Capt. Reid's here;
and we shall have a pack of twenty-two or three. We
shall have glorious sportyou must not fail to join us.
No fear of that, said I, I shall be among the first
on the ground.
I went home, (no matter where,) and hastened to bed
at an earlier hour than usual, that I might be the surer
to rise by times in the morning.But, so bright was the
anticipation of the coming joys, that it was long before I
could compose myself to sleep; and when I did, it was
rather the
semi-sleep
of vigilance, than the sound sleep
of rest. It was sufficient, however, to beguile the
intervening
hours; and they seemed but few, before the long
drawn notes of Crocket's horn roused me from my
slumbers. I sprang from my bedand without waiting
to throw over me a stitch of clothing, (though the
weather
was extremely cold,) I seized my little ram's-horn,
hoisted a window, and blew a blast, which, if it had had
fair play, would have waked every hound within five
miles round. But it had not fair play; for, partly from
hurry, and partly from my indisposition to thrust my
exposed
body into the open air, I just gave the mouth of
my horn projection enough to throw half its voice out
and half inside the house. The first half did no great
things; but the last half, did wonders. Bursting upon
the unsuspecting family, at that still hour, it created a
sensation which no one can understand, who was not at
the falling of the walls of Jericho. The house trembled,
the glasses rattled, the women started, and the children
screamed.
What's that! exclaimed the mistress of the
household
.
Mr. Hall's going a fox hunting, said her husband.
Well, I wish he'd blow for his foxes out of the house.
I can't see what any man of common sense wants to be
gitting up this time of night for, in such cold weather,
just to hear dogs run a fox.
It struck me, there was a good deal of sound
philosophy
in the good lady's remarks; but she was a
woman
,
and she had never read Somerville.
I dressed myself, walked out, waked my servant and
ordered my horse. Truly it was a lovely morning, for
the season of the year: December never ushered in one
more lovelyLike a sheet of snow, the frost overspread
the earth! Not a breath was stirringThe coming
huntsman had sounded his horn upon a distant hill, and
its unrepeated notes had died away. A cloudless sky
o'erspread the earthas rich in beauty as ever won the
gaze of mortal. Upon the western verge, in all his
martial glory, stood Orion; his burnished epaulets and
spangled sash, with unusual brightness glowing.
Capella
glittered brighter still, and Castor, Procyion and
Arcturus, rivalled her in lustre. But Sirius reigned the
monarch of the starry host; and countless myriads of
lesser lights, glowed, and sparkled, and twinkled, o'er
all the wide spread canopy. Oh! exclaimed I, how
rich, how beautiful, how glorious the firmament! See!
yonder is Bootes in the
chase!
His Chara and Asterion
drive on the lusty Bear! who shall condemn the chase,
when its pleasures are written in characters of deathless
fire, upon the face of the heavens!
I was lost in admiration of the splendors which
surrounded
me, when another sound of the Major's horn
informed me that he was upon the confines of the village;
and, at the same instant, my servant announced that my
horse was in waiting. As I approached him for the
purpose of mounting, Master, said my servant, you
gwine
fox huntin' on da hose?
Yes, said I promptly: why?
Eh-eh, rejoined he, with a titter.
Why, what is it amuses you so, Isaac?
Bess de Lord! Smooth-tooth wa'nt never made for
fox huntin', I know. He too lazy, bess de Lord. Time
de houn' give one squall, dey done leff Smooth-tooth
clean outen sight an' hearin'.
O, I presume not, Isaac, said I. I shall not
attempt
to keep up with the hounds: I shall just keep in
full hearing of them by cutting across and heading them.
Eh-eh! Fox run twice round a field 'fore
Smooth-tooth
cut across him, I know: bess de Lord.
One would suppose that Isaac's hint would have
reminded
me to take a whip or spur, or both, along with
me; but it did not.
p
Crocket's horn was answered by several from the
neighboring hills, and before I proceeded the eighth of a
mile towards the point of rendezvous, a loud chorus of
horns and beagles announced that all were assembled but
myself. I raised my ram's horn and blew a more
propitious
blast than my first, in token that I was on my
way. My horse, as the reader has perhaps conjectured,
from the colloquy just repeated, was not Somerville's
clean, generous steed; but he was a horse of
uncommon
gravity and circumspection. I gave him the name
of
Smooth-tooth
, simply because when he became my
property, the faces of his teeth were, generally, worn
smooth. Though he was kind and accommodating
enough, in all matters of business, he had an utter
aversion
to every thing like levity, and to all rambles which
seemed to have no definite object.
Age
had done much,
doubtless, in sobering Smooth-tooth's temper; but
infirmity
had conspired with age to produce this effect; for
he was most lamentably deaf: so that the common
remark
of our State in relation to aged horses, he has
heard it thunder too often, would by no means have
applied to Smoth-tooth; for to my certain knowledge he
had not heard it thunder for five years at least.
I bent my course towards the village, and as
Smooth-tooth
was wholly unconscious of the uproar there, he set
out as usual upon a gentle
pace
. By a diligent
application
of heels, I signified to him that I looked for
something
more sprightly upon this occasion. Smooth-tooth
took the hint, and mended his
pace;
but I informed him
as before, that this would not do.He then paced
brisker
still; but this did not abate my rigor.He then paced
to the top of his speed, and finding me still unsatisfied,
he struck, most reluctantly, into a lazy canter. This
reduced my
beats
from
triple
to
common time
, but did
not bring them to a full pause. At the end of five long,
awkward, reluctant lopes, Smooth-tooth stopped with a
demi-semiquaver
rest
, and wheeled at the same instant
to go home, in utter disgust; for he seemed now to have
satisfied himself that I had taken leave of my senses,
and that it was high time for him to throw himself
upon his reserved rights. As I always entertained a
high respect for these, I accommodated myself to his
views, after having discovered that he was not to be
forced
out of them. There was, however, some policy
mixed with my clemency; for slowly as Smooth-tooth
moved in his master effort, he waked up an artificial
breeze, which seemed to search the very cavities of my
bones; and which already produced some
unacknowledged
yearnings for the comfortable bed which I had deserted.
When I reached the village, I found all the huntsmen
collected; and after a little delay, occasioned by a dog
fightor rather a fight of one dog against all the rest,
(for hounds, like the wiley politicians of the present day,
all jump on the undermost,) we moved forward to the
hunting ground. This lay three miles from the village,
and could any thing have enlivened the jaunt, my
company
would; for it consisted of a merry group of every
variety of disposition. But a freezing man cannot be
lively; and consequently I was not.
Our pack consisted of eighteen or twenty hounds; but
there were but two of them, which could be relied on
with confidenceGeorge Hurt's Louder, and Captain
Reid's Rome. With these I was well acqainted, having
often been with them in the deer and rabbit hunt. Could
I say, like Horace,
exigi monumentum re perennius
,
they should be immortalized; for better dogs never
mingled
in the chase. They knew perfectly well, from the
hour of the hunt, and the equipments of the huntsmen,
the game of which they were in pursuit; and no other
would they notice.
Capt. Reid's
Music
was said to be remarkable
cold;
but her veracity was questionable. Her ambition never
aimed at any thing higher than finding the
track
, for
fleeter footed hounds. When the game was up, she
soon knocked out and went in quest of cold trails;
why, or wherefore, no one could tellunless it was that
she had the common fault of those who possess peculiar
accomplishments. Her habit was, to get a trail, and if
she could not lead off on it readily, to open by the half
hour upon so much of it as lay within the compass of
three rods square.
We had proceeded about two miles on our way, when,
in a washed field to our right, Music opened.
What dog's that? inquired several voices at once.
It's Music, said the Captain; she's the coldest
hound of the pack.
The majority were for moving on, regardless of
Music's
cry; but, in courtesy to the Captain, who had more
confidence in her than the rest of us, we agreed to wait
on her a little.
Speak to him, Music! said the Captain.
Music opened again.
Try for him, Music.
Music opened again.
Let's go to her, said the Captain; there's not much
confidence to be placed in her, but it may be a fox.
We went, and as soon as Music saw us she seemed
highly delighted at our attentionsran into a little
gully
put
her nose to the groundseemed in doubt
rooted in the dirt a little waythen raised her head
paused a second, and trotted round a circle of ten yards
circumference, opening all the time as if the whole
horizon
was lined with foxesthat is, as though there were
an abundance of foxes about, but they were a long
way off.
Try for him again, Music! said the Captain.
Music
fidgetted about with great animation, shook her tail
spiritedly, and after taking a sweep of sixty feet, returned
to the gully, and did as before.
I'm afraid it's too cold, said the Captain.
Oh, no, said Colonel Peyton, waggishly; let's wait
on her. 'Bundance o' foxes in that gullyonly give
Music time, and she'll fill it full o' dead foxes before
sunrise.
I reckon, said Stewart Andrews, in a long
drawling
dry way, that Music has got upon a `Miss Mary
Ann' that went along there last winter.
The reader must here be informed, that when I went
into the neighborhood of which I have been speaking,
the common appellation of the rabbit, was Molly
Cotton-tail
,
as it still is, elsewhere in Georgia; but, as I
thought this inelegant, if not vulgar, I prevailed upon
my fellow-huntsmen to exchange it for a more classic
term, which would preserve the sense, without offending
the most squeamish delicacy. At my suggestion,
therefore
,
it was called the Mary Cotton-tail, and
afterwards
,
by further refinement, Miss Mary Ann
Cotton-tail
.But
to return:
We were just about taking leave of Music, when a
young, awkward, overgrown hound, trotted up to her
assistance. He arrived just as Music had paid a third
visit to the track in the gully, and as soon as she left it,
he put his nose to the spot, snuffed a little, and then
raised one foot, and with it kindly scratched out the
tantalizing track. While I sat waiting upon Miss
Music, my freezing limbs forced me into this train of
reflection: How could I have so far taken leave of my
senses, as to promise myself any pleasure from such a
jaunt as this!It is extremely doubtful whether we shall
start a fox; and if we should, what are the cries of
twenty
p2
hounds, to three or four hours exposure, without even
an overcoat, upon such a piercing morning as this!
And wherein will the cry differ from that of the same
pack, in pursuit of a rabbit, on a fine sunny day. And
why seek amusement in the tortures of a poor
unoffending
animal! In this country, at least, I never heard of
a single loss from a farm-yard which could be fairly
traced to the foxnot even of a goose, much less of a
lamb. My rest broken, my health jeoparded, and my
immediate sufferings excrutiating! Follymadness in
the extreme!
We had not proceeded far before groups of from two
to five hounds could be heard in all directions in pursuit
of
Miss Mary Anns
. Hitherto my hopes had been
buoyed up, by the
number
of hounds; for I naturally
concluded, that our chances of success increased with
their number: but now, I plainly saw that our only hope
was upon Rome and Louder, for all the others had
resigned
themselves unreservedly to Mary Anns.
We were moving on upon a skirt of woods, entirely
surrounded by fields, when from the opposite side of it,
the well known voice of the deep-mouthed Louder fell
joyously upon our ears. Hark! cried all of us at
once. In an instant, the clear, shrill note of Rome
confirmed
his companion's report; for they always hunted
together, and each obeyed the call of the other in a
moment
.
Then both togetherthen alternately in quick
succession, they repeated their assurances. In an instant
all the various groups of hounds of which we were
speaking, were hushed; and from every direction they
could be seen dashing to the two favorites. Such is the
force of truth even with dumb brutes.
A loud scream of exultation and encouragement broke
involuntarily from all the huntsmen, (not excepting
myself
,)
and each dashed for the hounds as the impulse of
the moment urged him on. Some skirted the forest in
one way, some in another; but Crocket plunged
directly
through it at half speedhow, heaven only knows;
but I hardly missed him before I heard him encouraging
the dogs in his presence. I took a moment for
reflection
,
which, of course, I was permitted to enjoy alone.
My conclusion was, that if Crocket could
gallop
through
the wood with safety, I certainly could
pace
through it
without injury, and as this was much the nearest way, I
determined to attempt it. My resolves were no sooner
formed than they were communicated to Smooth-tooth,
who entered the wood with his accustomed prudence and
circumspection.
The first streaks of day had now appeared; but they
were entirely useless to me after I entered the forest. I
had proceeded about sixty paces, when a limb, of some
kind, (I know not what,) fetched me a whipe across the
face, that set the principles of philosophy at defiance;
for it was certainly four times as severe, as
Smooth-tooth's
momentum would have justified, upon any known
law of projectilesAt least it seemed so to me; for it
came like a flash of lightening over the icing of my face;
giving me, for the first time in my life, a
sensible
idea
of the Georgia expression, feeling streaked; for my
face actually felt as though it was covered with streaks
of fire and streaks of ice.
Twenty paces more, had like to have wound up my
hunt with the felon's death: for, as I was moving on
with all due caution and sobriety, a little, supple,
infrangible
grape vine, attached to two slim elastic sapplings,
between which I passed, threw one of its festoons
gracefully
around my neck, and politely informed me that I
must stop, or be hung. I communicated this intelligence
to Smooth-tooth without loss of time, and as
stopping
was
his delight, he, of course, obeyed the mandate as quick
as he could. Prompt as was his obedience, it was too
slow for the petulent little grape vine; for, though it
consented
to spare my life, it dismissed me with most
ungentlemanly
rudeness. It just took my profile from my
neck upwards, passing over all the turns and angles of
my face, with a rigor that Socrates himself could not
have borne with patience. It returned from its
delineation
,
like a bow-string, sending my hat aloft, I know not
how high; but judging from the time which intervened
between its departure from my head, and its report on
the ground, I should say nearly to the height of the
wedded
sapplings. Never but once before, had I such a
lively sense of the value of a hat in cold weather, as I
now had. The chills ran from my head to my toes, like
ague fits; and these I had to bear for the space of a
minute or two, before I could
feel out
my hat. At last
I recovered it and remounted. How was it possible,
exclaimed I, for Crocket to get through this wood at
half speed! It must be true, that `
fortuna favet fortibus
,'
and I ll e'en risk a little upon the strength of the maxim.
Switches
were convenient, as my misfortunes have
proved
;
and having supplied myself with one, I drew my
hat over my eyes, brought my head down close to
Smooth-tooth's withers, hugged him tight with my legs,
and put whip to him manfully. Smooth-tooth now felt
his
dignity
assailed, and he put off at a respectable fox
hunting gait. This soon brought me to the edge of the
old field, with no other accident than a smart blow from
a sappling, upon my right knee, which, though it nearly
unhorsed me, did me no serious injury.
Here I found all my companions re-assembled.
While the drag lay within the frost-covered field, the
dogs carried it briskly; but as soon as it entered the
wood, they were at fault. In this situation they were,
when I joined the huntsmen. It was long before we
had any encouragement to hope that they would ever
take it beyond the margin of the field; occasionally,
however, and at painful intervals, the two favorites would
bid us not to despair. Crocket, and three or four of the
party, remained with and encouraged the hounds;
while Andrews, Marden and myself, adjourned to a
narrow lane to enjoy the comforts of the risen sun. The
sluggish trail allowed us an hour's basking; which so
far relaxed my rigid members as to prepare me for
enjoying Marden's amusing stories, and Stewart's dry
humor. While we were thus engaged, and after we had
relinquished all hope of a chase for that morning at least,
the notes of the two favorites became more and more
frequent. Soon a third, and fourth voice joined them,
and the chorus swelled and varied with every second,
until eight in the morning, when the whole pack broke
in full cry. Reynard was up, and twenty foes in hot
pursuit.
How, or why, I am unable to tell, but truth constrains
me to say, that for some moments I was enraptured with
the sport. The fox obliqued towards us, and entered a
field of which our position commanded a full view. He
must have left his covert with reluctance, for he was not
more than a hundred paces ahead of the hounds when he
entered the field. First of the pack, and side by side,
the heroes of the clamorous band, rose the fence.Then
followed, in thick array, the whole troop; and close on
their rear, Crocket burst through the copse-wood and
charged the fence, without a pause. Around me, in
every direction, I could see the huntsmen sweeping to
the choir; and as emerging from the forests, or gaining
the heights around, they caught the first glimpse of the
gallant pack, they raised a shout, which, none but the
overcharged heart can give, and none but the lifeless
heart receive unmoved. I was soon deserted as before;
but partly from the inspiration of the sport, and partly
from the success of my recent experiment, I plied
Smooth-tooth
with the whip most
astonishingly
, and put off in
pursuit of the hounds in handsome stylevia the lane,
which happened to have exactly the curvature which I
desired.
The fox had hardly left the field through which my
eye followed him, before all of a sudden, the voice of
every hound hushed. They were completely at fault;
and thus I found them when I once more joined my
company
.
They knocked out, as the saying is, near to
the corner of 'Squire Snibby's field, which lay
contiguous
to the first which they entered. Dogs and men
here toiled assiduously to take the trail away, but in vain.
At length Crocket suspected Reynard of a trick: he
conjectured that the cunning rogue had ascended the
Squire's fence, and followed it some distance before he
alighted. And so it proved to be; for, taking some of
the dogs with him along the fence side, Crocket
introduced
them again to the trail, at the distance of full three
hundred yards from the point at which they lost it.
The cry was now renewed with all its former spirit.
The fox, huntsmen and hounds, took to the right; but
as fields lay in that direction, I concluded that he would
soon turn and follow the belt of woodland, in the
opposite
direction; I therefore took to the left, by a pretty
little path, which might possibly have exerted some
influence
upon my determination. I had not proceeded
far before I encountered a large log lying directly across
my path. Here I resolved to experiment a little,
unobserved
,
upon Smooth-tooth's agility. If, said I, he
clears that log, in handsome style, I'll charge the first
(low) fence that intercepts my pursuit. Accordingly,
I put whip and heels to Smooth-tooth, who neared it
elegantly; but as soon as he came within jumping
distance
,
he stopt with a suddenness and self-composure,
which plainly signified that he expected me to let it down
for him. The consequence was, that I was very near
being laid across the log for my pains. I now became
testy, and resolved, that as he would not run and jump
it, he should stand and jump it. I therefore brought
him up to it, and commenced the old discipline. After
proposing to go round it, either way, without my
approbation
,
he at length raised his fore-feet, and threw them
lazily over the log, coming down upon them as the white
bear does in breaking ice, and stopt right astride of the
log. I was now prompted by curiosity to see, if left to
himself, whether he would stand there or go on; and
strange as it may seem, his own free will led him to
neither
alternativefor he was in the very act of drawing
his fore-feet back, with a kind of
fall-down
motion, when
I gave him the whip and forced him to drag, rather lift,
his hind feet over.
This feat performed, I moved on about two hundred
yards, when, as I had anticipated, I heard the hounds
coming directly towards me. I stopt, and in a minute's
time, Reynard crossed the path within thirty steps of me.
Then came the dogs in the order in which they entered
the field; and hard upon them came Crocket upon his
foaming steed.
Did you see him? exclaimed he, finding me near
the trail.
Yes, said I, distinctly.
How was his tail?
I did'nt notice, particularly, but sticking to him I
believe.
Oh, nonsense! said Crocket; was his brush up
or down?
Neither, said I, he
brushed
right across.
Here the Major uttered something harsh and dashed
on. I afterwards learned that experienced fox hunters
know the extent of his exhaustion, from the manner in
which he carries his tail.
Having
reasoned
out the fox's monument this time
successfully, I concluded I could do the like again: I
therefore reasoned, that after rambling about a short
time, he would seek the neighborhood of his burrow.
Accordingly I paced back (going around the log this
time) to a position where I might intercept him. Here
I remained about an hour, without hearing man, horse,
or dog: and then I paced home, where I arrived at
eleven o'clock, perfectly satisfied with fox hunting.
When my companions returned, they reported, that
five miles from where I was waiting for the fox, and
seven from the village, at about two o'clock, P. M., right
in the big road, near Richland Creek, the dogs
knocked
out, and could never be
knocked in
again.
But they brought home a rich fund of anecdote from
the chase, which served to enliven many an idle hour
afterwardsI reserved mine to the present moment, to
enliven the family fire-side, on these cold winter's
evenings
.
HALL.
THE WAX WORKS.
In the city of , resided once, a band of gay
spirits, who, though they differed from each other in
some respects, were all alike in this, that they were fond
of fun.
Billy Grossly was an odd compound of grave and
humorous. He seldom projected a scheme of
amusement
;
but never failed to take part in it, when it was
set on foot by others. Why, it was not easy to tell; for,
if he enjoyed the most amusing pastime at all, his
enjoyment
was all inward; for he rarely laughed, or gave
any other visible sign of lively pleasure.
Jack Clomes seemed to have been made for fun. It
was his meat and his drink: he could no more live
without it, than he could live without his ordinary diet.
Withal, Jack had a wonderful talent for manufacturing
food for his prevailing appetite. Indeed, his fault was,
that he never could be got to perform his part, in a
humorous
exhibition, which required concert with others,
without digressing from the main plot, whenever he
discovered
a fair opportunity of picking up a delicate
morsel
of fun, precisely suited to his own palate.
James McLass, was fond of a harmless frolic, and
whenever he engaged in it, if by preconcert, he always
made it a point of honor to perform his part in strict
obedience to the original design.
These three, with six or eight others, whose
dispositions
it is not necessary to mention, visited the village of
, in order to attend the races, which were in
progress in the vicinity of that place.
Towards the close of the races, it was discovered that
the joint funds of the whole fraternity, were not sufficient
to discharge the tavern bills of any two of them.
What was to be done in this emergency. To have
borrowed
would have been extremely mortifying, and
perhaps
a little inconvenientto have gone away without
paying their tavern bills, would have been contrary to
the first principles of Georgia honor. They were soon
relieved from their dilemma, by the ingenuity of Clomes.
q
During the races, a Down-easter had been
exhibiting
wax figures in the village; and concluding that the
profits of his business would end with the sports of the
turf, he had begun to pack up his portables, for removal
to a more eligible station.
Clomes now proposed, that his company should take
the places and parts of the retiring figuresor, to use his
own expressionshould play wax works, until they
made enough to pay their bills. A single night, it was
thought, would suffice for this purpose.
The plan was no sooner proposed, than it was
embraced
by all. The room and its furniture were engaged
for the evening; the parts were cast without difficulty;
and each went industriously to work, to fit himself for
the part he was to perform.
Billy Grossly, having the advantage of all the rest, in
height and abdominal rotundity, was by common
consent
chosen as a proper representative of Daniel
Lambert
;
the prodigious Englishman, who weighed, if I
remember rightly, upwards of six hundred pounds. The
reader need hardly be told, that with all his advantages,
Billy required the aid of at least eight pillows, with
some extra
chinking
, as we say in Georgia, to give him
a bulk corresponding with this enormous weight: nor
need he be told, that divers of the most decent bags which
the village afforded, with a small sheet, were put in
requisition
,
to contain him and his adjuncts.
Freedom Lazenby, was the only one of the company
who could, with any propriety, personify the Sleeping
Beauty; and of course this part was assigned to him.
Freedom's figure was quite too gross for the beau ideal
of female symmetry; and his face, though fine for a
man, had rather too much compass to represent nature's
finest touches of female beauty. However, it was soon
perceived that a counterpane would hide the defects of
the first, and a deep-frilled cap would reduce the last to
passable effeminacy. But there were two other
difficulties
,
which were not so easily removed. It is well
known, that the interest of the Sleeping Beauty is much
enlivened by an exposed bosom, by which reposes a
lovely infant. Even Clomes' ingenuity could not supply
these. A
living
child would not answer; for whether
taken to the arms of the Beauty asleep or awake, it
would be certain to give signs of life, before the
exhibition
ended; and there was not even a tolerable
manufacturer
of bosoms in the whole village. There was no
alternative; the interest of the spectators must yield to
the necessities of the performers: it was therefore
determined
that the Beauty's bosom should share the fate of
her person, and be covered; that an infant should be
manufactured in the best possible style, out of rags; and
that the paint-brush should supply the place of wax, for
the face. As there were no Raphaels, Titians, Wests
or Debuffes, in the village, the little innocent did not
come from the hands of the artist, with the most perfect
face imaginable; but it was the best that could be
given to it, and if it wanted interest, that was not the
fault of the company.
To James McLass was assigned the part of Miss
Eliza Failes, the unfortunate girl who was murdered by
her unnatural lover, Jason Fairbanks; and Clomes took
the part of the murderer.
It was proposed to represent Miss Failes at that
moment
when the blood was streaming from the lacerated
throat; but Jemmy refused to personify her in that
condition
,
and therefore they had to place him in another
part of the tragedy. That was selected, in which
Fairbanks
has his victim by the hair with the left hand, the
knife upraised in the right, in the act of commencing his
work of butchery.
The other figures, being merely distinguished
personages
,
were easily represented.
From some cause unknown, perhaps to invite visitors,
or merely because, perhaps, it was a matter that lay
fully within the range of the company's art, they
resolved
to exhibit a
corpse
in the anti-chamber, gratis; and
Pleasant Halgroce, a jolly son of Bacchus, kindly
offered
to play this part. Every child knows, that a plate
of burning spirits, with a little salt thrown into it, will
throw over the features of a living person, all the
paleness
and ghastliness of death. This was the only device
used, to convert Pleasant's smerky red face into that of
a corpse.
All matters being now arranged, and the performers
having practised their parts in their new characters until
they ceased to be ridiculous; they all took their places
after an early supper.
Before the doors were opened to the principal
exhibibition
,
a little incident occurred in the anti-chamber,
which suddenly closed the entertainment in this quarter;
and had a material bearing upon that in the other.
Pleasant Halgroce had taken his position, and was
playing a corpse to the life, or rather to the
death
, a
number of persons gathered round him, with becoming
solemnity, when a dumb man, who was devotedly
attached
to him joined the group. As soon as his eyes
fell upon the prostrate body of Pleasant, he burst into
the most piteous and unaffected wailing. Nothing could
restrain him from embracing his departed friend. He
approached him, and was in the act of bending over him,
to give him affection's fondest adieu, when a pretty stiff
breeze from Pleasant's lips, strengthened by previous
suppression, charged with the fumes of about a half pint
of brandy, saluted the face of the mourner. The
transition
from grief to joy was instantaneous with the poor
mute. He rose in transportspointed to Pleasant's face,
then to his own, touched his nose, gave it a significant
curl, snuffed gently, and then clapping both hands to his
stomach, he commenced inhaling and respiring, with all
the tone and emphasis of a pair of blacksmith's bellows.
Pleasant, now perceiving that exposure was inevitable,
rose, and rushed upon the dumb man, with the fury of a
tiger. This sudden resuscitation of Pleasant, to life in
its most healthful action, was as alarming to the mute,
as his breathing had been joyous; and he fled, with
Pleasant at his heels, as though all the tenants of the
church yard had risen upon him at once.
Pleasant had only to resume his dress, and appear in
a natural light, to pass unknown by all but the initiated;
for aside from burning brandy, he was no more like a
corpse than a rose is like a lily.
Pleasant being now out of employment, determined
to take upon himself the part of historian to the wax
figures.
The door leading to the figures was no sooner opened,
than several persons entered, and viewed them with
apparent
satisfaction. The spectators had increased to the
number of eight or ten, when a raw-boned, awkward,
gawky son of the forest, named Rory Brushwood, made
his appearance, paid his money, and entered. Pleasant,
of course, undertook to enrich his mind with historic
lore, while he feasted his eye upon the wonders of art.
This, said Pleasant, leading Rory up to the
Sleeping
Beauty, is the Sleeping Beauty: she's given up
on all hands to be the prettiest creature in the universal
world. Now, what would you give, my old Snort, to
have as pretty a wife and as pretty a baby as that?
Humph, said Rory, I don't think she's so dn'd
pretty as she mout be: and as for the baby, it looks like
a screech-owl in petticoats.
q2
Monstrous pretty, monstrous pretty! continued
Pleasant. But come herehurrying Rory off, lest
his remarks should wake the Sleeping Beautycome
here, and I'll show you something that'll make your hair
rise like a fighting cat's.
There! continued he, pointing to Billy Grossly,
just take a squint at that fellow, will you: That's
Daniel
Lambert: he was born in Nocatchey, and was
raised
upon nothing but grass-nuts and sweet potatoes; and
just see what he's come to! He weighs nine hundred
and fifty, dead weight.
He's a whaler! said Rory; but his face is
mighty
little, for his belly and legs.
Oh, said Pleasant, that's owing to the grass-nuts
and potatoes: you know they always puff up the lower
parts, mightily.
Nobody but Billy could have withstood this lecture
upon himself, without a smile; but he passed it off
admirably
.
The critical time was now at hand. Pleasant and
Rory advanced in front of Miss Failes and Mr.
Fairbanks
,
where they found another visitor viewing the
interesting couple. Pleasant deemed it unadvisable to
continue his lectures in the presence of Clomes; and had
Clomes himself been equally prudent, things might all
have ended well: but he was not.
While the three gentlemen just named were
gazing
on the figures before them, Jack took it into his
head to try a little experiment upon Miss Failes'
muscles
,
through the sensibilities of her head; accordingly
he tightened his grip suddenly upon her hair. This
brought from her a slight wince; but Jack did not
perceive
it. Encouraged by her philosophy, he made a
second pull with all the strength that lay in the muscles
and sinews of his left hand.
This brought a palpable grin from Miss Failes; and,
what was worse, in the zeal of his experiments upon
Jim's stoicism, Jack over-acted his own part a little.
Gentlemen, said Rory, in a tone of awful dignity
and self-satisfaction, as he turned gravely to the
by-standers
,
gentlemen, its flesh and blood.
There, said Pleasant, that just proves what I've
said: that these are the best wax works that ever was
showed in all these parts. It's most impossible to tell
'em from live folks.
Gentlemen, repeated Rory, with the same unruffled
composure, its flesh and blood. If I did'nt see that
fellow wink, and that woman
squinch
her face, then
hell's a dancing room.
No matter for that, said Pleasant, they're nothin'
but wax for all that: and if you don't b'lieve me, just
feel that fellow's cheek.
Rory raised his finger slowly, as if actually doubting
the evidence of his senses, and was just in the act of
touching Jack's cheek, when Jack snapped at his finger
like a shark, and caught it between his teeth with a
force most unreasonable for fun.
The shock was so unexpected and severe, that it
completely
unmanned Rory for the instant, and he sunk
powerless upon the floor. He soon rose, however, and
rose with Miss Failes' chair, which happened to be
vacant
just at this moment; and then, (to use an expression
of one of the characters,) if ever you saw wax works
cut dirt, they cut it then.
Mr. Fairbanks was the first to make his escape;
but not without being nearly overtaken by the chair.
Miss Failes followed nextthen General Washington
and other distinguished personages, whose attitudes
prepared
them for running. The Sleeping Beauty being a
little incumbered with bed-clothes, was rather slow in
retiring; she was enough in a hurry, however, to leave
her little infant in the middle of the floor, to Rory's care;
who, discovering its true character just as Daniel
Lambert
was removing his feathers to another apartment, let
him have the baby, with all his force, between the
shoulders
.
As this was only rags against pillows, Daniel
escaped as free from injury as the rest of them.
Rory now became clamorous for his money; but the
door-keeper was not to be found; and indeed claimed,
and kept, for his services, all that was made; leaving
the performers to settle their bills as they could.
HALL.
A SAGE CONVERSATION.
I love the aged matrons of our land. As a class, they
are the most pious, the most benevolent, the most useful,
and the most harmless of the human family. Their
life, is a life of good offices. At home, they are patterns
of industry, care, economy and hospitality; abroad, they
are ministers of comfort, peace and consolation. Where
affliction is, there are they, to mitigate its pangs; where
sorrow is, there are they to assuage its pains. Nor
night, nor day, nor summer's heat, nor winter's cold, nor
angry elements, can deter them from scenes of suffering
and distress. They are the first at the fevered couch,
and the last to leave it. They hold the first and last
cup to the parched lip. They bind the aching head,
close the dying eye, and linger in the death-stricken
habitation, to pour the last drop of consolation into the
afflicted bosoms of the bereaved. I cannot, therefore,
ridicule them myself, nor bear to hear them ridiculed in
my presence. And yet, I am often amused at their
conversations
;
and have amused
them
with a rehearsal of
their own conversations, taken down by me when they
little dreamed that I was listening to them. Perhaps my
reverence for their character, conspiring with a native
propensity to extract amusement from all that passes
under my observation, has accustomed me to pay a
uniformly
strict attention to all they say in my presence.
This much in extraordinary courtesy to those who
cannot distinguish between a simple narrative of an
amusing interview, and ridicule of the parties to it.
Indeed
I do not know that the conversation which I am
about to record, will be considered amusing by any of
my readers. Certainly the amusement of the readers
of my own times, is not the leading object of it, or of any
of the Georgia Scenes; forlorn as may be the hope,
that their main object will ever be answered.
When I seated myself to the sheet now before me, my
intention was merely to detail a conversation between
three ladies, which I heard many years since; confining
myself to only so much of it, as sprung from the ladies'
own thoughts, unawaked by the suggestions of others;
but, as the manner of its introduction will perhaps
interest
some of my readers, I will give it.
I was travelling with my old friend, Ned Brace, when
we stopped at the dusk of the evening at a house on the
road side, for the night. Here we found three nice, tidy,
aged matrons, the youngest of whom could not have
been under sixty; one of them of course was the lady of
the house, whose husband, old as he was, had gone from
home upon a land exploring expedition. She received
us hospitably, had our horses well attended to, and soon
prepared for us a comfortable supper. While these
things were doing, Ned and I engaged the other two in
conversation; in the course of which, Ned deported
himself with becoming seriousness. The kind lady of
the house occasionally joined us, and became
permanently
one of the party, from the time the first dish was
placed on the table. At the usual hour, we were
summoned
to supper; and as soon as we were seated, Ned,
unsolicited, and most unexpectedly to me, said grace.
I knew full well that this was a prelude to some trick, I
could not conjecture what. His explanation (except so
much as I discovered myself) was, that he knew that
one of us would be asked to say grace, and he thought
he might as well save the good ladies the trouble of
asking. The matter was, however, more fully explained
just before the moment of our retiring to bed arrived. To
this moment the conversation went round between the
good ladies and ourselves, with mutual interest to all.
It was much enlivened by Ned, who was capable, as the
reader has been heretofore informed, of making himself
extremely agreeable in all company; and who, upon
this occasion, was upon his very best behaviour. It was
immediately after I had looked at my watch in token of
my disposition to retire for the night, that the
conversation
turned upon marriages, happy and unhappy, strange,
unequal, runaways, &c. Ned rose in the midst of it,
and asked the landlady where we should sleep. She
pointed to an open shed-room adjoining the room in
which we were sitting, and separated from it by a log
partition, between the spaces of which might be seen all
that passed in the dining room; and so close to the
fire-place
of this apartment, that a loud whisper might be
easily heard from one to the other.
The strangest match, said Ned, resuming the
conversation
with a parson's gravity, that ever I heard
of, was that of George Scott and David Snow; two most
excellent men, who became so much attached to each
other that they actually got married
The lackaday! exclaimed one of the ladies.
And was it really a fact? enquired another.
Oh yes, ma'am, continued Ned, I knew them very
well, and often went to their house; and no people could
have lived happier or managed better than they did.
And they raised a lovely parcel of childrenas fine a
set as I ever saw, except their youngest son, Billy: he
was a little wild, but, upon the whole, a right clever boy
himself.Come, friend Baldwin, we're setting up too
late for travellers. So saying, Ned moved to the
shed-room
and I followed him.
The ladies were left in silent amazement; and Ned,
suspecting, doubtless, that they were listening for a laugh
from our chamber, as we entered it, continued the
subject
with unabated gravity, thus: You knew those two
men, did'nt you?
Where did they live? enquired I, not a little
disposed
to humor him.
Why, they lived down there, on Cedar Creek, close
by Jacob Denman'sOh, I'll tell you who their
daughter
Nancy marriedShe married John Clarkeyou
knew
him
very well.
Oh yes, said I, I knew John Clarke very well.
His
wife
was
a most excellent woman.
Well, the boys were just as clever, for boys, as she
was, for a girl, except Bill; and I never heard any thing
very
bad of him; unless it was his laughing in church;
that put me more out of conceit of him than any thing I
ever knew of himNow, Baldwin, when I go to
bed, I go to bed
to sleep
, and not to talk; and, therefore,
from the time my head touches the pillow, there must be
no more talking. Besides, we must take an early start
to-morrow, and I'm tired. So saying, he hopped into
his bed; and I obeyed his injunctions.
Before I followed his example, I could not resist the
temptation of casting an eye through the cracks of the
partition to see the effect of Ned's wonderful story upon
the kind ladies. Mrs. Barney (it is time to give their
names) was setting in a thoughtful posture; her left hand
supporting her chin, and her knee supporting her left
elbow. Her countenance was that of one who suffers
from a slight tooth-ache. Mrs. Shad leaned forward,
resting her fore-arm on her knees, and looking into the
fire as if she saw
groups of children
playing in it. Mrs.
Reed, the landlady, who was the fattest of the three, was
thinking and laughing alternately at short intervals.
From my bed, it required but a slight change of position
to see any one of the group at pleasure.
I was no sooner composed on my pillow, than the old
ladies drew their chairs close together, and began the
following colloquy in a low undertone, which rose as it
progressed:
Mrs. Barney
. Did'nt that man say them was two
men
that got married to one another?
Mrs. Shad
. It seemed to me so.
Mrs. Reed
. Why to be sure he did.I know he said
so; for he said what their names was.
Mrs. B.
Well, in the name o' sense, what did the
man mean by saying they raised a fine pa'cel o'
children
?
Mrs. R.
Why, bless your heart and soul, honey!
that's what I've been thinkin' about. It seems mighty
curious to me some how or other. I can't study it out,
no how.
Mrs. S.
The man must be jokin', certainly.
Mrs. R.
No, he was'nt jokin'; for I looked at him,
and he was just as much in yearnest as any body I ever
seed;
and besides, no
Christian
man would tell such a
story in that solemn way. And did'nt you hear that
other man say he knew their da'ter Nancy?
Mrs. S.
But la' messy! Mis' Reed, it can't be so. It
doesn't stand to reason, don't you know it don't?
Mrs. R.
Well, I would'nt think so; but it's hard for
me, some how, to dispute a
Christian
man's word.
Mrs. B.
I've been thinking the thing all over in my
mind, and I reckonnow I don't say it is so, for I don't
know nothing at all about itbut I reckon that one o'
them men was a woman dress'd in men's clothes; for
I've often hearn o' women doin' them things, and
following
their True-love to the wars, and bein' a watin'-boy
to 'em, and all sich.
Mrs. S.
Well, may be it's some how in that way
but la' me! 'twould o' been obliged to been found out;
don't you know it would? Only think how many
children
she had. Now it stands to reason, that at some
time or other it must have been found out.
Mrs. R.
Well, I'm an old woman any how, and I
reckon the good man won't mind what an old woman
says to him; so bless the Lord, if I live to see the
morning
,
I'll ask him about it.
I knew that Ned was surpassed by no man living in
extricating himself from difficulties; but how he was to
escape from this, with even tolerable credit to himself, I
could not devise.
The ladies here took leave of Ned's marvellous story,
drew themselves closely round the fire, lighted their
pipes, and proceeded as follows:
Mrs. B.
Jist before me and my old man was married,
there was a gal name Nancy Mountcastle, (puffpuff,)
and she was a mighty likely gal(puff) I know'd her
mighty wellshe dressed herself up in men's clothes
(puff, puff,) and followed Jemmy Darden from
P'ankatank, in
King and Queen
(puff) clean up to
Loudon
.
Mrs. S.
(puff, puff, puff, puff, puff.) And did he
marry
her?
Mrs. B.
(sighing deeply.) No: Jemmy did'nt marry
herpity he had'nt, poor thing.
Mrs. R.
Well, I know'd a gal on Tar river, done the
same thing(puff, puff, puff.) She followed Moses
Rusher 'way down somewhere in the South State(puff,
puff.)
Mrs. S.
(puff, puff, puff, puff.) And what did he do?
Mrs. R.
Ah(puff, puff,) Lord bless your soul,
honey
,
I can't tell you what he did. Bad enough.
Mrs. B.
Well, now it seems to meI don't know
much about itbut it seems to me men don't like to
marry gals that take on that way. It looks like it puts
'em out o' concait of'em.
Mrs. S.
I know'd one man that married a woman that
followed him from Car'lina to this State; but she did'nt
dress herself in men's clothes. You both know 'em.
You know Simpson Trotty's sister and Rachl's son,
Reuben. 'Twas him and his wife.
Mrs. R. and Mrs. B.
Oh yes, I know 'em mighty well.
Mrs. S.
Well, it was his wifeshe followed him out
to this State.
Mrs. B.
I know'd 'em all mighty well. Her da'ter
Lucy was the littlest teeny bit of a thing when it was born
I ever did see. But they tell me that when I was born
now I don't know any thing about it myselfbut the old
folks used to tell me, that when I was born, they put me
in a quart-mug, and mought o' covered me up in it.
Mrs. S.
The lackaday!
Mrs. R.
What ailment did Lucy die of, Mis' Barney?
Mrs. B.
Why, first she took the ager and fever, and
took a 'bundance o' doctor'r means for that. And then
she got a powerful bad cough, and it kept gittin' worse
and worse, till at last it turned into a consumption, and
she jist nat'ly wasted away, till she was nothing but skin
and bone, and she died; but, poor creater, she died
mighty happy; and I think in my heart, she made
the prettiest corpse, considerin', of any body I most
ever seed.
Mrs. R. and Mrs. S.
Emph! (solemnly.)
Mrs. R.
What did the doctors give her for the fever
and ager?
Mrs. B.
Oh, they gin' her a 'bundance o' truckI
don't know what all; and none of 'em holp her at all.
But at last she got over it, some how or other. If they'd
have just gin' her a sweat o' bitter yerbs, jist as the
spell was comin'on, it would have cured her right away.
Mrs. R.
Well, I reckon sheep-saffron the onliest
thing in nater for the ager.
Mrs. B.
I've always hearn it was wonderful in hives,
and measly ailments.
Mrs. R.
Well, it's jist as good for an agerit's a
powerful sweat. Mrs. Clarkson told me, that her cousin
Betsey's aunt Sally's Nancy was cured sound and well
by it, of a hard shakin' ager.
Mrs. S.
Why you don't tell me so!
Mrs. R.
Oh bess your heart, honey, it's every word
true; for she told me so with her own mouth.
Mrs. S.
A hard, hard shakin' ager!!
Mrs. R.
Oh yes, honey, it's the truth.
Mrs. S.
Well, I'm told that if you'll wrap the inside
skin of an egg round your little finger, and go three days
reg'lar to a young persimmon, and tie a string round it,
and every day, tie three knots in it, and then not go agin
for three days, that the ager will leave you.
Mrs. B.
I've often hearn o' that, but I don't know
about it. Some people don't believe in it.
Mrs. S.
Well, Davy Cooper's wife told me, she did'nt
believe in it; but she tried it, and it cured her sound
and well.
Mrs. R.
I've hearn of many folks bein' cured in that
way. And what did they do for Lucy's cough, Mis'
Barney.
Mrs. B.
Oh dear me, they gin' her a powerful chance
o' truck. I reckon, first and last, she took at least a pint
o' lodimy.
Mrs. S. and Mrs. R.
The law!
Mrs. S.
Why that ought to have killed her, if
nothing
else. If they'd jist gin' her a little cumfry and
alecampane, stewed in honey, or sugar, or molasses, with
a little lump o' mutton suet or butter in it: it would have
cured her in two days sound and well.
Mrs. B.
I've always counted cumfry and alecampane
the lead of all yerbs for colds.
Mrs. S.
Horehound and sugar 's mazin good.
Mrs. B.
Mighty goodmighty good.
Mrs. R.
Powerful good. I take mightily to a sweat
of sage-tea, in desperate bad colds.
Mrs. S.
And so do I, Mis' Reed. Indeed I have a
great leanin' to sweats of yerbs, in all ailments sich as
colds, and rheumaty pains, and pleurisies, and sich
they're wonderful good. Old brother Smith came to
my house from Bethany meeting, in a mighty bad way,
with a cold, and cough, and his throat and nose all stopt
up; seemed like it would 'most take his breath away,
and it was dead o' winter, and I had nothin' but dried
yerbs, sich as camomile, sage, pennyryal, catmint,
hore-hound
,
and sich; so I put a hot rock to his feet, and
made him a large bowl o' catmint tea, and I reckon he
drank most two quarts of it through the night, and it put
him in a mighty fine sweat, and loosened all the
phleem
,
and opened all his head; and the next morning, says he
to me, says he, sister Shadyou know he's a mighty
kind spoken man, and always was so 'fore he joined
society
;
and the old man likes a joke yet right well, the
old man does; but he's a mighty good man, and I think
he prays with greater libity, than most any one of his
age I most ever seedDon't you think he does, Mis'
Reed?
Mrs. R.
Powerful.
Mrs. B.
Who did he marry?
Mrs. S.
Why, he marriedstop, I'll tell you directly
Why, what does make my old head forget so?
Mrs. B.
Well, it seems to me I don't remember like
I used to. Did'nt he marry a Ramsbottom?
Mrs. R.
No. Stay, I'll tell you who he married
presently
Oh,
stay! why I'll tell you who he married!
He married old daddy Johny Hooer's da'ter, Mournin'.
Mrs. S.
Why, la! messy on me, so he did!
Mrs. B.
Why, did he marry a Hooer?
Mrs. S.
Why, to be sure he did.You knew
Mournin'
.
Mrs. B.
Oh, mighty well; but I'd forgot that brother
Smith married her: I really thought he married a
Ramsbottom.
Mrs. R.
Oh no, bless your soul, honey, he married
Mournin'.
Mrs. B.
Well, the law me, I'm clear beat!
Mrs. S.
Oh it's so, you may be sure it is.
Mrs. B.
Emp, emph, emph, emph! And brother
Smith married Mournin' Hooer! Well, I'm clear put
out! Seems to me I'm gittin' mighty forgetful some how.
Mrs. S.
Oh yes, he married Mournin', and I saw her
when she joined society.
Mrs. B.
Why, you don't tell me so!
Mrs. S.
Oh it's the truth. She did'nt join till after
she was married, and the church took on mightily about
r2
his marrying one out of society. But after she joined
they all got satisfied.
Mrs. R.
Why, la! me, the seven stars is 'way over
here!
Mrs. B.
Well, let's light our pipes, and take a short
smoke, and go to bed. How did you come on raisin'
chickens this year, Mis' Shad?
Mrs. S.
La messy, honey! I have had mighty bad
luck. I had the prettiest pa'sel you most ever seed till
the varment took to killin' 'em.
Mrs. R. and Mrs. B.
The varment!!
Mrs. S.
Oh dear, yes. The hawk catched a
powerful
sight of them; and then the varment took to 'em, and
nat'ly took 'em fore and aft, bodily, till they left most
none at all hardly. Sucky counted 'em up t'other day,
and there war'nt but thirty-nine, she said, countin' in the
old speckle hen's chickens that jist come off of her nest.
Mrs. R. and Mrs. B.
Humph-h-h-h-!
Mrs. R.
Well, I've had bad luck too. Billy's
hound-dogs
broke up most all my nests.
Mrs. B.
Well, so they did me, Mis' Reed. I always
did despise a hound-dog upon the face of yea'th.
Mrs. R.
Oh, they're the bawllinest, squallinest,
thievishest
things ever was about one; but Billy will have
'em, and I think in my soul his old Troup's the beat of
all creaters I ever seed in all my born days a suckin' o'
hen's eggsHe's clean most broke me up entirely.
Mrs. S.
The lackaday!
Mrs. R.
And them that was hatched out, some took
to takin' the gaps, and some the pip, and one ailment or
other, till they most all died.
Mrs. S.
Well I reckon there must be somethin' in
the season this year, that an't good for fowls; for Larkin
Goodman's brother Jimme's wife's aunt Penny, told me,
she lost most all her fowls with different sorts of ailments,
the like of which she never seed beforeThey'd jist go
'long lookin, right well, and tilt right over backwards,
(
Mrs. B.
The law!) and die right away, (
Mrs. R.
Did
ever!) with a sort o' somethin' like the blind staggers.
Mrs. B. and Mrs. R.
Messy on me!
Mrs. B.
I reckon they must have cat somethin' did'nt
agree with them.
Mrs. S.
No they did'nt, for she fed 'em every mornin'
with her own hand.
Mrs. B.
Well, it's mighty curious!
A short pause ensued, which was broken by Mrs.
Barney, withAnd brother Smith married Mournin'
Hooer! It came like an opiate upon my senses, and I
dropt asleep.
The next morning, when we rose from our beds, we
found the good ladies sitting round the fire just as I left
them, for they rose long before us.
Mrs. Barney was just in the act of ejaculating, And
brother Smith married Mournin'when she was
interrupted
by our entry into the dining room. We were
hardly seated, before Mrs. Reed began to verify her
promise. Mr., said she to Ned, did'nt you
say last night, that them was two
men
that got married
to one another?
Yes madam, said Ned.
And did'nt you say they raised a fine pa'cel of
children
?
Yes madam, except Billy.I said, you know, that
he was a little wild.
Well, yes; I know you said Billy was'nt as clever
as the rest of them. But we old women were talking
about it last night after you went out, and none of us
could make it out, how they could have children; and
I said, I reckoned you would'nt mind an old woman's
chat; and, therefore, that I would ask you how it could
be? I suppose you won't mind telling an old woman
how it was.
Certainly not, madam. They were both widowers
before they fell in love with each other and got married.
The lack-a-day! I wonder none of us thought o'
that. And they had children before they got married?
Yes madam; they had none afterwards that I
heard of.
We were here informed that our horses were in
waiting
,
and we bad the good ladies farewell.
BALDWIN.
THE SHOOTING MATCH.
Shooting matches are probably nearly coeval with
the colonization of Georgia. They are still common
throughout the Southern States; though they are not as
common as they were twenty-five or thirty years ago.
Chance led me to one about a year ago. I was
travelling
in one of the north-eastern counties, when I overtook
a swarthy, bright-eyed, smerky little fellow, riding a
small poney, and bearing on his shoulder a long heavy
rifle, which, judging from its looks, I should say had
done service in Morgan's corps.
Good morning, sir! said I, reining up my horse as
I came beside him.
How goes it stranger? said he, with a tone of
independence
and self-confidence, that awaked my curiosity
to know a little of his character.
Going driving? inquired I.
Not exactly, replied he, surveying my horse with
a quizical smile, I have n't been a driving
by myself
for a year or two, and my nose has got so bad lately I
can't carry a cold trail
without hounds to help me
.
Alone, and without hounds, as he was, the question
was rather a silly one; but it answered the purpose for
which it was put, which was only to draw him into
conversation
,
and I proceeded to make as decent a retreat
as I could.
I did n't know, said I, but that you were going
to meet the huntsmen, or going to your stand.
Ah, sure enough, rejoined he, that
mout
be a bee,
as the old woman said when she killed a wasp. It seems
to me I ought to know you.
Well, if you
ought
, why
don't
you?
What
mout
your name be?
It
might
be any thing, said I, with borrowed wit;
for I knew my man, and knew what kind of
conversation
would please him most.
Well, what
is
it then?
It
is
, Hall, said I; but you know it might as well
have been any thing else.
Pretty digging! said he. I find you're not the
fool I took you to be; so here's to a better acquaintance
with you.
With all my heart, returned I; but you must be
as clever as I've been, and give me your name.
To be sure I will, my old coontake ittake it,
and welcome. Any thing else about me you'd like to
have?
No, said I, there's nothing else about you worth
having.
Oh, yes there is, stranger! Do you see this?
holding
up his ponderous rifle with an ease that astonished
me. If you will go with me to the shooting match, and
see me knock out the
bull's eye
with her a few times,
you'll agree the old
Soap-stick's
worth something when
Billy Curlew puts his shoulder to her.
This short sentence was replete with information to
me. It taught me that my companion was
Billy
Curlew
;
that he was going to a
Shooting match;
that he
called his rifle the
Soap-stick
, and that he was very
confident
of winning beef with her; or, which is nearly, but
not quite the same thing,
driving the cross with her
.
Well, said I, if the shooting match is not too far
out of my way, I'll go to it with pleasure.
Unless your way lies through the woods from here,
said Billy, it 'll not be much out of your way; for it's
only a mile ahead of us, and there is no other road for
you to take, till you get there; and as that thing you're
riding in, an't well suited to fast travelling, among
brushy knobs, I reckon you won't lose much by
going
by. I reckon you hardly ever was at a shooting
match, stranger, from the cut of your coat?
Oh yes, returned I, many a time. I won beef at
one, when I was hardly old enough to hold a shot-gun
off-hand.
Children
don't go to shooting matches about here,
said he, with a smile of incredulity. I never heard of
but one that did, and he was a little
swinge
-cat.He
was born a shooting, and killed squirrels before he was
weaned.
Nor did
I
ever hear of but one, replied I, and
that one was myself.
And where did you win beef so young, stranger?
At Berry Adams'.
Why stop, stranger, let me look at you good! Is
your name
Lyman
Hall?
The very same, said I.
Well, dang my buttons, if you an't the very boy my
daddy used to tell me about. I was too young to
recollect
you myself; but I've heard daddy talk about you
many a time. I believe mammy's got a
neck-handkerchief
now, that daddy won on your shooting at Collen
Reid's store, when you were hardly knee high. Come
along Lyman, and I'll go my death upon you at the
shooting match, with the old Soap stick at your
shoulder
.
Ah, Billy, said I, the old Soap-stick will do much
better at your own shoulder. It was my mother's
notion
,
that sent me to the shooting match at Berry Adams';
and to tell you the honest truth, it was altogether a
chance shot that made me win beef; but that was n't
generally known; and most every body believed that I
was carried there on account of my skill in shooting;
and my fame was spread far and wide, I well remember.
I remember too, perfectly well, your father's bet on me,
at the store.
He
was at the shooting match, and nothing
could make him believe, but that I was a great shot with
a rifle, as well as a shot-gun. Bet he would, on me, in
spite of all I could say; though I assured him, that I
had never shot a rifle in my life. It so happened too,
that there were but two bullets, or rather, a bullet and a
half; and so confident was your father in my skill, that
he made me shoot the half bullet; and, strange to tell,
by another chance shot I like to have drove the cross,
and won his bet.
Now I know you're the very chap; for I heard
daddy tell that very thing about the half bullet. Don't
say any thing about it, Lyman, and durn my old shoes if
I don't tare the lint off the boys with you at the shooting
match. They'll never 'spect such a looking man as you
are of knowing any thing about a rifle. I'll risk your
chance
shots.
I soon discovered that the father had eaten sour
grapes, and the son's teeth were on edge; for Billy was
just as incorrigibly obstinate, in his belief of my dexterity
with a rifle as his father had been before him.
We soon reached the place appointed for the shooting
match. It went by the name of Sims' Cross Roads;
because, here two roads intersected each other; and
because, from the time that the first had been laid out,
Archibald Sims had resided there. Archibald had been
a Justice of the Peace in his day; (and where is the man
of his age in Georgia who has not?) consequently he
was called '
Squire
Sims. It is the custom in this State,
when a man has once acquired a title, civil or military,
to force it upon him as long as he lives; hence the
countless
number of titled personages, who are introduced in
these sketches.
We stopt at the 'Squire's door. Billy hastily
dismounted
,
gave me the shake of the hand which he had been
reluctantly reserving for a mile back; and, leading me
up to the 'Squire, thus introduced me: Uncle Archy,
this is Lyman Hall; and for all you see him in these
fine clothes, he's a
swinge
-cata darn sight cleverer
fellow than he looks to be. Wait till you see him lift
the old Soap-stick, and draw a bead upon the bull's-eye.
You
gwine
to see fun here to-dayDon't say nothing
about it.
Well, Mr. Swinge-cat, said the 'Squire, here's to
a better acquaintance with you, offering me his hand.
How goes it, uncle Archy? said I, taking his hand
warmly; (for I am always free and easy with those who
are so with me; and in this course I rarely fail to
please)How's the old woman?
Egad, said the 'Squire, chuckling, there you're
too hard for me; for she died two and twenty years ago,
and I have n't heard a word from her since.
What! and you never married again!
Never, as God's my Judge! (a solemn
asseveration
truly, upon so light a subject.)
Well, that's not my fault.
No, nor it's not mine
ni
ther, said the 'Squire.
Here we were interrupted by the cry of another
Rancey
SniffleHello here! All you as wish to put in for
the shoot'n match, come on here! for the putt'n in's
riddy
to begin.
About sixty persons, including mere spectators, had
collected; the most of whom were more or less
obedient
to the call of Mealy Whitecottonfor that was the
name of the self-constituted commander-in-chief. Some
hastened, and some loitered, as they desired to be first
or last on the list; for they shoot in the order in which
their names are entered.
The beef was not present, nor is it ever upon such
occasions; but several of the company had seen it, who
all concurred in the opinion that it was a good beef, and
well worth the price that was set upon iteleven dollars.
A general enquiry ran round, in order to form some
opinion as to the number of shots that would be taken;
for, of course, the price of a shot is cheapened in
proportion
to the increase of that number. It was soon
ascertained
that not more than twenty persons would take
chances; but these twenty agreed to take the number
of shots, at twenty-five cents each.
The competitors now began to give in their names;
some for one, some for two, three, and a few for as many
as four shots.
Billy Curlew hung back to the last; and when
the list was offered to him, five shots remained
undisposed
of.
How many shots left? inquired Billy.
Five: was the reply.
s
Well, I take 'em all. Put down four shots to me,
and one to Lyman Hall, paid for by William Curlew.
I was thunder strucknot at his proposition to pay
for my shot, because I knew that Billy meant it as a
token of friendship, and he would have been hurt if I
had refused to let him do me this favor; but at the
unexpected
announcement of my name as a competitor for
beef, at least one hundred miles from the place of my
residence. I was prepared for a challenge from Billy
to some of his neighbors for a
private
match upon me;
but not for this.
I therefore protested against his putting in for me, and
urged every reason to dissuade him from it, that I could,
without wounding his feelings.
Put it down! said Billy, with the authority of an
Emperor, and with a look that spoke volumes intelligible
to every by-standerReckon I don't know what I'm
about? Then wheeling off, and muttering in an under,
self-confident toneDang old Roper, continued he,
if he don't knock that cross to the north corner of
creation
and back again before a cat can lick her foot.
Had I been the king of the cat tribe, they could not
have regarded me with more curious attention than did
the whole company from this moment. Every inch of
me was examined with the nicest scrutiny; and some
plainly expressed by their looks, that they never would
have taken me for such a bite. I saw no alternative
but to throw myself upon a third chance shot; for though
by the rules of the sport I would have been allowed to
shoot by proxy, by all the rules of good breeding I was
bound to shoot in person. It would have been
unpardonable
,
to disappoint the expectations, which had been
raised on me. Unfortunately too, for me, the match
differed in one respect from those which I had been in
the habit of attending in my younger days. In olden
time the contest was carried on chiefly with
shot-guns
,
a generic term which, in those days, embraced three
descriptions of fire-arms
Indian-traders
, (a long, cheap,
but sometimes excellent kind of gun, that mother Britain
used to send hither for traffic with the Indians,)
the large
Musket
, and the
Shot-gun
, properly so called. Rifles
were, however, always permitted to compete with them,
under equitable restrictions. These were, that they
should be fired off-hand, while the shot-guns were
allowed
a rest, the distance being equal; or that the
distance should be one hundred yards for the rifle,
to sixty, for the shot-gun, the mode of firing being
equal.
But this was a match of rifles exclusively; and these
are by far the most common at this time.
Most of the competitors fire at the same target; which
is usually a board from nine inches to a foot wide,
charred on one side as black as it can be made by fire
without impairing materially the uniformity of its surface;
on the darkened side of which is
pegged
, a square piece
of white paper, which is larger or smaller, according to
the distance at which it is to be placed from the
marksmen
.
This is almost invariably sixty yards, and for it,
the paper is reduced to about two and a half inches
square. Out of the centre of it is cut a rhombus of about
the width of an inch, measured diagonallythis is the
bull's-eye
, or
diamond
, as the marksmen choose to call
it: in the centre of this is the cross. But every man
is permitted to fix his target to his own taste; and
accordingly
,
some remove one fourth of the paper, cutting
from the centre of the square to the two lower corners;
so as to leave a large angle opening from the centre
downwards; while others reduce the angle more or less:
but it is rarely the case that all are not satisfied with one
of these figures.
The beef is divided into five prizes, or, as they are
commonly termed, five
quarters
the hide and tallow
counting as one. For several years after the
revolutionary
war, a sixth was added; the
lead
which was shot
in the match. This was the prize of the sixth best shot;
and it used to be carefully extracted from the board, or
tree, in which it was lodged, and afterwards remoulded.
But this grew out of the exigency of the times, and has,
I believe, been long since abandoned every where.
The three master shots, and rivals, were Moses
Firmby
,
Larkin Spivey and Billy Curlewto whom was
added, upon this occasion, by common consent, and with
awful forebodingsyour humble servant.
The target was fixed, at an elevation of about three
feet from the ground; and the judges (Captain Turner
and Squire Porter) took their stands by it, joined by
about half the spectators.
The first name on the catalogue was Mealy
Whitecotton
.
Mealy stept out, rifle in hand, and toed the mark.
His rifle was about three inches longer than himself, and
near enough his own thickness to make the remark of
Darby Chislom, as he stept out, tolerably appropriate
Here comes the corn-stock and the sucker! said Darby.
Kiss my foot! said Mealy. The way I'll creep
into that bull-eye's a fact.
You'd better creep into your hind-sight, said Darby.
Mealy raised, and fired.
A pretty good shot! Meal said one. Yes, a
blamed good shot! said a second. Well done Meal!
said a third.
I was rejoiced when one of the company enquired,
Where is it? for I could hardly believe they were
founding these remarks upon the evidence of their
senses
.
Just on the right hand side of the bull's-eye, was
the reply.
I looked with all the power of my eyes; but was
unable
to discover the least change in the surface of the
paper. Their report, however, was trueso much
keener is the vision of a practiced than unpracticed eye.
The next in order was Hiram Baugh. Hiram was
like some race-horses which I have seenhe was too
good, not to contend for every prize, and too good for
nothing ever to win one.
Gentlemen, said he, as he came to the mark, I
don't say that I'll win beef; but if my piece don't blow,
I'll eat the paper; or be mighty apt to do it, if you'll
b'lieve my racket. My powder are not good powder,
gentlemenI bought it
thum
(from) Zeb. Daggett, and
gin him three quarters of a dollar a pound for it; but it
are not what I call good powder, gentlemen; but if old
Buck-killer burns it clear, the boy you call Hiram
Baugh eat's paper, or comes mighty near it.
Well, blaze away, said Mealy, and be  to
you, and Zeb. Daggett and your powder and Buck-killer,
and your powder-horn and shot-pouch to boot! How
long you gwine stand thar talking 'fore you shoot?
Never mind, said Hiram, I can talk a little and
shoot a little too; but that's nothin'Here goes!
Hiram assumed the figure of a note of interrogation
took a long sight, and fired.
I've eat paper, said he, at the crack of the gun,
without looking, or seeming to look towards the target.
Buck-killer made a clear racket. Where am I,
gentlemen
?
You're just between Mealy and the diamond, was
the reply.
I said I'd eat paper, and I've done it; have'nt I,
gentlemen?
And 'spose you have! said Mealy, what do that
'mount to? You'll not win beef, and never did.
s2
Be that as it mout be, I've beat Meal. 'Cotton mighty
easy; and the boy you call Hiram Baugh are able to
do it.
And what do that 'mount to? Who the devil an't
able to beat Meal. 'Cotton! I don't makes no pretense
of bein' nothin' great, no how: but you always makes
out as if you were gwine to keep 'em makin' crosses for
you constant; and then do nothin' but `
eat paper
' at
last; and that's a long way from
eatin' beef
, 'cordin' to
Meal. 'Cotton's notions, as you call him.
Simon Stow was now called on.
Oh Lord! exclaimed two or three: Now we
have it. It 'll take him as long to shoot as it would
take Squire Dobbins to run round a
track
o' land.
Good-by, boys, said Bob Martin.
Where you going Bob?
Going to gather in my cropI'll be back agin though
by the time Sime. Stow shoots.
Simon was used to all this, and therefore it did not
disconcert
him in the least. He went off and brought his
own target, and set it up with his own hand.
He then wiped out his riflerubbed the pan with his
hatdrew a piece of tow through the touch-hole with
his wiperfilled his charger with great carepoured
the powder into the rifle with equal cautionshoved in
with his finger the two or three vagrant grains that
lodged round the mouth of his piecetook out a handful
of bulletslooked them all over carefullyselected one
without flaw or wrinkledrew out his patchingfound
the most even part of itsprung open the grease-box in
the breech of his rifletook up just so much grease
distributed it with great equality over the chosen part of
his patchinglaid it over the muzzle of his rifle, grease
side downplaced his ball upon itpressed it a little
then took it up and turned the neck a little more
perpendicularly
downwardplaced his knife-handle on it
just buried it in the mouth of the riflecut off the
redundant
patching just above the bulletlooked at it, and
shook his head, in token that he had cut off too much or
too little, no one knew whichsent down the ball
measured the contents of his gun with his first and second
fingers, on the protruding part of the ramrodshook his
head again, to signify there was too much or too little
powderprimed carefullyplaced an arched piece of
tin over the hind sight to shade ittook his placegot a
friend to hold his hat over the fore-sight to shade ittook
a very long sightfiredand did'nt even eat the paper.
My piece was badly
loadned
, said Simon, when he
learned the place of his ball.
Oh, you did'nt take time, said Mealy. No man
can shoot that's in such a hurry as you is. I'd hardly
got to sleep 'fore I heard the crack o' the gun.
The next was Moses Firmby. He was a tall, slim
man, of rather sallow complexion; and it is a singular
fact, that though probably no part of the world is more
healthy than the mountainous region of Georgia, the
mountaineers have not generally robust frames or fine
complexions: they are, however, almost inexhaustible
by toil.
Moses kept us not long in suspense. His rifle was
already charged, and he fixed it upon the target, with
a steadiness of nerve and aim that was astonishing to
me and alarming to all the rest. A few seconds, and
the report of his rifle broke the deathlike silence which
prevailed.
No great harm done yet, said Spivey, manifestly
relieved from anxiety by an event which seemed to me
better calculated to produce despair. Firmby's ball had
cut out the lower angle of the diamond, directly on a
right line with the cross.
Three or four followed him without bettering his shot;
all of whom, however, with one exception, eat the
paper.
It now came to Spivey's turn. There was nothing
remarkable in his person or manner. He took his place,
lowered his rifle slowly from a perpendicular, until it
came on a line with the markheld it there like a vise
for a moment, and fired.
Pretty
sevigrous
, but nothing killing yet, said Billy
Curlew, as he learned the place of Spivey's ball.
Spivey's ball had just broken the upper angle of the
diamond; beating Firmby about half its width.
A few more shots, in which there was nothing
remarkable
,
brought us to Billy Curlew. Billy stept out with
much confidence; and brought the Soap-stick to an
order, while he deliberately rolled up his shirt sleeves.
Had I judged of Billy's chance of success from the looks
of his gun, I should have said it was hopeless. The
stock of Soap-stick seemed to have been made with a
case knife; and had it been, the tool would have been
but a poor apology for its clumsy appearance. An
augur hole in the breech, served for a grease-boxa
cotton string assisted a single screw in holding on the
lock; and the thimbles were made, one of brass, one of
iron, and one of tin.
Where's Lark. Spivey's bullet? called out Billy to
the judges, as he finished rolling up his sleeves.
About three quarters of an inch from the cross,
was the reply.
Well, clear the way! the Soap-stick's coming, and
she'll be along in there among 'em presently.
Billy now planted himself astraddle, like an inverted
Vshot forward his left hipdrew his body back to an
angle of about forty-five degrees with the plane of the
horizonbrought his cheek down close to the breech of
old Soap-stick, and fixed her upon the mark with
untrembling
hand. His sight was long, and the swelling
muscles of his left arm led me to believe that he was
lessening his chance of success, with every half second
that he kept it burdened with his ponderous rifle; but it
neither flagged nor wavered until Soap-stick made her
report.
Where am I? said Billy, as the smoke rose from
before his eye.
You've jist touched the cross on the lower side,
was the reply of one of the judges.
I was afraid I was drawing my bead a
leetle
too
fine, said Billy. Now, Lyman, you see what the
Soap-stick can do.Take her, and show the boys how
you used to do when you was a baby.
I begged to reserve my shot to the last; pleading,
rather sophistically, that it was in point of fact, one of
Billy's shots. My plea was rather indulged than
sustained
,
and the marksmen who had taken more than one
shot, commenced the second round. This round was a
manifest improvement upon the first. The cross was
driven three times: once by Spivey, once by Firmby,
and once by no less a personage than Mealy
Whitecotton
,
whom chance seemed to favor for this time, merely
that he might retaliate upon Hiram Baugh; and the
bull's-eye was disfigured out of all shape.
The third and fourth rounds were shot. Billy
discharged
his last shot, which left the rights of parties
thus: Billy Curlew first and fourth choice, Spivey
second
,
Firmby third, and Whitecotton fifth. Some of
my readers may perhaps be curious to learn, how a
distinction
comes to be made between several, all of whom
drive the cross. The distinction is perfectly natural and
equitable. Threads are stretched from the uneffaced
parts of the once intersecting lines, by means of which
the original position of the cross is precisely ascertained.
Each bullet-hole being nicely pegged up as it is made, it
is easy to ascertain its circumference. To this, I believe
they usually, if not invariably, measure, where none of
the balls touch the cross; but if the cross be driven, they
measure from it to the centre of the bullet-hole. To
make a draw shot, therefore, between two, who drive
the cross, it is necessary that the centre of both balls
should pass directly through the crossa thing that
very rarely happens.
The Bite
alone remained to shoot. Billy wiped out
his rifle carefully, loaded her to the top of his skill, and
handed her to me. Now, said he, Lyman draw a
fine bead, but not too fine; for Soap-stick bears up her
ball well. Take care and don't touch the trigger, until
you've got your bead; for she's spring-trigger'd and
goes mighty easy: but you hold her to the place you
want her, and if she don't go there dang old Roper.
I took hold of Soap-stick, and lapsed immediately into
the most hopeless despair. I am sure I never handled
as heavy a gun in all my life. Why Billy, said I,
you little mortal you! what do you use such a gun as
this for?
Look at the bull's-eye yonder! said he.
True, said I, but
I
can't shoot herit is
impossible
.
Go long, you old coon! said Billy, I see what
you're atintimating that all this was merely to make
the coming shot the more remarkableDaddy's little
boy don't shoot any thing but the old Soap-stick here
to-day, I know.
The judges, I knew, were becoming impatient, and
withal, my situation was growing more embarrassing
every second; so I e'en resolved to try the Soap-stick
without further parley.
I stept out, and the most intense interest was excited
all around me, and it flashed like electricity around the
target, as I judged from the anxious gaze of all in that
direction.
Policy dictated that I should fire with a falling rifle,
and I adopted this mode; determining to fire as soon as
the sights came on a line with the diamond,
bead
or no
bead
. Accordingly I commenced lowering old
Soap-stick
;
but, in spite of all my muscular powers, she was
strictly obedient to the laws of gravitation, and came
down with a uniformly accelerated velocity. Before I
could arrest her downward flight, she had not only
passed
the target, but was making rapid encroachments on
my own toes.
Why, he's the weakest man in the arms I ever
seed, said one in a half whisper.
It's only his fun, said Billy: I know him.
It may be fun, said the other; but it looks
mightily
like yearnest to a man up a tree.
I now, of course, determined to reverse the mode of
firing, and put forth all my physical energies to raise
Soap-stick to the mark. The effort silenced Billy, and
gave tongue to all his companions. I had just strength
enough to master Soap-stick's obstinate proclivity, and
consequently my nerves began to exhibit palpable signs
of distress with her first imperceptible movement
upward
.
A trembling commenced in my armsincreased,
and extended rapidly to my body and lower extremities;
so that by the time that I brought Soap-stick up to the
mark, I was shaking from head to foot, exactly like a
man under the continued action of a strong galvanic
battery. In the mean time my friends gave vent to their
feelings freely.
I swear poin' blank, said one, that man can't
shoot.
He used to shoot well, said another; but can't
now nor never could.
You better
git
away from 'bout that mark! bawled
a third, for I'll be dod durned if Broadeloth don't give
some of you the dry gripes if you stand too close thare.
The stranger's got the
peedoddles
,
[12]
[12]
This word was entirely new to me; but like most, if not all
words, in use among the common people, it is doubtless a legitimate
English word, or rather a compound of two words, the last a little
corrupted, and was very aptly applied in this instance. It is a
compound
of
pee
, to peep with one eye, and
daddle
, to totter, or
wabble.
said a fourth,
with humorous gravity.
If he had bullets enough in his gun, he'd shoot a ring
round the bull's-eye big as a spinning-wheel, said a fifth.
As soon as I found that Soap-stick was high enough,
(for I made no further use of the sights than to ascertain
this fact,) I pulled trigger, and off she went. I have
always
found that the most creditable way of relieving
myself of derision, was to heighten it myself as much as
possible. It is a good plan in all circles, but by far the
best which can be adopted among the plain rough
farmers
of the country. Accordingly I brought old
Soap-stick
to an order, with an air of triumphtipt Billy a
wink, and observed, Now Billy 's your time to make
your fortuneBet 'em two to one that I've knocked out
the cross.
No, I'll be dod blamed if I do, said Billy; but I'll
bet you two to one you han't hit the plank.
Ah, Billy, said I, I was joking about
betting
, for
I never bet; nor would I have you to bet: indeed I do
not feel exactly right in shooting for beef; for it is a
species of gaming at last: but I'll say this muchif that
cross is'nt kncked out, I'll never shoot for beef again as
long as I live.
By dod, said Mealy Whitecotton, you'll lose no
great things at that.
Well, said I, I reckon I know a little about
wabbling
.
Is it possible, Billy, a man who shoots as well
as you do, never practiced shooting with the double
wabble? It's the greatest take in, in the world, when
you learn to drive the cross with it. Another sort for
getting bets upon, to the drop-sight, with a single
wabble
!
And the Soap-stick's the very yarn for it.
Tell you what, stranger, said one, you're too hard
for us all here. We never
hearn
o' that sort o' shoot'n
in these parts.
Well, returned I, you've seen it now, and I'm the
boy that can do it.
The judges were now approaching with the target,
and a singular combination of circumstances had kept all
my party in utter ignorance of the result of my shot.
Those about the target had been prepared by Billy
Curlew for a great shot from me; their expectations
had received assurance from the courtesy which had
been extended to me; and nothing had happened to
disappoint
them, but the single caution to them against the
dry gripes, which was as likely to have been given in
irony as in earnest; for my agonies under the weight of
the Soap-stick, were either imperceptible to them at the
distance of sixty yards, or, being visible, were taken as
the flourishes of an expert who wished to astonish the
natives. The other party did not think the direction
of my ball worth the trouble of a question; or, if they
did, my airs and harangue had put the thought to flight
before it was delivered. Consequently they were all
transfixed with astonishment when the judges presented
the target to them, and gravely observedIt's only
second best after all the fuss. Second best!
exclaimed
I, with uncontrollable transports. The whole of
my party rushed to the target to have the evidence of
their senses before they would believe the report: but
t
most marvellous fortune decreed that it should be true.
Their incredulity and astonishment were most fortunate
for me; for they blinded my hearers to the real feelings
with which the exclamation was uttered, and allowed
me sufficient time to prepare myself for making the best
use of what I had said before, with a very different object.
Second best! reiterated I, with an air of
despondency
,
as the company turned from the target to me.
Second best only! Here Billy, my son, take the old
Soap-stick; she's a good piece, but I'm getting too old
and dim sighted to shoot a rifle; especially with the
drop-sight and double wabbles.
Why good Lord a'mighty! said Billy, with a look
that baffles all description, an't you
driv
the cross!
Oh, driv the cross! rejoined I, carelessly. What's
that! Just look where my ball is! I do believe in my
soul its centre is a full quarter of inch from the cross.
I wanted to lay the centre of the bullet upon the cross,
just as if you'd put it there with your fingers.
Several received this palaver with a contemptuous
but very appropriate curl of the nose; and Mealy
Whitecotton
offered to bet a half pint, that I could'nt do the
like agin with no sort o' wabbles, he did'nt care what.
But I had already fortified myself on this quarter, by
my morality. A decided majority, however, were
clearly of opinion that I was serious; and they
regarded
me as one of the wonders of the world. Billy
increased
the majority by now coming out fully with my history,
as he had received it from his father; to which I listened
with quite as much astonishment as any other one of his
hearers. He begged me to go home with him for the
night, or as he expressed it, to go home with him and
swap lies that night, and it should'nt cost me a cent:
the true reading of which, is, that if I would go home
with him, and give him the pleasure of an evening's chat
about old times, his house should be as free to me as my
own. But I could not accept his hospitality without
retracing
five or six miles of the road which I had already
passed; and therefore I declined it.
Well, if you won't go, what must I tell the old
woman
for you? for she'll be mighty glad to hear from the
boy that won the silk handkerchief for her, and I expect
she'll lick me for not bringing you home with me.
Tell her, said I, that I send her a quarter of beef,
which I won, as I did the handkerchief, by nothing in
the world but mere good luck.
Hold your jaw, Lyman! said Billy, I an't a gwine
to tell the old woman any such lies; for she's a
rael
reg'lar built Meth'dist.
As I turned to depart, Stop a minute, stranger! said
one: then lowering his voice to a confidential but
distinctly
audible tone, what you offering for? continued
he. I assured him I was not a candidate for any thing
that I had accidentally fallen in with Billy Curlew, who
begged me to come with him to the shooting match, and
as it lay right on my road, I had stopped. Oh, said
he, with a conciliatory nod, if you're up for any thing
you need'nt be mealy-mouthed about it, 'fore us boys;
for we'll all go in for you here up to the handle.
Yes, said Billy, dang old Roper if we don't go our
death for you, no matter who offers. If ever you come
out for any thing, Lyman, jist let the boys of Upper
Hogthief know it, and they'll go for you, to the hilt,
against creation, tit or no tit, that's the
tatur
. I thanked
them kindly, but repeated my assurances. The reader
will not suppose that the district took its name from the
character of the inhabitants. In almost every county in
the State, there is some spot, or district, which bears a
contemptuous appellation, usually derived from local
rivalships, or from a single accidental circumstance.
HALL.
FINIS.Dear Sir
:I send you the money collected on the
notes you left with me. Since you left here, Polly has
been thinking about old times, and she says, to save her
life she can't recollect you.
BALDWIN.